The morning air was dark with the smoke of burning gods.
They were all afire now, Maid and Mother, Warrior and Smith, the Crone with her 
pearl eyes and the Father with his gilded beard; even the Stranger, carved to 
look more animal than human. The old dry wood and countless layers of paint and 
varnish blazed with a fierce hungry light. Heat rose shimmering through the 
chill air; behind, the gargoyles and stone dragons on the castle walls seemed 
blurred, as if Davos were seeing them through a veil of tears. Or as if 
the beasts were trembling, stirring . . .“An ill thing,” Allard declared, though at least he had the sense to 
keep his voice low. Dale muttered agreement.
“Silence,” said Davos. “Remember where you are.” His sons were good men, 
but young, and Allard especially was rash. Had I stayed a smuggler, Allard 
would have ended on the Wall. Stannis spared him from that end, something else 
I owe him . . .
Hundreds had come to the castle gates to bear witness to the burning of the 
Seven. The smell in the air was ugly. Even for soldiers, it was hard not to 
feel uneasy at such an affront to the gods most had worshiped all their 
lives.
The red woman walked round the fire three times, praying once in the speech of 
Asshai, once in High Valyrian, and once in the Common Tongue. Davos understood 
only the last. “R’hllor,

come to us in our darkness,” she called. “Lord of Light, we offer you these 
false gods, these seven who are one, and him the enemy. Take them and cast your 
light upon us, for the night is dark and full of terrors.” Queen Selyse echoed 
the words. Beside her, Stannis watched impassively, his jaw hard as stone under 
the blue-black shadow of his tight-cropped beard. He had dressed more richly 
than was his wont, as if for the sept.
Dragonstone’s sept had been where Aegon the Conqueror knelt to pray the night 
before he sailed. That had not saved it from the queen’s men. They had 
overturned the altars, pulled down the statues, and smashed the stained glass 
with warhammers. Septon Barre could only curse them, but Ser Hubard Rambton led 
his three sons to the sept to defend their gods. The Rambtons had slain four of 
the queen’s men before the others overwhelmed them. Afterward Guncer Sunglass, 
mildest and most pious of lords, told Stannis he could no longer support his 
claim. Now he shared a sweltering cell with the septon and Ser Hubard’s two 
surviving sons. The other lords had not been slow to take the lesson.
The gods had never meant much to Davos the smuggler, though like most men he 
had been known to make offerings to the Warrior before battle, to the Smith 
when he launched a ship, and to the Mother whenever his wife grew great with 
child. He felt ill as he watched them burn, and not only from the 
smoke.
Maester Cressen would have stopped this. The old man had challenged 
the Lord of Light and been struck down for his impiety, or so the gossips told 
each other. Davos knew the truth. He had

seen the maester slip something into the wine cup. Poison. What else could 
it be? He drank a cup of death to free Stannis from Melisandre, but somehow her 
god shielded her. He would gladly have killed the red woman for that, yet 
what chance would he have where a maester of the Citadel had failed? He was 
only a smuggler raised high, Davos of Flea Bottom, the Onion Knight.
The burning gods cast a pretty light, wreathed in their robes of shifting 
flame, red and orange and yellow. Septon Barre had once told Davos how they’d 
been carved from the masts of the ships that had carried the first Targaryens 
from Valyria. Over the centuries, they had been painted and repainted, gilded, 
silvered, jeweled. “Their beauty will make them more pleasing to R’hllor,” 
Melisandre said when she told Stannis to pull them down and drag them out the 
castle gates.
The Maiden lay athwart the Warrior, her arms widespread as if to embrace him. 
The Mother seemed almost to shudder as the flames came licking up her face. A 
longsword had been thrust through her heart, and its leather grip was alive 
with flame. The Father was on the bottom, the first to fall. Davos watched the 
hand of the Stranger writhe and curl as the fingers blackened and fell away one 
by one, reduced to so much glowing charcoal. Nearby, Lord Celtigar coughed 
fitfully and covered his wrinkled face with a square of linen embroidered in 
red crabs. The Myrmen swapped jokes as they enjoyed the warmth of the fire, but 
young Lord Bar Emmon had turned a splotchy grey, and Lord Velaryon was watching 
the king rather than the conflagration.Davos would have given much to know what he was thinking, but one such as 
Velaryon would never confide in him. The Lord of the Tides was of the blood of 
ancient Valyria, and his House had thrice provided brides for Targaryen 
princes; Davos Seaworth stank of fish and onions. It was the same with the 
other lordlings. He could trust none of them, nor would they ever include him 
in their private councils. They scorned his sons as well. My grandsons 
will joust with theirs, though, and one day their blood may wed with mine. In 
time my little black ship will fly as high as Velaryon’s seahorse or Celtigar’s 
red crabs.
That is, if Stannis won his throne. If he lost . . .
Everything I am, I owe to him. Stannis had raised him to knighthood. 
He had given him a place of honor at his table, a war galley to sail in place 
of a smuggler’s skiff. Dale and Allard captained galleys as well, Maric was 
oarmaster on the Fury, Matthos served his father on Black 
Betha, and the king had taken Devan as a royal squire. One day he would be 
knighted, and the two little lads as well. Marya was mistress of a small keep 
on Cape Wrath, with servants who called her m’lady, and Davos could 
hunt red deer in his own woods. All this he had of Stannis Baratheon, for the 
price of a few finger joints. It was just, what he did to me. I had 
flouted the king’s laws all my life. He has earned my loyalty. Davos 
touched the little pouch that hung from the leather thong about his neck. His 
fingers were his luck, and he needed luck now. As do we all. Lord Stannis 
most of all.
Pale flames licked at the grey sky. Dark smoke rose,

twisting and curling. When the wind pushed it toward them, men blinked and wept 
and rubbed their eyes. Allard turned his head away, coughing and cursing. 
A taste of things to come, thought Davos. Many and more would burn 
before this war was done.
Melisandre was robed all in scarlet satin and blood velvet, her eyes as red as 
the great ruby that glistened at her throat as if it too were afire. “In 
ancient books of Asshai it is written that there will come a day after a long 
summer when the stars bleed and the cold breath of darkness falls heavy on the 
world. In this dread hour a warrior shall draw from the fire a burning sword. 
And that sword shall be Lightbringer, the Red Sword of Heroes, and he who 
clasps it shall be Azor Ahai come again, and the darkness shall flee before 
him.” She lifted her voice, so it carried out over the gathered host. 
“Azor Ahai, beloved of R’hllor! The Warrior of Light, the Son of Fire! 
Come forth, your sword awaits you! Come forth and take it into your 
hand!”
Stannis Baratheon strode forward like a soldier marching into battle. His 
squires stepped up to attend him. Davos watched as his son Devan pulled a long 
padded glove over the king’s right hand. The boy wore a cream-colored doublet 
with a fiery heart sewn on the breast. Bryen Farring was similarly garbed as he 
tied a stiff leather cape around His Grace’s neck. Behind, Davos heard a faint 
clank and clatter of bells. “Under the sea, smoke rises in bubbles, and flames 
burn green and blue and black,” Patchface sang somewhere. “I know, I know, 
oh, oh, oh.”
The king plunged into the fire with his teeth clenched,

holding the leather cloak before him to keep off the flames. He went straight 
to the Mother, grasped the sword with his gloved hand, and wrenched it free of 
the burning wood with a single hard jerk. Then he was retreating, the sword 
held high, jade-green flames swirling around cherry-red steel. Guards rushed to 
beat out the cinders that clung to the king’s clothing.
“A sword of fire!” shouted Queen Selyse. Ser Axell Florent and the 
other queen’s men took up the cry. “A sword of fire! It burns! It burns! 
A sword of fire!”
Melisandre lifted her hands above her head. “Behold! A sign was promised, 
and now a sign is seen! Behold Lightbringer! Azor Ahai has come again! All hail 
the Warrior of Light! All hail the Son of Fire!”
A ragged wave of shouts gave answer, just as Stannis’s glove began to smolder. 
Cursing, the king thrust the point of the sword into the damp earth and beat 
out the flames against his leg.
“Lord, cast your light upon us!” Melisandre called out.
“For the night is dark and full of terrors,” Selyse and her queen’s men 
replied. Should I speak the words as well? Davos wondered. Do I 
owe Stannis that much? Is this fiery god truly his own? His shortened 
fingers twitched.
Stannis peeled off the glove and let it fall to the ground. The gods in the 
pyre were scarcely recognizable anymore. The head fell off the Smith with a 
puff of ash and embers. Melisandre sang in the tongue of Asshai, her voice 
rising and falling like the tides of the sea. Stannis untied his singed leather 
cape and

listened in silence. Thrust in the ground, Lightbringer still glowed ruddy hot, 
but the flames that clung to the sword were dwindling and dying.
By the time the song was done, only charwood remained of the gods, and the 
king’s patience had run its course. He took the queen by the elbow and escorted 
her back into Dragonstone, leaving Lightbringer where it stood. The red woman 
remained a moment to watch as Devan knelt with Byren Farring and rolled up the 
burnt and blackened sword in the king’s leather cloak. The Red Sword of 
Heroes looks a proper mess, thought Davos.
A few of the lords lingered to speak in quiet voices upwind of the fire. They 
fell silent when they saw Davos looking at them. Should Stannis fall, they 
will pull me down in an instant. Neither was he counted one of the queen’s 
men, that group of ambitious knights and minor lordlings who had given 
themselves to this Lord of Light and so won the favor and patronage of 
Lady—no, Queen, remember?—Selyse.
The fire had started to dwindle by the time Melisandre and the squires departed 
with the precious sword. Davos and his sons joined the crowd making its way 
down to the shore and the waiting ships. “Devan acquitted himself well,” he 
said as they went.
“He fetched the glove without dropping it, yes,” said Dale.
Allard nodded. “That badge on Devan’s doublet, the fiery heart, what was that? 
The Baratheon sigil is a crowned stag.”
“A lord can choose more than one badge,” Davos said.
Dale smiled. “A black ship and an onion, Father?”Allard kicked at a stone. “The Others take our 
onion . . . and that flaming heart. It was an ill 
thing to burn the Seven.”
“When did you grow so devout?” Davos said. “What does a smuggler’s son know 
of the doings of gods?”
“I’m a knight’s son, Father. If you won’t remember, why should 
they?”
“A knight’s son, but not a knight,” said Davos. “Nor will you ever be, if 
you meddle in affairs that do not concern you. Stannis is our rightful king, it 
is not for us to question him. We sail his ships and do his bidding. That is 
all.”
“As to that, Father,” Dale said, “I mislike these water casks they’ve given 
me for Wraith. Green pine. The water will spoil on a voyage of any 
length.”
“I got the same for Lady Marya,” said Allard. “The queen’s men 
have laid claim to all the seasoned wood.”
“I will speak to the king about it,” Davos promised. Better it come from him 
than from Allard. His sons were good fighters and better sailors, but they did 
not know how to talk to lords. They were lowborn, even as I was, but they 
do not like to recall that. When they look at our banner, all they see is a 
tall black ship flying on the wind. They close their eyes to the 
onion.
The port was as crowded as Davos had ever known it. Every dock teemed with 
sailors loading provisions, and every inn was packed with soldiers dicing or 
drinking or looking for a whore . . . a vain search, since 
Stannis permitted none on his island. Ships lined the strand; war galleys and 
fishing vessels, stout carracks and

fat-bottomed cogs. The best berths had been taken by the largest vessels: 
Stannis’s flagship Fury rocking between Lord Steffon and 
Stag of the Sea, Lord Velaryon’s silver-hulled Pride of 
Driftmark and her three sisters, Lord Celtigar’s ornate Red 
Claw, the ponderous Swordfish with her long iron prow. Out to 
sea at anchor rode Salladhor Saan’s great Valyrian amongst the striped 
hulls of two dozen smaller Lysene galleys.
A weathered little inn sat on the end of the stone pier where Black Betha, 
Wraith, and Lady Marya shared mooring space with a half-dozen 
other galleys of one hundred oars or less. Davos had a thirst. He took his 
leave of his sons and turned his steps toward the inn. Out front squatted a 
waist-high gargoyle, so eroded by rain and salt that his features were all but 
obliterated. He and Davos were old friends, though. He gave a pat to the stone 
head as he went in. “Luck,” he murmured.
Across the noisy common room, Salladhor Saan sat eating grapes from a wooden 
bowl. When he spied Davos, he beckoned him closer. “Ser knight, come sit with 
me. Eat a grape. Eat two. They are marvelously sweet.” The Lyseni was a sleek, 
smiling man whose flamboyance was a byword on both sides of the narrow sea. 
Today he wore flashing cloth-of-silver, with dagged sleeves so long the ends of 
them pooled on the floor. His buttons were carved jade monkeys, and atop his 
wispy white curls perched a jaunty green cap decorated with a fan of peacock 
feathers.
Davos threaded his way through the tables to a chair. In the days before his 
knighthood, he had often bought cargoes from

Salladhor Saan. The Lyseni was a smuggler himself, as well as a trader, a 
banker, a notorious pirate, and the self-styled Prince of the Narrow Sea. 
When a pirate grows rich enough, they make him a prince. It had been 
Davos who had made the journey to Lys to recruit the old rogue to Lord 
Stannis’s cause.
“You did not see the gods burn, my lord?” he asked.
“The red priests have a great temple on Lys. Always they are burning this and 
burning that, crying out to their R’hllor. They bore me with their fires. Soon 
they will bore King Stannis too, it is to be hoped.” He seemed utterly 
unconcerned that someone might overhear him, eating his grapes and dribbling 
the seeds out onto his lip, flicking them off with a finger. “My Bird of 
Thousand Colors came in yesterday, good ser. She is not a warship, no, but 
a trader, and she paid a call on King’s Landing. Are you sure you will not have 
a grape? Children go hungry in the city, it is said.” He dangled the grapes 
before Davos and smiled.
“It’s ale I need, and news.”
“The men of Westeros are ever rushing,” complained Salladhor Saan. “What 
good is this, I ask you? He who hurries through life hurries to his grave.” He 
belched. “The Lord of Casterly Rock has sent his dwarf to see to King’s 
Landing. Perhaps he hopes that his ugly face will frighten off attackers, eh? 
Or that we will laugh ourselves dead when the Imp capers on the battlements, 
who can say? The dwarf has chased off the lout who ruled the gold cloaks and 
put in his place a knight with an iron hand.” He plucked a grape, and squeezed 
it between thumb and forefinger

until the skin burst. Juice ran down between his fingers.
A serving girl pushed her way through, swatting at the hands that groped her as 
she passed. Davos ordered a tankard of ale, turned back to Saan, and said, 
“How well is the city defended?”
The other shrugged. “The walls are high and strong, but who will man them? 
They are building scorpions and spitfires, oh, yes, but the men in the golden 
cloaks are too few and too green, and there are no others. A swift strike, like 
a hawk plummeting at a hare, and the great city will be ours. Grant us wind to 
fill our sails, and your king could sit upon his Iron Throne by evenfall on the 
morrow. We could dress the dwarf in motley and prick his little cheeks with the 
points of our spears to make him dance for us, and mayhaps your goodly king 
would make me a gift of the beautiful Queen Cersei to warm my bed for a night. 
I have been too long away from my wives, and all in his service.”
“Pirate,” said Davos. “You have no wives, only concubines, and you have been 
well paid for every day and every ship.”
“Only in promises,” said Salladhor Saan mournfully. “Good ser, it is gold I 
crave, not words on papers.” He popped a grape into his mouth.
“You’ll have your gold when we take the treasury in King’s Landing. No man in 
the Seven Kingdoms is more honorable than Stannis Baratheon. He will keep his 
word.” Even as Davos spoke, he thought, This world is twisted beyond 
hope, when lowborn smugglers must vouch for the honor of kings.
“So he has said and said. And so I say, let us do this

thing. Even these grapes could be no more ripe than that city, my old 
friend.”
The serving girl returned with his ale. Davos gave her a copper. “Might be we 
could take King’s Landing, as you say,” he said as he lifted the tankard, 
“but how long would we hold it? Tywin Lannister is known to be at Harrenhal 
with a great host, and Lord Renly . . .”
“Ah, yes, the young brother,” said Salladhor Saan. “That part is not so 
good, my friend. King Renly bestirs himself. No, here he is Lord 
Renly, my pardons. So many kings, my tongue grows weary of the word. The 
brother Renly has left Highgarden with his fair young queen, his flowered lords 
and shining knights, and a mighty host of foot. He marches up your road of 
roses toward the very same great city we were speaking of.”
“He takes his bride?”
The other shrugged. “He did not tell me why. Perhaps he is loath to part with 
the warm burrow between her thighs, even for a night. Or perhaps he is that 
certain of his victory.”
“The king must be told.”
“I have attended to it, good ser. Though His Grace frowns so whenever he does 
see me that I tremble to come before him. Do you think he would like me better 
if I wore a hair shirt and never smiled? Well, I will not do it. I am an honest 
man, he must suffer me in silk and samite. Or else I shall take my ships where 
I am better loved. That sword was not Lightbringer, my friend.”
The sudden shift in subject left Davos uneasy. “Sword?”“A sword plucked from fire, yes. Men tell me things, it is my pleasant 
smile. How shall a burnt sword serve Stannis?”
“A burning sword,” corrected Davos.
“Burnt,” said Salladhor Saan, “and be glad of that,
my friend. Do you know 
the tale of the forging of Lightbringer? I shall tell it to you. It was a time 
when darkness lay heavy on the world. To oppose it, the hero must have a hero’s 
blade, oh, like none that had ever been. And so for thirty days and thirty 
nights Azor Ahai labored sleepless in the temple, forging a blade in the sacred 
fires. Heat and hammer and fold, heat and hammer and fold, oh, yes, until the 
sword was done. Yet when
he plunged
it into water to temper the steel it burst 
asunder.
“Being a hero, it was not for him to shrug and go in search of excellent 
grapes such as these, so again he began. The second time it took him fifty days 
and fifty nights, and this sword seemed even finer than the first. Azor Ahai 
captured a lion, to temper the blade by plunging it through the beast’s red 
heart, but once more the steel shattered and split. Great was his woe and great 
was his sorrow then, for he knew what he must do.
“A hundred days and a hundred nights he labored on the third blade, and as it 
glowed white-hot in the sacred fires, he summoned his wife. “Nissa Nissa,’ he 
said to her, for that was her name, “bare your breast, and know that I love you 
best of all that is in this world.’ She did this thing, why I cannot say, and 
Azor Ahai thrust the smoking sword through her living heart. It is said that 
her cry of anguish and ecstasy left a crack across the face

of the moon, but her blood and her soul and her strength and her courage all 
went into the steel. Such is the tale of the forging of Lightbringer, the Red 
Sword of Heroes.
“Now do you see my meaning? Be glad that it is just a burnt sword that His 
Grace pulled from that fire. Too much light can hurt the eyes, my friend, and 
fire burns.” Salladhor Saan finished the last grape and smacked his 
lips. “When do you think the king will bid us sail, good ser?”
“Soon, I think,” said Davos, “if his god wills it.”
“His god, ser friend? Not yours? Where is the god of Ser Davos 
Seaworth, knight of the onion ship?”
Davos sipped his ale to give himself a moment. The inn is crowded, and you 
are not Salladhor Saan, he reminded himself. Be careful how you 
answer. “King Stannis is my god. He made me and blessed me with his 
trust.”
“I will remember.” Salladhor Saan got to his feet. “My pardons. These grapes 
have given me a hunger, and dinner awaits on my Valyrian. Minced lamb 
with pepper and roasted gull stuffed with mushrooms and fennel and onion. Soon 
we shall eat together in King’s Landing, yes? In the Red Keep we shall feast, 
while the dwarf sings us a jolly tune. When you speak to King Stannis, mention 
if you would that he will owe me another thirty thousand dragons come the black 
of the moon. He ought to have given those gods to me. They were too beautiful 
to burn, and might have brought a noble price in Pentos or Myr. Well, if he 
grants me Queen Cersei for a night I shall forgive him.” The Lyseni clapped

Davos on the back, and swaggered from the inn as if he
owned it.
Ser Davos Seaworth lingered over his tankard for a good while, thinking. A year 
ago, he had been with Stannis in King’s Landing when King Robert 
staged a tourney for Prince Joffrey’s name day. He remembered the red priest 
Thoros of Myr, and the flaming sword he had wielded in the melee. The man had 
made for a colorful spectacle, his red robes flapping while his blade writhed 
with pale green flames, but everyone knew there was no true magic to it, and in 
the end his fire had guttered out and Bronze Yohn Royce had brained him with a 
common mace.
A true sword of fire, now, that would be a wonder to behold. Yet at such a 
cost . . . When he thought of Nissa Nissa, it was his own 
Marya he pictured, a good-natured plump woman with sagging breasts and a kindly 
smile, the best woman in the world. He tried to picture himself driving a sword 
through her, and shuddered. I am not made of the stuff of heroes, he 
decided. If that was the price of a magic sword, it was more than he cared to 
pay.
Davos finished his ale, pushed away the tankard, and left the inn. On the way 
out he patted the gargoyle on the head and muttered, “Luck.” They would all 
need it.
It was well after dark when Devan came down to Black Betha, leading a 
snow-white palfrey. “My lord father,” he announced, “His Grace commands you 
to attend him in the Chamber of the Painted Table. You are to ride the horse 
and come at once.”
It was good to see Devan looking so splendid in his squire’s raiment, but the 
summons made Davos uneasy. Will he bid us sail?
he wondered. Salladhor Saan was not the only captain who felt that King’s 
Landing was ripe for an attack, but a smuggler must learn patience. We 
have no hope of victory. I said as much to Maester Cressen, the day I returned 
to Dragonstone, and nothing has changed. We are too few, the foes too many. If 
we dip our oars, we die. Nonetheless, he climbed onto the horse.
When Davos arrived at the Stone Drum, a dozen highborn knights and great 
bannermen were just leaving. Lords Celtigar and Velaryon each gave him a curt 
nod and walked on while the others ignored him utterly, but Ser Axell Florent 
stopped for a word.
Queen Selyse’s uncle was a keg of a man with thick arms and bandy legs. He had 
the prominent ears of a Florent, even larger than his niece’s. The coarse hair 
that sprouted from his ears did not stop him hearing most of what went on in the 
castle. For ten years Ser Axell had served as castellan of Dragonstone while 
Stannis sat on Robert’s council in King’s Landing, but of late he had emerged 
as the foremost of the queen’s men. “Ser Davos, it is good to see you, as 
ever,” he said.
“And you, my lord.”
“I made note of you this morning as well. The false gods burned with a merry 
light, did they not?”
“They burned brightly.” Davos did not trust this man, for all his courtesy. 
House Florent had declared for Renly.
“The Lady Melisandre tells us that sometimes R’hllor permits his faithful 
servants to glimpse the future in flames. It seemed to me as I watched the fire 
this morning that I was looking at a

dozen beautiful dancers, maidens garbed in yellow silk spinning and swirling 
before a great king. I think it was a true vision, ser. A glimpse of the glory 
that awaits His Grace after we take King’s Landing and the throne that is his 
by rights.”
Stannis has no taste for such dancing, Davos thought, but he dared 
not offend the queen’s uncle. “I saw only fire,” he said, “but the smoke was 
making my eyes water. You must pardon me, ser, the king awaits.” He pushed 
past, wondering why Ser Axell had troubled himself. He is a queen’s man 
and I am the king’s.
Stannis sat at his Painted Table with Maester Pylos at his shoulder, an untidy 
pile of papers before them. “Ser,” the king said when Davos entered, “come 
have a look at this letter.”
Obediently, he selected a paper at random. “It looks handsome enough, Your 
Grace, but I fear I cannot read the words.” Davos could decipher maps and 
charts as well as any, but letters and other writings were beyond his powers. 
But my Devan has learned his letters, and young Steffon and Stannis as 
well.
“I’d forgotten.” A furrow of irritation showed between the king’s brows. 
“Pylos, read it to him.”
“Your Grace.” The maester took up one of the parchments and cleared his 
throat. “All men know me for the trueborn son of Steffon Baratheon, Lord 
of Storm’s End, by his lady wife Cassana of House Estermont. I declare upon the 
honor of my House that my beloved brother Robert, our late king, left no 
trueborn issue of his body, the boy Joffrey, the boy Tommen, and the girl 
Myrcella being abominations born of incest between Cersei Lannister and her

brother Jaime the Kingslayer. By right of birth and blood, I do this day lay 
claim to the Iron Throne of the Seven Kingdoms of Westeros. Let all true men 
declare their loyalty. Done in the Light of the Lord, under the sign and seal 
of Stannis of House Baratheon, the First of His Name, King of the Andals, the 
Rhoynar, and the First Men, and Lord of the Seven Kingdoms.” The 
parchment rustled softly as Pylos laid it down.
“Make it Ser Jaime the Kingslayer henceforth,” Stannis said, 
frowning. “Whatever else the man may be, he remains a knight. I don’t know 
that we ought to call Robert my beloved brother either. He loved me 
no more than he had to, nor I him.”
“A harmless courtesy, Your Grace,” Pylos said.
“A lie. Take it out.” Stannis turned to Davos. “The maester tells me that we 
have one hundred seventeen ravens on hand. I mean to use them all. One hundred 
seventeen ravens will carry one hundred seventeen copies of my letter to every 
corner of the realm, from the Arbor to the Wall. Perhaps a hundred will win 
through against storm and hawk and arrow. If so, a hundred maesters will read 
my words to as many lords in as many solars and 
bedchambers . . . and then the letters will like as not be 
consigned to the fire, and lips pledged to silence. These great lords love 
Joffrey, or Renly, or Robb Stark. I am their rightful king, but they will deny 
me if they can. So I have need of you.”
“I am yours to command, my king. As ever.”
Stannis nodded. “I mean for you to sail Black Betha north, to 
Gulltown, the Fingers, the Three Sisters, even White Harbor.

Your son Dale will go south in Wraith, past Cape Wrath and the Broken 
Arm, all along the coast of Dorne as far as the Arbor. Each of you will carry a 
chest of letters, and you will deliver one to every port and holdfast and 
fishing village. Nail them to the doors of septs and inns for every man to read 
who can.”
Davos said, “That will be few enough.”
“Ser Davos speaks truly, Your Grace,” said Maester Pylos. “It would be 
better to have the letters read aloud.”
“Better, but more dangerous,” said Stannis. “These words will not be kindly 
received.”
“Give me knights to do the reading,” Davos said. “That will carry more 
weight than anything I might say.”
Stannis seemed well satisfied with that. “I can give you such men, yes. I have 
a hundred knights who would sooner read than fight. Be open where you can and 
stealthy where you must. Use every smuggler’s trick you know, the black sails, 
the hidden coves, whatever it requires. If you run short of letters, capture a 
few septons and set them to copying out more. I mean to use your second son as 
well. He will take Lady Marya across the narrow sea, to Braavos and 
the other Free Cities, to deliver other letters to the men who rule there. The 
world will know of my claim, and of Cersei’s infamy.”
You can tell them, Davos thought, but will they believe? He 
glanced thoughtfully at Maester Pylos. The king caught the look. “Maester, 
perhaps you ought get to your writing. We will need a great many letters, and 
soon.”“As you will.” Pylos bowed, and took his leave.
The king waited until he was gone before he said, “What is it you would not 
say in the presence of my maester, Davos?”
“My liege, Pylos is pleasant enough, but I cannot see the chain about his neck 
without mourning for Maester Cressen.”
“Is it his fault the old man died?” Stannis glanced into the fire. “I never 
wanted Cressen at that feast. He’d angered me, yes, he’d given me bad counsel, 
but I did not want him dead. I’d hoped he might be granted a few years of ease 
and comfort. He had earned that much, at least, but”—he ground his 
teeth together—“but he died. And Pylos serves me ably.”
“Pylos is the least of it. The letter . . . What did your 
lords make of it, I wonder?”
Stannis snorted. “Celtigar pronounced it admirable. If I showed him the 
contents of my privy, he would declare that admirable as well. The others 
bobbed their heads up and down like a flock of geese, all but
Velaryon, who 
said that steel would decide the matter, not words on parchment. As if I had 
never suspected. The Others take my lords, I’ll hear your views.”
“Your words were blunt and strong.”
“And true.”
“And true. Yet you have no proof. Of this incest. No more than you did a 
year ago.”
“There’s proof of a sort at Storm’s End. Robert’s bastard. The one he 
fathered on my wedding night, in the very bed they’d made up for me and my 
bride. Delena was a Florent, and a maiden

when he took her, so Robert acknowledged the babe. Edric Storm, they call him. 
He is said to be the very image of my brother. If men were to see him, and then 
look again at Joffrey and Tommen, they could not help but wonder, I would 
think.”
“Yet how are men to see him, if he is at Storm’s End?”
Stannis drummed his fingers on the Painted Table. “It is a difficulty. One of 
many.” He raised his eyes. “You have more to say about the letter. Well, get 
on with it. I did not make you a knight so you could learn to mouth empty 
courtesies. I have my lords for that. Say what you would say, 
Davos.”
Davos bowed his head. “There was a phrase at the end. How did it go? Done 
in the Light of the Lord . . .”
“Yes.” The king’s jaw was clenched.
“Your people will mislike those words.”
“As you did?” said Stannis sharply.
“If you were to say instead, Done in the sight of gods and men, or 
By the grace of the gods old and new . . .”
“Have you gone devout on me, smuggler?”
“That was to be my question for you, my liege.”
“Was it now? It sounds as though you love my new god no more than you love my 
new maester.”
“I do not know this Lord of Light,” Davos admitted, “but I knew the gods we 
burned this morning. The Smith has kept my ships safe, while the Mother has 
given me seven strong sons.”
“Your wife has given you seven strong sons. Do you pray to her? It was wood we 
burned this morning.”“That may be so,” Davos said, “but when I was a boy in Flea Bottom 
begging for a copper, sometimes the septons would feed me.”
“I feed you now.”
“You have given me an honored place at your table. And in return I give you 
truth. Your people will not love you if you take from them the gods they have 
always worshiped, and give them one whose very name sounds queer on their 
tongues.”
Stannis stood abruptly. “R’hllor. Why is that so hard? They will not 
love me, you say? When have they ever loved me? How can I lose something I have 
never owned?” He moved to the south window to gaze out at the moonlit sea. “I 
stopped believing in gods the day I saw the Windproud break up across 
the bay. Any gods so monstrous as to drown my mother and father would never 
have my worship, I vowed. In King’s Landing, the High Septon would 
prattle at me of how all justice and goodness flowed from the Seven, but all I 
ever saw of either was made by men.”
“If you do not believe in gods—”
“—why trouble with this new one?” Stannis broke in. “I have asked 
myself as well. I know little and care less of gods, but the red priestess has 
power.”
Yes, but what sort of power? “Cressen had wisdom.”
“I trusted in his wisdom and your wiles, and what did they avail me, smuggler? 
The storm lords sent you packing. I went to them a beggar and they laughed at 
me. Well, there will be no more begging, and no more laughing either. The Iron 
Throne is mine by rights, but how am I to take it? There are four kings in the

realm, and three of them have more men and more gold than I do. I have 
ships . . . and I have her. The red woman. Half my 
knights are afraid even to say her name, did you know? If she can do nothing 
else, a sorceress who can inspire such dread in grown men is not to be 
despised. A frightened man is a beaten man. And perhaps she can do 
more. I mean to find out.
“When I was a lad I found an injured goshawk and nursed her back to health. 
Proudwing, I named her. She would perch on my shoulder and flutter 
from room to room after me and take food from my hand, but she would not soar. 
Time and again I would take her hawking, but she never flew higher than the 
treetops. Robert called her Weakwing. He owned a gyrfalcon named 
Thunderclap who never missed her strike. One day our great-uncle Ser Harbert 
told me to try a different bird. I was making a fool of myself with Proudwing, 
he said, and he was right.” Stannis Baratheon turned away from the window, and 
the ghosts who moved upon the southern sea. “The Seven have never brought me 
so much as a sparrow. It is time I tried another hawk, Davos. A red 
hawk.”

Ser Cortnay Penrose wore no armor. He sat a sorrel stallion, his 
standard-bearer a dapple grey. Above them flapped Baratheon’s crowned stag and 
the crossed quills of Penrose, white on a russet field. Ser Cortnay’s 
spade-shaped beard was russet as well, though he’d gone wholly bald on top. If 
the size and splendor of the king’s party impressed him, it did not show on 
that weathered face.They trotted up with much clinking of chain and rattle of plate. Even 
Davos wore mail, though he could not have said why; his shoulders and lower 
back ached from the unaccustomed weight. It made him feel cumbered and foolish, 
and he wondered once more why he was here. It is not for me to question 
the king’s commands, and yet . . .
Every man of the party was of better birth and higher station than Davos 
Seaworth, and the great lords glittered in the morning sun. Silvered steel and 
gold inlay brightened their armor, and their warhelms were crested in a riot of 
silken plumes, feathers, and cunningly wrought heraldic beasts with gemstone 
eyes. Stannis himself looked out of place in this rich and royal company. Like 
Davos, the king was plainly garbed in wool and boiled leather, though the 
circlet of red gold about his temples lent him a certain grandeur. Sunlight 
flashed off its

flame-shaped points whenever he moved his head.
This was the closest Davos had come to His Grace in the eight days since 
Black Betha had joined the rest of the fleet off Storm’s End. He’d 
sought an audience within an hour of his arrival, only to be told that the king 
was occupied. The king was often occupied, Davos learned from his son Devan, 
one of the royal squires. Now that Stannis Baratheon had come into his power, 
the lordlings buzzed around him like flies round a corpse. He looks half a 
corpse too, years older than when I left Dragonstone. Devan said the king 
scarcely slept of late. “Since Lord Renly died, he has been troubled by 
terrible nightmares,” the boy had confided to his father. “Maester’s potions 
do not touch them. Only the Lady Melisandre can soothe him to 
sleep.”
Is that why she shares his pavilion now? Davos wondered. To pray 
with him? Or does she have another way to soothe him to sleep? It was an 
unworthy question, and one he dared not ask, even of his own son. Devan was a 
good boy, but he wore the flaming heart proudly on his doublet, and his father 
had seen him at the nightfires as dusk fell, beseeching the Lord of Light to 
bring the dawn. He is the king’s squire, he told himself, it is 
only to be expected that he would take the king’s god.
Davos had almost forgotten how high and thick the walls of Storm’s End loomed 
up close. King Stannis halted beneath them, a few feet from Ser Cortnay and his 
standard-bearer. “Ser,” he said with stiff courtesy. He made no move to 
dismount.
“My lord.” That was less courteous, but not unexpected.“It is customary to grant a king the style Your Grace,” 
announced Lord Florent. A red gold fox poked its shining snout out from his 
breastplate through a circle of lapis lazuli flowers. Very tall, very courtly, 
and very rich, the Lord of Brightwater Keep had been the first of Renly’s 
bannermen to declare for Stannis, and the first to renounce his old gods and 
take up the Lord of Light. Stannis had left his queen on Dragonstone along with 
her uncle Axell, but the queen’s men were more numerous and powerful than ever, 
and Alester Florent was the foremost.
Ser Cortnay Penrose ignored him, preferring to address Stannis. “This is a 
notable company. The great lords Estermont, Errol, and Varner. Ser Jon of the 
green-apple Fossoways and Ser Bryan of the red. Lord Caron and Ser Guyard of 
King Renly’s Rainbow Guard . . . and the puissant 
Lord Alester Florent of Brightwater, to be sure. Is that your Onion Knight I 
spy to the rear? Well met, Ser Davos. I fear I do not know the 
lady.”
“I am named Melisandre, ser.” She alone came unarmored, but for her flowing 
red robes. At her throat the great ruby drank the daylight. “I serve your 
king, and the Lord of Light.”
“I wish you well of them, my lady,” Ser Cortnay answered, “but I bow to 
other gods, and a different king.”
“There is but one true king, and one true god,” announced Lord 
Florent.
“Are we here to dispute theology, my lord? Had I known, I would have brought a 
septon.”
“You know full well why we are here,” said Stannis. “You

have had a fortnight to consider my offer. You sent your ravens. No help has 
come. Nor will it. Storm’s End stands alone, and I am out of patience. One last 
time, ser, I command you to open your gates, and deliver me that which is mine 
by rights.”
“And the terms?” asked Ser Cortnay.
“Remain as before,” said Stannis. “I will pardon you for your treason, as I 
have pardoned these lords you see behind me. The men of your garrison will be 
free to enter my service or to return unmolested to their homes. You may keep 
your weapons and as much property as a man can carry. I will require your 
horses and pack animals, however.”
“And what of Edric Storm?”
“My brother’s bastard must be surrendered to me.”
“Then my answer is still no, my lord.”
The king clenched his jaw. He said nothing.
Melisandre spoke instead. “May the Lord of Light protect you in your darkness, 
Ser Cortnay.”
“May the Others bugger your Lord of Light,” Penrose spat back, “and wipe his 
arse with that rag you bear.”
Lord Alester Florent cleared his throat. “Ser Cortnay, mind your tongue. His 
Grace means the boy no harm. The child is his own blood, and mine as well. My 
niece Delena was the mother, as all men know. If you will not trust to the 
king, trust to me. You know me for a man of honor—”
“I know you for a man of ambition,” Ser Cortnay broke in. “A man who changes 
kings and gods the way I change my boots. As

do these other turncloaks I see before me.”
An angry clamor went up from the king’s men. He is not far wrong, 
Davos thought. Only a short time before, the Fossoways, Guyard Morrigen, and 
the Lords Caron, Varner, Errol, and Estermont had all belonged to Renly. They 
had sat in his pavilion, helped him make his battle plans, plotted how Stannis 
might be brought low. And Lord Florent had been with them—he might be 
Queen Selyse’s own uncle, but that had not kept the Lord of Brightwater from 
bending his knee to Renly when Renly’s star was rising.
Bryce Caron walked his horse forward a few paces, his long rainbow-striped 
cloak twisting in the wind off the bay. “No man here is a turncloak, ser. My 
fealty belongs to Storm’s End, and King Stannis is its rightful 
lord . . . and our true king. He is the last of House 
Baratheon, Robert’s heir and Renly’s.”
“If that is so, why is the Knight of Flowers not among you? And where is 
Mathis Rowan? Randyll Tarly? Lady Oakheart? Why are they not here in your 
company, they who loved Renly best? Where is Brienne of Tarth, I ask 
you?”
“That one?” Ser Guyard Morrigen laughed harshly. “She ran. As well she 
might. Hers was the hand that slew the king.”
“A lie,” Ser Cortnay said. “I knew Brienne when she was no more than a girl 
playing at her father’s feet in Evenfall Hall, and I knew her still better when 
the Evenstar sent her here to Storm’s End. She loved Renly Baratheon from the 
first moment she laid eyes on him, a blind man could see it.”
“To be sure,” declared Lord Florent airily, “and she would

scarcely be the first maid maddened to murder by a man who spurned her. Though 
for my own part, I believe it was Lady Stark who slew the king. She had 
journeyed all the way from Riverrun to plead for an alliance, and Renly had 
refused her. No doubt she saw him as a danger to her son, and so removed 
him.”
“It was Brienne,” insisted Lord Caron. “Ser Emmon Cuy swore as much before 
he died. You have my oath on that, Ser Cortnay.”
Contempt thickened Ser Cortnay’s voice. “And what is that worth? You wear your 
cloak of many colors, I see. The one Renly gave you when you swore your 
oath to protect him. If he is dead, how is it you are not?” He 
turned his scorn on Guyard Morrigen. “I might ask the same of you, ser. Guyard 
the Green, yes? Of the Rainbow Guard? Sworn to give his own life for his 
king’s? If I had such a cloak, I would be ashamed to wear it.”
Morrigen bristled. “Be glad this is a parley, Penrose, or I would have your 
tongue for those words.”
“And cast it in the same fire where you left your manhood?”
“Enough!” Stannis said. “The Lord of Light willed that my brother 
die for his treason. Who did the deed matters not.”
“Not to you, perhaps,” said Ser Cortnay. “I have heard your 
proposal, Lord Stannis. Now here is mine.” He pulled off his glove and flung 
it full in the king’s face. “Single combat. Sword, lance, or any weapon you 
care to name. Or if you fear to hazard your magic sword and royal skin against 
an old man, name you a champion, and I shall do the same.” He gave Guyard 
Morrigen and Bryce Caron a scathing look. “Either of these pups would do

nicely, I should think.”
Ser Guyard Morrigen grew dark with fury. “I will take up the gage, if it 
please the king.”
“As would I.” Bryce Caron looked to Stannis.
The king ground his teeth. “No.”
Ser Cortnay did not seem surprised. “Is it the justice of your cause you 
doubt, my lord, or the strength of your arm? Are you afraid I’ll piss on your 
burning sword and put it out?”
“Do you take me for an utter fool, ser?” asked Stannis. “I have twenty 
thousand men. You are besieged by land and sea. Why would I choose single 
combat when my eventual victory is certain?” The king pointed a finger at him. 
“I give you fair warning. If you force me to take my castle by storm, you may 
expect no mercy. I will hang you for traitors, every one of you.”
“As the gods will it. Bring on your storm, my lord—and recall, if you 
do, the name of this castle.” Ser Cortnay gave a pull on his reins 
and rode back toward the gate.
Stannis said no word, but turned his horse around and started back toward his 
camp. The others followed. “If we storm these walls thousands will die,” 
fretted ancient Lord Estermont, who was the king’s grandfather on his mother’s 
side. “Better to hazard but a single life, surely? Our cause is righteous, so 
the gods must surely bless our champion’s arms with victory.”
God, old man, thought Davos. You forget, we have only one now, 
Melisandre’s Lord of Light.
Ser Jon Fossoway said, “I would gladly take this challenge

myself, though I’m not half the swordsman Lord Caron is, or Ser Guyard. Renly 
left no notable knights at Storm’s End. Garrison duty is for old men and green 
boys.”
Lord Caron agreed. “An easy victory, to be sure. And what glory, to win 
Storm’s End with a single stroke!”
Stannis raked them all with a look. “You chatter like magpies, and with less 
sense. I will have quiet.” The king’s eyes fell on Davos. “Ser. Ride with 
me.” He spurred his horse away from his followers. Only Melisandre kept pace, 
bearing the great standard of the fiery heart with the crowned stag within. 
As if it had been swallowed whole.
Davos saw the looks that passed between the lordlings as he rode past them to 
join the king. These were no onion knights, but proud men from houses whose 
names were old in honor. Somehow he knew that Renly had never chided them in 
such a fashion. The youngest of the Baratheons had been born with a gift for 
easy courtesy that his brother sadly lacked.
He eased back to a slow trot when his horse came up beside the king’s. “Your 
Grace.” Seen at close hand, Stannis looked worse than Davos had realized from 
afar. His face had grown haggard, and he had dark circles under his 
eyes.
“A smuggler must be a fair judge of men,” the king said. “What do you make 
of this Ser Cortnay Penrose?”
“A stubborn man,” said Davos carefully.
“Hungry for death, I call it. He throws my pardon in my face. Aye, and throws 
his life away in the bargain, and the lives

of every man inside those walls. Single combat?” The king snorted in 
derision. “No doubt he mistook me for Robert.”
“More like he was desperate. What other hope does he have?”
“None. The castle will fall. But how to do it quickly?” Stannis brooded on 
that for a moment. Under the steady clop-clop of hooves, Davos could 
hear the faint sound of the king grinding his teeth. “Lord Alester urges me to 
bring old Lord Penrose here. Ser Cortnay’s father. You know the man, I 
believe?”
“When I came as your envoy, Lord Penrose received me more courteously than 
most,” Davos said. “He is an old done man, sire. Sickly and 
failing.”
“Florent would have him fail more visibly. In his son’s sight, with a noose 
about his neck.”
It was dangerous to oppose the queen’s men, but Davos had vowed always to tell 
his king the truth. “I think that would be ill done, my liege. Ser Cortnay 
will watch his father die before he would ever 
betray his trust. It would gain 
us nothing, and bring dishonor to our cause.”
“What dishonor?” Stannis bristled. “Would you have me spare the lives of 
traitors?”
“You have spared the lives of those behind us.”
“Do you scold me for that, smuggler?”
“It is not my place.” Davos feared he had said too much.
The king was relentless. “You esteem this Penrose more than you do my lords 
bannermen. Why?”
“He keeps faith.”“A misplaced faith in a dead usurper.”
“Yes,” Davos admitted, “but still, he keeps faith.”
“As those behind us do not?”
Davos had come too far with Stannis to play coy now. “Last year they were 
Robert’s men. A moon ago they were Renly’s. This morning they are yours. Whose 
will they be on the morrow?”
And Stannis laughed. A sudden gust, rough and full of scorn. “I told you, 
Melisandre,” he said to the red woman, “my Onion Knight tells me the 
truth.”
“I see you know him well, Your Grace,” the red woman said.
“Davos, I have missed you sorely,” the king said. “Aye, I have a tail of 
traitors, your nose does not deceive you. My lords bannermen are inconstant 
even in their treasons. I need them, but you should know how it sickens me to 
pardon such as these when I have punished better men for lesser crimes. You 
have every right to reproach me, Ser Davos.”
“You reproach yourself more than I ever could, Your Grace. You must have these 
great lords to win your throne—”
“Fingers and all, it seems.” Stannis smiled grimly.
Unthinking, Davos raised his maimed hand to the pouch at his throat, and felt 
the fingerbones within. Luck.
The king saw the motion. “Are they still there, Onion Knight? You have not 
lost them?”
“No.”
“Why do you keep them? I have often wondered.”
“They remind me of what I was. Where I came from. They

remind me of your justice, my liege.”
“It was justice,” Stannis said. “A good act does not wash out the 
bad, nor a bad act the good. Each should have its own reward. You were a hero 
and a smuggler.” He glanced behind at Lord Florent and the others, 
rainbow knights and turncloaks, who were following at a distance. “These 
pardoned lords would do well to reflect on that. Good men and true will fight 
for Joffrey, wrongly believing him the true king. A northman might even say the 
same of Robb Stark. But these lords who flocked to my brother’s banners 
knew him for a usurper. They turned their backs on their rightful 
king for no better reason than dreams of power and glory, and I have marked 
them for what they are. Pardoned them, yes. Forgiven. But not forgotten.” He 
fell silent for a moment, brooding on his plans for justice. And then, 
abruptly, he said, “What do the smallfolk say of Renly’s death?”
“They grieve. Your brother was well loved.”
“Fools love a fool,” grumbled Stannis, “but I grieve for him as well. For 
the boy he was, not the man he grew to be.” He was silent for a time, and then 
he said, “How did the commons take the news of Cersei’s incest?”
“While we were among them they shouted for King Stannis. I cannot speak for 
what they said once we had sailed.”
“So you do not think they believed?”
“When I was smuggling, I learned that some men believe everything and some 
nothing. We met both sorts. And there is another tale being spread as 
well—”“Yes.” Stannis bit off the word. “Selyse has given me horns, and tied 
a fool’s bells to the end of each. My daughter fathered by a halfwit jester! A 
tale as vile as it is absurd. Renly threw it in my teeth when we met to parley. 
You would need to be as mad as Patchface to believe such a thing.”
“That may be so, my liege . . . but whether they believe the 
story or no, they delight to tell it.” In many places it had come before them, 
poisoning the well for their own true tale.
“Robert could piss in a cup and men would call it wine, but I offer them pure 
cold water and they squint in suspicion and mutter to each other about how 
queer it tastes.” Stannis ground his teeth. “If someone said I had magicked 
myself into a boar to kill Robert, likely they would believe that as 
well.”
“You cannot stop them talking, my liege,” Davos said, “but when you take 
your vengeance on your brothers’ true killers, the realm will know such tales 
for lies.”
Stannis only seemed to half hear him. “I have no doubt that Cersei had a hand 
in Robert’s death. I will have justice for him. Aye, and for Ned Stark and Jon 
Arryn as well.”
“And for Renly?” The words were out before Davos could stop to consider 
them.
For a long time the king did not speak. Then, very softly, he said, “I dream 
of it sometimes. Of Renly’s dying. A green tent, candles, a woman screaming. 
And blood.” Stannis looked down at his hands. “I was still abed when he died. 
Your Devan will tell you. He tried to wake me. Dawn was nigh and my lords

were waiting, fretting. I should have been ahorse, armored. I knew Renly would 
attack at break of day. Devan says I thrashed and cried out, but what does it 
matter? It was a dream. I was in my tent when Renly died, and when I woke my 
hands were clean.”
Ser Davos Seaworth could feel his phantom fingertips start to itch. 
Something is wrong here, the onetime smuggler thought. Yet he nodded 
and said, “I see.”
“Renly offered me a peach. At our parley. Mocked me, defied me, threatened me, 
and offered me a peach. I thought he was drawing a blade and went for mine own. 
Was that his purpose, to make me show fear? Or was it one of his pointless 
jests? When he spoke of how sweet the peach was, did his words have some hidden 
meaning?” The king gave a shake of his head, like a dog shaking a rabbit to 
snap its neck. “Only Renly could vex me so with a piece of fruit. He brought 
his doom on himself with his treason, but I did love him, Davos. I know that 
now. I swear, I will go to my grave thinking of my brother’s peach.”
By then they were in amongst the camp, riding past the ordered rows of tents, 
the blowing banners, and the stacks of shields and spears. The stink of horse 
dung was heavy in the air, mingled with the woodsmoke and the smell of cooking 
meat. Stannis reined up long enough to bark a brusque dismissal to Lord Florent 
and the others, commanding them to attend him in his pavilion one hour hence 
for a council of war. They bowed their heads and dispersed, while Davos and 
Melisandre rode to the king’s pavilion.
The tent had to be large, since it was there his lords

bannermen came to council. Yet there was nothing grand about it. It was a 
soldier’s tent of heavy canvas, dyed the dark yellow that sometimes passed for 
gold. Only the royal banner that streamed atop the center pole marked it as a 
king’s. That, and the guards without; queen’s men leaning on tall spears, with 
the badge of the fiery heart sewn over their own.
Grooms came up to help them dismount. One of the guards relieved Melisandre of 
her cumbersome standard, driving the staff deep into the soft ground. Devan 
stood to one side of the door, waiting to lift the flap for the king. An older 
squire waited beside him. Stannis took off his crown and handed it to Devan. 
“Cold water, cups for two. Davos, attend me. My lady, I shall send for you 
when I require you.”
“As the king commands.” Melisandre bowed.
After the brightness of the morning, the interior of the pavilion seemed cool 
and dim. Stannis seated himself on a plain wooden camp stool and waved Davos to 
another. “One day I may make you a lord, smuggler. If only to irk Celtigar and 
Florent. You will not thank me, though. It will mean you must suffer through 
these councils, and feign interest in the braying of mules.”
“Why do you have them, if they serve no purpose?”
“The mules love the sound of their own braying, why else? And I need them to 
haul my cart. Oh, to be sure, once in a great while some useful notion is put 
forth. But not today, I think—ah, here’s your son with our 
water.”
Devan set the tray on the table and filled two clay cups.

The king sprinkled a pinch of salt in his cup before he drank; Davos took his 
water straight, wishing it were wine. “You were speaking of your 
council?”
“Let me tell you how it will go. Lord Velaryon will urge me to storm the 
castle walls at first light, grapnels and scaling ladders against arrows and 
boiling oil. The young mules will think this a splendid notion. Estermont will 
favor settling down to starve them out, as Tyrell and Redwyne once tried with 
me. That might take a year, but old mules are patient. And Lord Caron and the 
others who like to kick will want to take up Ser Cortnay’s gauntlet and hazard 
all upon a single combat. Each one imagining he will be my champion 
and win undying fame.” The king finished his water. “What would you 
have me do, smuggler?”
Davos considered a moment before he answered. “Strike for King’s Landing at 
once.”
The king snorted. “And leave Storm’s End untaken?”
“Ser Cortnay does not have the power to harm you. The Lannisters do. A siege 
would take too long, single combat is too chancy, and an assault would cost 
thousands of lives with no certainty of success. And there is no need. Once you 
dethrone Joffrey this castle must come to you with all the rest. It is said 
about the camp that Lord Tywin Lannister rushes west to rescue
Lannisport from 
the vengeance of the northmen . . .”
“You have a passing clever father, Devan,” the king told the boy standing by 
his elbow. “He makes me wish I had more smugglers in my service. And fewer 
lords. Though you are wrong in one

respect, Davos. There is a need. If I leave Storm’s End untaken in my 
rear, it will be said I was defeated here. And that I cannot permit. Men do not 
love me as they loved my brothers. They follow me because they fear 
me . . . and defeat is death to fear. The castle must fall.” 
His jaw ground side to side. “Aye, and quickly. Doran Martell has 
called
his banners and fortified the mountain passes. His Dornishmen are poised 
to sweep down onto the Marches. And Highgarden is far from spent. My brother 
left the greater part of his power at Bitterbridge, near sixty thousand foot. I 
sent my wife’s brother Ser Errol with Ser Parmen Crane to take them under my 
command, but they have not returned. I fear that Ser Loras Tyrell reached 
Bitterbridge before my envoys, and took that host for his own.”
“All the more reason to take King’s Landing as soon as we may. Salladhor Saan 
told me—”
“Salladhor Saan thinks only of gold!” Stannis exploded. “His head is full of 
dreams of the treasure he fancies lies under the Red Keep, so let us hear no 
more of Salladhor Saan. The day I need military counsel from a Lysene brigand 
is the day I put off my crown and take the black.” The king made a fist. “Are 
you here to serve me, smuggler? Or to vex me with arguments?”
“I am yours,” Davos said.
“Then hear me. Ser Cortnay’s lieutenant is cousin to the Fossoways. Lord 
Meadows, a green boy of twenty. Should some ill chance strike down Penrose, 
command of Storm’s End would pass to this stripling, and his cousins believe he 
would accept my terms

and yield up the castle.”
“I remember another stripling who was given command of Storm’s End. He could 
not have been much more than twenty.”
“Lord Meadows is not as stonehead stubborn as I was.”
“Stubborn or craven, what does it matter? Ser Cortnay Penrose seemed hale and 
hearty to me.”
“So did my brother, the day before his death. The night is dark and full of 
terrors, Davos.”
Davos Seaworth felt the small hairs rising on the back of his neck. “My lord, 
I do not understand you.”
“I do not require your understanding. Only your service. Ser Cortnay will be 
dead within the day. Melisandre has seen it in the flames of the future. His 
death and the manner of it. He will not die in knightly combat, needless to 
say.” Stannis held out his cup, and Devan filled it again from the flagon. 
“Her flames do not lie. She saw Renly’s doom as well. On Dragonstone she saw 
it, and told Selyse. Lord Velaryon and your friend Salladhor Saan would have 
had me sail against Joffrey, but Melisandre told me that if I went to Storm’s 
End, I would win the best part of my brother’s power, and she was 
right.”
“B-but,” Davos stammered, “Lord Renly only came here because you had 
laid siege to the castle. He was marching toward King’s Landing before, against 
the Lannisters, he would have—”
Stannis shifted in his seat, frowning. “Was, would have, what is 
that? He did what he did. He came here with his banners and his peaches, to his 
doom . . . and it was well for me he did.

Melisandre saw another day in her flames as well. A morrow where Renly rode out 
of the south in his green armor to smash my host beneath the walls of King’s 
Landing. Had I met my brother there, it might have been me who died in place of 
him.”
“Or you might have joined your strength to his to bring down the Lannisters,” 
Davos protested. “Why not that? If she saw two futures, 
well . . . both cannot be true.”
King Stannis pointed a finger. “There you err, Onion Knight. Some lights cast 
more than one shadow. Stand before the nightfire and you’ll see for yourself. 
The flames shift and dance, never still. The shadows grow tall and short, and 
every man casts a dozen. Some are fainter than others, that’s all. Well, men 
cast their shadows across the future as well. One shadow or many. Melisandre sees them all.”
“You do not love the woman. I know that, Davos, I am not blind. My lords 
mislike her too. Estermont thinks the flaming heart ill-chosen and begs to 
fight beneath the crowned stag as of old. Ser Guyard says a woman should not be 
my standard-bearer. Others whisper that she has no place in my war councils, 
that I ought to send her back to Asshai, that it is sinful to keep her in my 
tent of a night. Aye, they whisper . . . while she 
serves.”
“Serves how?” Davos asked, dreading the answer.
“As needed.” The king looked at him. “And you?”
“I . . .” Davos licked his lips. “I am yours to command. What 
would you have me do?”
“Nothing you have not done before. Only land a boat beneath

the castle, unseen, in the black of night. Can you do that?”
“Yes. Tonight?”
The king gave a curt nod. “You will need a small boat. Not Black 
Betha. No one must know what you do.”
Davos wanted to protest. He was a knight now, no longer a smuggler, and he had 
never been an assassin. Yet when he opened his mouth, the words would not come. 
This was Stannis, his just lord, to whom he owed all he was. And he 
had his sons to consider as well. Gods be good, what has she done to 
him?
“You are quiet,” Stannis observed.
And should remain so, Davos told himself, yet instead he said, “My 
liege, you must have the castle, I see that now, but surely there are other 
ways. Cleaner ways. Let Ser Cortnay keep the bastard boy and he may 
well yield.”
“I must have the boy, Davos. Must. Melisandre has seen that in the 
flames as well.”
Davos groped for some other answer. “Storm’s End holds no knight who can match 
Ser Guyard or Lord Caron, or any of a hundred others sworn to your service. 
This single combat . . . could it be that Ser Cortnay seeks for 
a way to yield with honor? Even if it means his own life?”
A troubled look crossed the king’s face like a passing cloud. “More like he 
plans some treachery. There will be no combat of champions. Ser Cortnay was 
dead before he ever threw that glove. The flames do not lie, Davos.”
Yet they require me to make them true, he thought. It had

been a long time since Davos Seaworth felt so sad.
And so it was that he found himself once more crossing Shipbreaker Bay in the 
dark of night, steering a tiny boat with a black sail. The sky was the same, 
and the sea. The same salt smell was in the air, and the water chuckling 
against the hull was just as he remembered it. A thousand flickering campfires 
burned around the castle, as 
the fires of the Tyrells and Redwynes had sixteen years before. But all the 
rest was different.
The last time it was life I brought to Storm’s End, shaped to look like 
onions. This time it is death, in the shape of Melisandre of Asshai. 
Sixteen years ago, the sails had cracked and snapped with every shift of wind, 
until he’d pulled them down and gone on with muffled oars. Even so, his heart 
had been in his gullet. The men on the Redwyne galleys had grown lax after so 
long, however, and they had slipped through the cordon smooth as black satin. 
This time, the only ships in sight belonged to Stannis, and the only danger 
would come from watchers on the castle walls. Even so, Davos was taut as a 
bowstring.
Melisandre huddled upon a thwart, lost in the folds of a dark red cloak that 
covered her from head to heels, her face a paleness beneath the cowl. Davos 
loved the water. He slept best when he had a deck rocking beneath him, and the 
sighing of the wind in his rigging was a sweeter sound to him than any a singer 
could make with his harp strings. Even the sea brought him no comfort tonight, 
though. “I can smell the fear on you, ser

knight,” the red woman said softly.
“Someone once told me the night is dark and full of terrors. And tonight I am 
no knight. Tonight I am Davos the smuggler again. Would that you were an 
onion.”
She laughed. “Is it me you fear? Or what we do?”
“What you do. I’ll have no part of it.”
“Your hand raised the sail. Your hand holds the tiller.”
Silent, Davos tended to his course. The shore was a snarl of rocks, so he was 
taking them well out across the bay. He would wait for the tide to turn before 
coming about. Storm’s End dwindled behind them, but the red woman seemed 
unconcerned. “Are you a good man, Davos Seaworth?” she asked.
Would a good man be doing this? “I am a man,” he said. “I am kind 
to my wife, but I have known other women. I have tried to be a father to my 
sons, to help make them a place in this world. Aye, I’ve broken laws, but I 
never felt evil until tonight. I would say my parts are mixed, m’lady. Good 
and bad.”
“A grey man,” she said. “Neither white nor black, but partaking of both. Is 
that what you are, Ser Davos?”
“What if I am? It seems to me that most men are grey.”
“If half of an onion is black with rot, it is a rotten onion. A man is good, 
or he is evil.”
The fires behind them had melted into one vague glow against the black 
sky, and the land was almost out of sight. It was time to come about. “Watch 
your head, my lady.” He pushed on the tiller, and the small boat threw up a 
curl of black water as

she turned. Melisandre leaned under the swinging yard, one hand on the gunwale, 
calm as ever. Wood creaked, canvas cracked, and water splashed, so loudly a man 
might swear the castle was sure to hear. Davos knew better. The endless crash 
of wave on rock was the only sound that ever penetrated the massive seaward 
walls of Storm’s End, and that but faintly.
A rippling wake spread out behind as they swung back toward the shore. “You 
speak of men and onions,” Davos said to Melisandre. “What of women? Is it not 
the same for them? Are you good or evil, my lady?”
That made her chuckle. “Oh, good. I am a knight of sorts myself, sweet ser. A 
champion of light and life.”
“Yet you mean to kill a man tonight,” he said. “As you killed Maester 
Cressen.”
“Your maester poisoned himself. He meant to poison me, but I was protected by 
a greater power and he was not.”
“And Renly Baratheon? Who was it who killed him?”
Her head turned. Beneath the shadow of the cowl, her eyes burned like pale red 
candle flames. “Not I.”
“Liar.” Davos was certain now.
Melisandre laughed again. “You are lost in darkness and confusion, Ser 
Davos.”
“And a good thing.” Davos gestured at the distant lights flickering along the 
walls of Storm’s End. “Feel how cold the wind is? The guards will huddle close 
to those torches. A little warmth, a little light, they’re a comfort on a night 
like this.

Yet that will blind them, so they will not see us pass.” I hope. 
“The god of darkness protects us now, my lady. Even you.”
The flames of her eyes seemed to burn a little brighter at that. “Speak not 
that name, ser. Lest you draw his black eye upon us. He protects no man, I 
promise you. He is the enemy of all that lives. It is the torches that hide us, 
you have said so yourself. Fire. The bright gift of the Lord of 
Light.”
“Have it your way.”
“His way, rather.”
The wind was shifting, Davos could feel it, see it in the way the black canvas 
rippled. He reached for the halyards. “Help me bring in the sail. I’ll row us 
the rest of the way.”
Together they tied off the sail as the boat rocked beneath them. As Davos 
unshipped the oars and slid them into the choppy black water, he said, “Who 
rowed you to Renly?”
“There was no need,” she said. “He was unprotected. But 
here . . . this Storm’s End is an old place. There are spells 
woven into the stones. Dark walls that no shadow can pass—ancient, 
forgotten, yet still in place.”
“Shadow?” Davos felt his flesh prickling. “A shadow is a thing of 
darkness.”
“You are more ignorant than a child, ser knight. There are no shadows in the 
dark. Shadows are the
servants of light, the children of fire. The brightest 
flame casts the darkest shadows.”
Frowning, Davos hushed her then. They were coming close to shore once more, and 
voices carried across the water. He rowed,

the faint sound of his oars lost in the rhythm of the waves. The seaward side 
of Storm’s End perched upon a pale white cliff, the chalky stone sloping up 
steeply to half again the height of the massive curtain wall. A mouth yawned in 
the cliff, and it was that Davos steered for, as he had sixteen years before. 
The tunnel opened on a cavern under the castle, where the storm lords of old 
had built their landing.
The passage was navigable only during high tide, and was never less than 
treacherous, but his smuggler’s skills had not deserted him. Davos threaded 
their way deftly between the jagged rocks until the cave mouth loomed up before 
them. He let the waves carry them inside. They crashed around him, slamming the 
boat this way and that and soaking them to the skin. A half-seen finger of rock 
came rushing up out of the gloom, snarling foam, and Davos barely kept them off 
it with an oar.
Then they were past, engulfed in darkness, and the waters smoothed. The little 
boat slowed and swirled. The sound of their breathing echoed until it seemed to 
surround them. Davos had not expected the blackness. The last time, torches had 
burned all along the tunnel, and the eyes of starving men had peered down 
through the murder holes in the ceiling. The portcullis was somewhere ahead, he 
knew. Davos used the oars to slow them, and they drifted against it almost 
gently.
“This is as far as we go, unless you have a man inside to lift the gate for 
us.” His whispers scurried across the lapping water like a line of mice on 
soft pink feet.“Have we passed within the walls?”
“Yes. Beneath. But we can go no farther. The portcullis goes all the way to 
the bottom. And the bars are too closely spaced for even a child to squeeze 
through.”
There was no answer but a soft rustling. And then a light bloomed amidst the 
darkness.
Davos raised a hand to shield his eyes, and his breath caught in his throat. 
Melisandre had thrown back her cowl and shrugged out of the smothering robe. 
Beneath, she was naked, and huge with child. Swollen breasts hung heavy against 
her chest, and her belly bulged as if near to bursting. “Gods preserve 
us,” he whispered, and heard her answering laugh, deep and throaty. Her 
eyes were hot coals, and the sweat that dappled her skin seemed to glow with a 
light of its own. Melisandre shone.
Panting, she squatted and spread her legs. Blood ran down her thighs, black as 
ink. Her cry might have been agony or ecstasy or both. And Davos saw the crown 
of the child’s head push its way out of her. Two arms wriggled free, grasping, 
black fingers coiling around Melisandre’s straining thighs, pushing, until the 
whole of the shadow slid out into the world and rose taller than Davos, tall as 
the tunnel, towering above the boat. He had only an instant to look at it 
before it was gone, twisting between the bars of the portcullis and racing 
across the surface of the water, but that instant was long enough.
He knew that shadow. As he knew the man who’d cast it.

Blackwater Bay was rough and choppy, whitecaps everywhere. Black 
Betha rode the flood tide, her sail cracking and snapping at each shift of 
wind. Wraith and Lady Marya sailed beside her, no more than 
twenty yards between their hulls. His sons could keep a line. Davos took pride 
in that.Across the sea warhorns boomed, deep throaty moans like the calls of 
monstrous serpents, repeated ship to ship. “Bring down the sail,” Davos 
commanded. “Lower mast. Oarsmen to your oars.” His son Matthos relayed the 
commands. The deck of Black Betha churned as crewmen ran to their 
tasks, pushing through the soldiers who always seemed to be in the way no 
matter where they stood. Ser Imry had decreed that they would enter the river 
on oars alone, so as not to expose their sails to the scorpions and spitfires 
on the walls of King’s Landing.
Davos could make out Fury well to the southeast, her sails shimmering 
golden as they came down, the crowned stag of Baratheon blazoned on the canvas. 
From her decks Stannis Baratheon had commanded the assault on Dragonstone 
sixteen years before, but this time he had chosen to ride with his army, 
trusting Fury and the command of his fleet to his wife’s brother Ser 
Imry, who’d come over to his cause at Storm’s End with Lord Alester and all the 
other Florents.Davos knew Fury as well as he knew his own ships. Above her 
three hundred oars was a deck given over wholly to scorpions, and topside she 
mounted catapults fore and aft, large enough to fling barrels of burning pitch. 
A most formidable ship, and very swift as well, although Ser Imry had packed 
her bow to stern with armored knights and men-at-arms, at some cost to her 
speed.
The warhorns sounded again, commands drifting back from the Fury. 
Davos felt a tingle in his missing fingertips. “Out oars,” he shouted. “Form 
line.” A hundred blades dipped down into the water as the oarmaster’s drum 
began to boom. The sound was like the beating of a great slow heart, and the 
oars moved at every stroke, a hundred men pulling as one.
Wooden wings had sprouted from the Wraith and Lady Marya as 
well. The three galleys kept pace, their blades churning the water. “Slow 
cruise,” Davos called. Lord Velaryon’s silver-hulled Pride of 
Driftmark had moved into her position to port of Wraith, and 
Bold Laughter was coming up fast, but Harridan was only now 
getting her oars into the water and Seahorse was still struggling to 
bring down her mast. Davos looked astern. Yes, there, far to the south, that 
could only be Swordfish, lagging as ever. She dipped two hundred oars 
and mounted the largest ram in the fleet, though Davos had grave doubts about 
her captain.
He could hear soldiers shouting encouragement to each other across the water. 
They’d been little more than ballast since Storm’s End, and were eager to get 
at the foe, confident of victory. In that, they were of one mind with their 
admiral, Lord

High Captain Ser Imry Florent.
Three days past, he had summoned all his captains to a war council aboard the 
Fury while the fleet lay anchored at the mouth of the Wendwater, in 
order to acquaint them with his dispositions. Davos and his sons had been 
assigned a place in the second line of battle, well out on the dangerous 
starboard wing. “A place of honor,” Allard had declared, well satisfied with 
the chance to prove his valor. “A place of peril,” his father had pointed 
out. His sons had given him pitying looks, even young Maric. The Onion 
Knight has become an old woman, he could hear them thinking, still a 
smuggler at heart.
Well, the last was true enough, he would make no apologies for it. 
Seaworth had a lordly ring to it, but down deep he was still Davos of 
Flea Bottom, coming home to his city on its three high hills. He knew as much 
of ships and sails and shores as any man in the Seven Kingdoms, and had fought 
his share of desperate fights sword to sword on a wet deck. But to this sort of 
battle he came a maiden, nervous and afraid. Smugglers do not sound warhorns 
and raise banners. When they smell danger, they raise sail and run before the 
wind.
Had he been admiral, he might have done it all differently. For a start, he 
would have sent a few of his swiftest ships to probe upriver and see what 
awaited them, instead of smashing in headlong. When he had suggested as much to 
Ser Imry, the Lord High Captain had thanked him courteously, but his eyes were 
not as polite. Who is this lowborn craven? those eyes asked. Is 
he the

one who bought his knighthood with an onion?
With four times as many ships as the boy king, Ser Imry saw no need for caution 
or deceptive tactics. He had organized the fleet into ten lines of battle, each 
of twenty ships. The first two lines would sweep up the river to engage and 
destroy Joffrey’s little fleet, or “the boy’s toys” as Ser Imry dubbed them, 
to the mirth of his lordly captains. Those that followed would land companies 
of archers and spearmen beneath the city walls, and only then join the fight on 
the river. The smaller, slower ships to the rear would ferry over the main part 
of Stannis’s host from the south bank, protected by Salladhor Saan and his 
Lyseni, who would stand out in the bay in case the Lannisters had other ships 
hidden up along the coast, poised to sweep down on their rear.
To be fair, there was reason for Ser Imry’s haste. The winds had not used them 
kindly on the voyage up from Storm’s End. They had lost two cogs to the rocks 
of Shipbreaker Bay on the very day they set sail, a poor way to begin. One of 
the Myrish galleys had foundered in the Straits of Tarth, and a storm had 
overtaken them as they were entering the Gullet, scattering the fleet across 
half the narrow sea. All but twelve ships had finally regrouped behind the 
sheltering spine of Massey’s Hook, in the calmer waters of Blackwater Bay, but 
not before they had lost considerable time.
Stannis would have reached the Rush days ago. The kingsroad ran from Storm’s 
End straight to King’s Landing, a much shorter route than by sea, and his host 
was largely mounted; near twenty thousand knights, light horse, and freeriders, 
Renly’s unwilling

legacy to his brother. They would have made good time, but armored destriers 
and twelve-foot lances would avail them little against the deep waters of the 
Blackwater Rush and the high stone walls of the city. Stannis would be camped 
with his lords on the south bank of the river, doubtless seething with 
impatience and wondering what Ser Imry had done with his fleet.
Off Merling Rock two days before, they had sighted a half-dozen fishing skiffs. 
The fisherfolk had fled before them, but one by one they had been overtaken and 
boarded. “A small spoon of victory is just the thing to settle the stomach 
before battle,” Ser Imry had declared happily. “It makes the men hungry for a 
larger helping.” But Davos had been more interested in what the captives had 
to say about the defenses at King’s Landing. The dwarf had been busy building 
some sort of boom to close off the mouth of the river, though the fishermen 
differed as to whether the work had been completed or not. He found himself 
wishing it had. If the river was closed to them, Ser Imry would have no choice 
but to pause and take stock.
The sea was full of sound: shouts and calls, warhorns and drums and the trill 
of pipes, the slap of wood on water as thousands of oars rose and fell. 
“Keep line,” Davos shouted. A gust of wind tugged at his old green 
cloak. A jerkin of boiled leather and a pothelm at his feet were his only 
armor. At sea, heavy steel was as like to cost a man his life as to save it, he 
believed. Ser Imry and the other highborn captains did not share his view; they 
glittered as they paced their decks.Harridan and Seahorse had slipped into their places 
now, and Lord Celtigar’s Red Claw beyond them. To starboard of 
Allard’s Lady Marya were the three galleys that Stannis had seized 
from the unfortunate Lord Sunglass, Piety, Prayer, and 
Devotion, their decks crawling with archers. Even Swordfish 
was closing, lumbering and rolling through a thickening sea under both oars and 
sail. A ship of that many oars ought to be much faster, Davos 
reflected with disapproval. It’s that ram she carries, it’s too big, she 
has no balance.
The wind was gusting from the south, but under oars it made no matter. They 
would be sweeping in on the flood tide, but the Lannisters would have the river 
current to their favor, and the Blackwater Rush flowed strong and swift where 
it met the sea. The first shock would inevitably favor the foe. We are 
fools to meet them on the Blackwater, Davos thought. In any encounter on 
the open sea, their battle lines would envelop the enemy fleet on both flanks, 
driving them inward to destruction. On the river, though, the numbers and 
weight of Ser Imry’s ships would count for less. They could not dress more than 
twenty ships abreast, lest they risk tangling their oars and colliding with 
each other.
Beyond the line of warships, Davos could see the Red Keep up on Aegon’s High 
Hill, dark against a lemon sky, with the mouth of the Rush opening out below. 
Across the river the south shore was black with men and horses, stirring like 
angry ants as they caught sight of the approaching ships. Stannis would have 
kept them busy building rafts and fletching arrows, yet even so the waiting 
would

have been a hard thing to bear. Trumpets sounded from among them, tiny and 
brazen, soon swallowed by the roar of a thousand shouts. Davos closed his 
stubby hand around the pouch that held his fingerbones, and mouthed a silent 
prayer for luck.
Fury herself would center the first line of battle, flanked by the 
Lord Steffon and the Stag of the Sea, each of two hundred 
oars. On the port and starboard wings were the hundreds: Lady Harra, 
Brightfish, Laughing Lord, Sea Demon, Horned Honor, Ragged Jenna,
Trident 
Three, Swift Sword, Princess Rhaenys, Dog’s Nose, Sceptre, Faithful, Red Raven, 
Queen Alysanne, Cat, Courageous, and Dragonsbane. From every 
stern streamed the fiery heart of the Lord of Light, red and yellow and orange. 
Behind Davos and his sons came another line of hundreds commanded by knights 
and lordly captains, and then the smaller, slower Myrish contingent, none 
dipping more than eighty oars. Farther back would come the sailed ships, 
carracks and lumbering great cogs, and last of all Salladhor Saan in his proud 
Valyrian, a towering three-hundred, paced by the rest of his galleys 
with their distinctive striped hulls. The flamboyant Lyseni princeling had not 
been pleased to be assigned the rear guard, but it was clear that Ser Imry 
trusted him no more than Stannis did. Too many complaints, and too much 
talk of the gold he was owed. Davos was sorry nonetheless. Salladhor Saan 
was a resourceful old pirate, and his crews were born seamen, fearless in a 
fight. They were wasted in the rear.
Ahooooooooooooooooooooooooo. The call rolled across whitecaps and 
churning oars from the forecastle of the Fury: Ser Imry was sounding the attack. Ahoooooooooooooooooooo,
ahooooooooooooooooooooo. 
Swordfish had joined the line at last, though she still had her sail 
raised. “Fast cruise,” Davos barked. The drum began to beat more quickly, and 
the stroke picked up, the blades of the oars cutting water, splash-swoosh, 
splash-swoosh, splash-swoosh. On deck, soldiers banged sword against 
shield, while archers quietly strung their bows and pulled the first arrow from 
the quivers at their belts. The galleys of the first line of battle obscured 
his vision, so Davos paced the deck searching for a better view. He saw no sign 
of any boom; the mouth of the river was open, as if to swallow them all. 
Except . . .
In his smuggling days, Davos had often jested that he knew the waterfront at 
King’s Landing a deal better than the back of his hand, since he had not spent 
a good part of his life sneaking in and out of the back of his hand. The squat 
towers of raw new stone that stood opposite one another at the mouth of the 
Blackwater might mean nothing to Ser Imry Florent, but to him it was as if two 
extra fingers had sprouted from his knuckles.
Shading his eyes against the westering sun, he peered at those towers more 
closely. They were too small to hold much of a garrison. The one on the north 
bank was built against the bluff with the Red Keep frowning above; its 
counterpart on the south shore had its footing in the water. They dug a 
cut through the bank, he knew at once. That would make the tower very 
difficult to assault; attackers would need to wade through the water or

bridge the little channel. Stannis had posted bowmen below, to fire up at the 
defenders whenever one was rash enough to lift his head above the ramparts, but 
otherwise had not troubled.
Something flashed down low where the dark water swirled around the base of the 
tower. It was sunlight on steel, and it told Davos Seaworth all he needed to 
know. A chain boom . . . and yet they have not closed the 
river against us. Why?
He could make a guess at that as well, but there was no time to consider the 
question. A shout went up from the ships ahead, and the warhorns blew again: 
the enemy was before them.
Between the flashing oars of Sceptre and Faithful, Davos 
saw a thin line of galleys drawn across the river, the sun glinting off the 
gold paint that marked their hulls. He knew those ships as well as he knew his 
own. When he had been a smuggler, he’d always felt safer knowing whether the 
sail on the horizon marked a fast ship or a slow one, and whether her captain 
was a young man hungry for glory or an old one serving out his days.
Ahooooooooooooooooooooooooooo, the warhorns called. “Battle speed,” 
Davos shouted. On port and starboard he heard Dale and Allard giving the same 
command. Drums began to beat furiously, oars rose and fell, and Black 
Betha surged forward. When he glanced toward Wraith, Dale gave 
him a salute. Swordfish was lagging once more, wallowing in the wake 
of the smaller ships to either side; elsewise the line was straight as a shield 
wall.
The river that had seemed so narrow from a distance now stretched wide as a 
sea, but the city had grown gigantic as well.

Glowering down from Aegon’s High Hill, the Red Keep commanded the approaches. 
Its iron-crowned battlements, massive towers, and thick red walls gave it the 
aspect of a ferocious beast hunched above river and streets. The bluffs on 
which it crouched were steep and rocky, spotted with lichen and gnarled thorny 
trees. The fleet would have to pass below the castle to reach the harbor and 
city beyond.
The first line was in the river now, but the enemy galleys were backing water. 
They mean to draw us in. They want us jammed close, constricted, no way to 
sweep around their flanks . . . and with that boom behind 
us. He paced his deck, craning his neck for a better look at Joffrey’s 
fleet. The boy’s toys included the ponderous Godsgrace, he saw, the 
old slow Prince Aemon, the Lady of Silk and her sister 
Lady’s Shame, Wildwind, Kingslander, White Hart, Lance, Seaflower. 
But where was the Lionstar? Where was the beautiful Lady 
Lyanna that King Robert had named in honor of the maid he’d loved and 
lost? And where was King Robert’s Hammer? She was the largest war 
galley in the royal fleet, four hundred oars, the only warship the boy king 
owned capable of overmatching Fury. By rights she should have formed 
the heart of any defense.
Davos tasted a trap, yet he saw no sign of any foes sweeping in behind them, 
only the great fleet of Stannis Baratheon in their ordered ranks, stretching 
back to the watery horizon. Will they raise the chain and cut us in 
two? He could not see what good that would serve. The ships left out in 
the bay could still land men north of the city; a slower crossing, but 
safer.A flight of flickering orange birds took wing from the castle, twenty or 
thirty of them; pots of burning pitch, arcing out over the river trailing 
threads of flame. The waters ate most, but a few found the decks of galleys in 
the first line of battle, spreading flame when they shattered. Men-at-arms were 
scrambling on Queen Alysanne’s deck, and he could see smoke rising 
from three different spots on Dragonsbane, nearest the bank. By then 
a second flight was on its way, and arrows were falling as well, hissing down 
from the archers’ nests that studded the towers above. A soldier tumbled over 
Cat’s gunwale, crashed off the oars, and sank. The first man to 
die today, Davos thought, but he will not be the last.
Atop the Red Keep’s battlements streamed the boy king’s banners: the crowned 
stag of Baratheon on its gold field, the lion of Lannister on crimson. More 
pots of pitch came flying. Davos heard men shriek as fire spread across 
Courageous. Her oarsmen were safe below, protected from missiles by 
the half deck that sheltered them, but the men-at-arms crowded topside were not 
so fortunate. The starboard wing was taking all the damage, as he had feared. 
It will be our turn soon, he reminded himself, uneasy. Black 
Betha was well in range of the firepots, being the sixth ship out from the 
north bank. To starboard, she had only Allard’s Lady Marya, the 
ungainly Swordfish—so far behind now that she was nearer the 
third line than the second—and Piety, Prayer, and 
Devotion, who would need all the godly intervention they could get, 
placed as vulnerably as they were.As the second line swept past the twin towers, Davos took a closer look. 
He could see three links of a huge chain snaking out from a hole no bigger than 
a man’s head and disappearing under the water. The towers had a single door, 
set a good twenty feet off the ground. Bowmen on the roof of the northern tower 
were firing down at Prayer and Devotion. The archers on 
Devotion fired back, and Davos heard a man scream as the arrows found 
him.
“Captain ser.” His son Matthos was at his elbow. “Your helm.” Davos took it 
with both hands and slid it over his head. The pothelm was visorless; he hated 
having his vision impeded.
By then the pitch pots were raining down around them. He saw one shatter on the 
deck of Lady Marya, but Allard’s crew quickly beat it out. To port, 
warhorns sounded from the Pride of Driftmark. The oars flung up 
sprays of water with every stroke. The yard-long shaft of a scorpion came down 
not two feet from Matthos and sank into the wood of the deck, thrumming. Ahead, 
the first line was within bowshot of the enemy; flights of arrows flew between 
the ships, hissing like striking snakes.
South of the Blackwater, Davos saw men dragging crude rafts toward the water 
while ranks and columns formed up beneath a thousand streaming banners. The 
fiery heart was everywhere, though the tiny black stag imprisoned in the flames 
was too small to make out. We should be flying the crowned stag, he 
thought. The stag was King Robert’s sigil, the city would rejoice to see 
it. This stranger’s standard serves only to set men against us.
He could not behold the fiery heart without thinking of the

shadow Melisandre had birthed in the gloom beneath Storm’s End. At least 
we fight this battle in the light, with the weapons of honest men, he told 
himself. The red woman and her dark children would have no part of it. Stannis 
had shipped her back to Dragonstone with his bastard nephew Edric Storm. His 
captains and bannermen had insisted that a battlefield was no place for a 
woman. Only the queen’s men had dissented, and then not loudly. All the same, 
the king had been on the point of refusing them until Lord Bryce Caron said, 
“Your Grace, if the sorceress is with us, afterward men will say it was her 
victory, not yours. They will say you owe your crown to her spells.” That had 
turned the tide. Davos himself had held his tongue during the arguments, but if 
truth be told, he had not been sad to see the back of her. He wanted no part of 
Melisandre or her god.
To starboard, Devotion drove toward shore, sliding out a plank. 
Archers scrambled into the shallows, holding their bows high over their heads 
to keep the strings dry. They splashed ashore on the narrow strand beneath the 
bluffs. Rocks came bouncing down from the castle to crash among them, and 
arrows and spears as well, but the angle was steep and the missiles seemed to 
do little damage.
Prayer landed two dozen yards upstream and Piety was 
slanting toward the bank when the defenders came pounding down the riverside, 
the hooves of their warhorses sending up gouts of water from the shallows. The 
knights fell among the archers like wolves among chickens, driving them back 
toward the ships and into the

river before most could notch an arrow. Men-at-arms rushed to defend them with 
spear and axe, and in three heartbeats the scene had turned to blood-soaked 
chaos. Davos recognized the dog’s-head helm of the Hound. A white cloak 
streamed from his shoulders as he rode his horse up the plank onto the deck of 
Prayer, hacking down anyone who blundered within reach.
Beyond the castle, King’s Landing rose on its hills behind the encircling 
walls. The riverfront was a blackened desolation; the Lannisters had burned 
everything and pulled back within the Mud Gate. The charred spars of sunken 
hulks sat in the shallows, forbidding access to the long stone quays. We 
shall have no landing there. He could see the tops of three huge 
trebuchets behind the Mud Gate. High on Visenya’s Hill, sunlight blazed off the 
seven crystal towers of the Great Sept of Baelor.
Davos never saw the battle joined, but he heard it; a great rending crash as 
two galleys came together. He could not say which two. Another impact echoed 
over the water an instant later, and then a third. Beneath the screech of 
splintering wood, he heard the deep thrum-thump of the 
Fury’s fore catapult. Stag of the Sea split one of 
Joffrey’s galleys clean in two, but Dog’s Nose was afire and 
Queen Alysanne was locked between Lady of Silk and 
Lady’s Shame, her crew fighting the boarders rail-to-rail.
Directly ahead, Davos saw the enemy’s Kingslander drive between 
Faithful and Sceptre. The former slid her starboard oars 
out of the way before impact, but Sceptre’s portside oars snapped 
like so much kindling as Kingslander raked along her side.

“Loose,” Davos commanded, and his bowmen sent a withering rain of shafts 
across the water. He saw Kingslander’s captain fall, and tried to 
recall the man’s name.
Ashore, the arms of the great trebuchets rose one, two, three, and a hundred 
stones climbed high into the yellow sky. Each one was as large as a man’s head; 
when they fell they sent up great gouts of water, smashed through oak planking, 
and turned living men into bone and pulp and gristle. All across the river the 
first line was engaged. Grappling hooks were flung out, iron rams crashed 
through wooden hulls, boarders swarmed, flights of arrows whispered through 
each other in the drifting smoke, and men died . . . but so 
far, none of his.
Black Betha swept upriver, the sound of her oarmaster’s drum 
thundering in her captain’s head as he looked for a likely victim for her ram. 
The beleaguered Queen Alysanne was trapped between two Lannister 
warships, the three made fast by hooks and lines.
“Ramming speed!” Davos shouted.
The drumbeats blurred into a long fevered hammering, and Black Betha 
flew, the water turning white as milk as it parted for her prow. Allard had 
seen the same chance; Lady Marya ran beside them. The first line had 
been transformed into a confusion of separate struggles. The three tangled 
ships loomed ahead, turning, their decks a red chaos as men hacked at each 
other with sword and axe. A little more, Davos Seaworth beseeched the 
Warrior, bring her around a little more, show me her 
broadside.
The Warrior must have been listening. Black Betha and Lady

Marya slammed into the side of Lady’s Shame within an instant of 
each other, ramming her fore and aft with such force that men were thrown off 
the deck of Lady of Silk three boats away. Davos almost bit his 
tongue off when his teeth jarred together. He spat out blood. Next time 
close your mouth, you fool. Forty years at sea, and yet this was the first 
time he’d rammed another ship. His archers were loosing arrows at 
will.
“Back water,” he commanded. When Black Betha reversed her oars, the 
river rushed into the splintered hole she left, and Lady’s Shame fell 
to pieces before his eyes, spilling dozens of men into the river. Some of the 
living swam; some of the dead floated; the ones in heavy mail and plate sank to 
the bottom, the quick and the dead alike. The pleas of drowning men echoed in 
his ears.
A flash of green caught his eye, ahead and off to port, and a nest of writhing 
emerald serpents rose burning and hissing from the stern of Queen 
Alysanne. An instant later Davos heard the dread cry of 
“Wildfire!”
He grimaced. Burning pitch was one thing, wildfire quite another. Evil stuff, 
and well-nigh unquenchable. Smother it under a cloak and the cloak took fire; 
slap at a fleck of it with your palm and your hand was aflame. “Piss on 
wildfire and your cock burns off,” old seamen liked to say. Still, Ser Imry 
had warned them to expect a taste of the alchemists’ vile substance. 
Fortunately, there were few true pyromancers left. They will soon run 
out, Ser Imry had assured them.Davos reeled off commands; one bank of oars pushed off while the other 
backed water, and the galley came about. Lady Marya had won clear 
too, and a good thing; the fire was spreading over Queen Alysanne and 
her foes faster than he would have believed possible. Men wreathed in green 
flame leapt into the water, shrieking like nothing human. On the walls of 
King’s Landing, spitfires were belching death, and the great trebuchets behind 
the Mud Gate were throwing boulders. One the size of an ox crashed down between 
Black Betha and Wraith, rocking both ships and soaking 
every man on deck. Another, not much smaller, found Bold Laughter. 
The Velaryon galley exploded like a child’s toy dropped from a tower, spraying 
splinters as long as a man’s arm.
Through black smoke and swirling green fire, Davos glimpsed a swarm of small 
boats bearing downriver: a confusion of ferries and wherries, barges, skiffs, 
rowboats, and hulks that looked too rotten to float. It stank of desperation; 
such driftwood could not turn the tide of a fight, only get in the way. The 
lines of battle were hopelessly ensnarled, he saw. Off to port, Lord 
Steffon, Ragged Jenna, and Swift Sword had broken through and 
were sweeping upriver. The starboard wing was heavily engaged, however, and the 
center had shattered under the stones of those trebuchets, some captains 
turning downstream, others veering to port, anything to escape that crushing 
rain. Fury had swung her aft catapult to fire back at the city, but 
she lacked the range; the barrels of pitch were shattering under the walls. 
Sceptre had lost most of her oars, and Faithful had been 
rammed and was

starting to list. He took Black Betha between them, and struck a 
glancing blow at Queen Cersei’s ornate carved-and-gilded pleasure barge, laden 
with soldiers instead of sweetmeats now. The collision spilled a dozen of them 
into the river, where Betha’s archers picked them off as they tried 
to stay afloat.
Matthos’s shout alerted him to the danger from port; one of the Lannister 
galleys was coming about to ram. “Hard to starboard,” Davos shouted. His men 
used their oars to push free of the barge, while others turned the galley so 
her prow faced the onrushing White Hart. For a moment he feared he’d 
been too slow, that he was about to be sunk, but the current helped swing 
Black Betha, and when the impact came it was only a glancing blow, 
the two hulls scraping against each other, both ships snapping oars. A jagged 
piece of wood flew past his head, sharp as any spear. Davos flinched. “Board 
her!” he shouted. Grappling lines were flung. He drew his sword and led them 
over the rail himself.
The crew of the White Hart met them at the rail, but Black 
Betha’s men-at-arms swept over them in a screaming steel tide. Davos 
fought through the press, looking for the other captain, but the man was dead 
before he reached him. As he stood over the body, someone caught him from 
behind with an axe, but his helm turned the blow, and his skull was left 
ringing when it might have been split. Dazed, it was all he could do to roll. 
His attacker charged screaming. Davos grasped his sword in both hands and drove 
it up point first into the man’s belly.
One of his crewmen pulled him back to his feet. “Captain

ser, the Hart is ours.” It was true, Davos saw. Most of the enemy 
were dead, dying, or yielded. He took off his helm, wiped blood from his face, 
and made his way back to his own ship, trodding carefully on boards slimy with 
men’s guts. Matthos lent him a hand to help him back over the rail.
For those few instants, Black Betha and White Hart were the 
calm eye in the midst of the storm. Queen Alysanne and Lady of 
Silk, still locked together, were a ranging green inferno, drifting 
downriver and dragging pieces of Lady’s Shame. One of the Myrish 
galleys had slammed into them and was now afire as well. Cat was 
taking on men from the fast-sinking Courageous. The captain of 
Dragonsbane had driven her between two quays, ripping out her bottom; 
her crew poured ashore with the archers and men-at-arms to join the assault on 
the walls. Red Raven, rammed, was slowly listing. Stag of the 
Sea was fighting fires and boarders both, but the fiery heart had been 
raised over Joffrey’s Loyal Man. Fury, her proud bow smashed in by a 
boulder, was engaged with Godsgrace. He saw Lord Velaryon’s 
Pride of Driftmark crash between two Lannister river runners, 
overturning one and lighting the other up with fire arrows. On the south bank, 
knights were leading their mounts aboard the cogs, and some of the smaller 
galleys were already making their way across, laden with men-at-arms. They had 
to thread cautiously between sinking ships and patches of drifting wildfire. 
The whole of King Stannis’s fleet was in the river now, save for Salladhor 
Saan’s Lyseni. Soon enough they would control the Blackwater. Ser Imry 
will

have his victory, Davos thought, and Stannis will bring his host 
across, but gods be good, the cost of this . . .
“Captain ser!” Matthos touched his shoulder.
It was Swordfish, her two banks of oars lifting and falling. She had 
never brought down her sails, and some burning pitch had caught in her rigging. 
The flames spread as Davos watched, creeping out over ropes and sails until she 
trailed a head of yellow flame. Her ungainly iron ram, fashioned after the 
likeness of the fish from which she took her name, parted the surface of the 
river before her. Directly ahead, drifting toward her and swinging around to 
present a tempting plump target, was one of the Lannister hulks, floating low 
in the water. Slow green blood was leaking out between her boards.
When he saw that, Davos Seaworth’s heart stopped beating.
“No,” he said. “No, NOOOOOO!” Above the roar and crash of battle, 
no one heard him but Matthos. Certainly the captain of the Swordfish 
did not, intent as he was on finally spearing something with his ungainly fat 
sword. The Swordfish went to battle speed. Davos lifted his maimed 
hand to clutch at the leather pouch that held his fingerbones.
With a grinding, splintering, tearing crash, Swordfish split the 
rotted hulk asunder. She burst like an overripe fruit, but no fruit had ever 
screamed that shattering wooden scream. From inside her Davos saw green gushing 
from a thousand broken jars, poison from the entrails of a dying beast, 
glistening, shining, spreading across the surface of the 
river . . .“Back water,” he roared. “Away. Get us off her, back water, back 
water!” The grappling lines were cut, and Davos felt the deck move under his 
feet as Black Betha pushed free of White Hart. Her oars 
slid down into the water.
Then he heard a short sharp woof, as if someone had blown in his ear. 
Half a heartbeat later came the roar. The deck vanished beneath him, and black 
water smashed him across the face, filling his nose and mouth. He was choking, 
drowning. Unsure which way was up, Davos wrestled the river in blind panic 
until suddenly he broke the surface. He spat out water, sucked in air, grabbed 
hold of the nearest chunk of debris, and held on.
Swordfish and the hulk were gone, blackened bodies were floating 
downstream beside him, and choking men clinging to bits of smoking wood. Fifty 
feet high, a swirling demon of green flame danced upon the river. It had a 
dozen hands, in each a whip, and whatever they touched burst into fire. He saw 
Black Betha burning, and White Hart and Loyal Man 
to either side. Piety, Cat, Courageous, Sceptre, Red Raven, Harridan, 
Faithful, Fury, they had all gone up, Kingslander and 
Godsgrace as well, the demon was eating his own. Lord Velaryon’s 
shining Pride of Driftmark was trying to turn, but the demon ran a 
lazy green finger across her silvery oars and they flared up like so many 
tapers. For an instant she seemed to be stroking the river with two banks of 
long bright torches.
The current had him in its teeth by then, spinning him around and around. He 
kicked to avoid a floating patch of

wildfire. My sons, Davos thought, but there was no way to look for 
them amidst the roaring chaos. Another hulk heavy with wildfire went up behind 
him. The Blackwater itself seemed to boil in its bed, and burning spars and 
burning men and pieces of broken ships filled the air.
I’m being swept out into the bay. It wouldn’t be as bad there; he 
ought to be able to make shore, he was a strong swimmer. Salladhor Saan’s 
galleys would be out in the bay as well, Ser Imry had commanded them to stand 
off . . .
And then the current turned him about again, and Davos saw what awaited him 
downstream.
The chain. Gods save us, they’ve raised the chain.
Where the river broadened out into Blackwater Bay, the boom stretched taut, a 
bare two or three feet above the water. Already a dozen galleys had crashed 
into it, and the current was pushing others against them. Almost all were 
aflame, and the rest soon would be. Davos could make out the striped hulls of 
Salladhor Saan’s ships beyond, but he knew he would never reach them. A wall of 
red-hot steel, blazing wood, and swirling green flame stretched before him. The 
mouth of the Blackwater Rush had turned into the mouth of hell.

He watched the sail grow for a long time, trying to decide whether he would sooner live or die.
Dying would be easier, he knew. All he had to do was crawl inside his cave and let the ship pass by, and death would find him. For days now the fever had been burning through him, turning his bowels to brown water and making him shiver in his restless sleep. Each morning found him weaker. It will not be much longer, he had taken to telling himself.
If the fever did not kill him, thirst surely would. He had no fresh water here, but for the occasional rainfall that pooled in hollows on the rock. Only three days past (or had it been four? On his rock, it was hard to tell the days apart) his pools had been dry as old bone, and the sight of the bay rippling green and grey all around him had been almost more than he could bear. Once he began to drink seawater the end would come swiftly, he knew, but all the same he had almost taken that first swallow, so parched was his throat. A sudden squall had saved him. He had grown so feeble by then that it was all he could do to lie in the rain with his eyes closed and his mouth open, and let the water splash down on his cracked lips and swollen tongue. But afterward he felt a little stronger, and the island’s pools and cracks and crevices once more had brimmed with life.
But that had been three days ago (or maybe four), and most of the water was gone now. Some had evaporated, and he had sucked up the rest. By the morrow he would be tasting the mud again, and licking the damp cold stones at the bottom of the depressions.
And if not thirst or fever, starvation would kill him. His island was no more than a barren spire jutting up out of the immensity of Blackwater Bay. When the tide was low, he could sometimes find tiny crabs along the stony strand where he had washed ashore after the battle. They nipped his fingers painfully before he smashed them apart on the rocks to suck the meat from their claws and the guts from their shells.
But the strand vanished whenever the tide came rushing in, and Davos had to scramble up the rock to keep from being swept out into the bay once more. The point of the spire was fifteen feet above the water at high tide, but when the bay grew rough the spray went even higher, so there was no way to keep dry, even in his cave (which was really no more than a hollow in the rock beneath an overhang). Nothing grew on the rock but lichen, and even the seabirds shunned the place. Now and again some gulls would land atop the spire and Davos would try to catch one, but they were too quick for him to get close. He took to flinging stones at them, but he was too weak to throw with much force, so even when his stones hit, the gulls would only scream at him in annoyance and then take to the air.
There were other rocks visible from his refuge, distant stony spires taller than his own. The nearest stood a good forty feet above the water, he guessed, though it was hard to be sure at this distance. A cloud of gulls swirled about it constantly, and often Davos thought of crossing over to raid their nests. But the water was cold here, the currents strong and treacherous, and he knew he did not have the strength for such a swim. That would kill him as sure as drinking seawater.
Autumn in the narrow sea could often be wet and rainy, he remembered from years past. The days were not bad so long as the sun was shining, but the nights were growing colder and sometimes the wind would come gusting across the bay, driving a line of whitecaps before it, and before long Davos would be soaked and shivering. Fever and chills assaulted him in turn, and of late he had developed a persistent racking cough.
His cave was all the shelter he had, and that was little enough. Driftwood and bits of charred debris would wash up on the strand during low tide, but he had no way to strike a spark or start a fire. Once, in desperation, he had tried rubbing two pieces of driftwood against each other, but the wood was rotted, and his efforts earned him only blisters. His clothes were sodden as well, and he had lost one of his boots somewhere in the bay before he washed up here.
Thirst; hunger; exposure. They were his companions, with him every hour of every day, and in time he had come to think of them as his friends. Soon enough, one or the other of his friends would take pity on him and free him from this endless misery. Or perhaps he would simply walk into the water one day, and strike out for the shore that he knew lay somewhere to the north, beyond his sight. It was too far to swim, as weak as he was, but that did not matter. Davos had always been a sailor; he was meant to die at sea. The gods beneath the waters have been waiting for me, he told himself. It’s past time I went to them.
But now there was a sail; only a speck on the horizon, but growing larger. A ship where no ship should be. He knew where his rock lay, more or less; it was one of a series of sea monts that rose from the floor of Blackwater Bay. The tallest of them jutted a hundred feet above the tide, and a dozen lesser monts stood thirty to sixty feet high. Sailors called them spears of the merling king, and knew that for every one that broke the surface, a dozen lurked treacherously just below it. Any captain with sense kept his course well away from them.
Davos watched the sail swell through pale red-rimmed eyes, and tried to hear the sound of the wind caught in the canvas. She is coming this way. Unless she changed course soon, she would pass within hailing distance of his meager refuge. It might mean life. If he wanted it. He was not sure he did.
Why should I live? he thought as tears blurred his vision. Gods be good, why? My sons are dead, Dale and Allard, Maric and Matthos, perhaps Devan as well. How can a father outlive so many strong young sons? How would I go on? I am a hollow shell, the crab’s died, there’s nothing left inside. Don’t they know that?
They had sailed up the Blackwater Rush flying the fiery heart of the Lord of Light. Davos and Black Betha had been in the second line of battle, between Dale’s Wraith and Allard on Lady Marya. Maric his third-born was oarmaster on Fury, at the center of the first line, while Matthos served as his father’s second. Beneath the walls of the Red Keep Stannis Baratheon’s galleys had joined in battle with the boy king Joffrey’s smaller fleet, and for a few moments the river had rung to the thrum of bowstrings and the crash of iron rams shattering oars and hulls alike.
And then some vast beast had let out a roar, and green flames were all around them: wildfire, pyromancer’s piss, the jade demon. Matthos had been standing at his elbow on the deck of Black Betha when the ship seemed to lift from the water. Davos found himself in the river, flailing as the current took him and spun him around and around. Upstream, the flames had ripped at the sky, fifty feet high. He had seen Black Betha afire, and Fury, and a dozen other ships, had seen burning men leaping into the water to drown. Wraith and Lady Marya were gone, sunk or shattered or vanished behind a veil of wildfire, and there was no time to look for them, because the mouth of the river was almost upon him, and across the mouth of the river the Lannisters had raised a great iron chain. From bank to bank there was nothing but burning ships and wildfire. The sight of it seemed to stop his heart for a moment, and he could still remember the sound of it, the crackle of flames, the hiss of steam, the shrieks of dying men, and the beat of that terrible heat against his face as the current swept him down toward hell.
All he needed to do was nothing. A few moments more, and he would be with his sons now, resting in the cool green mud on the bottom of the bay, with fish nibbling at his face.
Instead he sucked in a great gulp of air and dove, kicking for the bottom of the river. His only hope was to pass under the chain and the burning ships and the wildfire that floated on the surface of the water, to swim hard for the safety of the bay beyond. Davos had always been a strong swimmer, and he’d worn no steel that day, but for the helm he’d lost when he’d lost Black Betha. As he knifed through the green murk, he saw other men struggling beneath the water, pulled down to drown beneath the weight of plate and mail. Davos swam past them, kicking with all the strength left in his legs, giving himself up to the current, the water filling his eyes. Deeper he went, and deeper, and deeper still. With every stroke it grew harder to hold his breath. He remembered seeing the bottom, soft and dim, as a stream of bubbles burst from his lips. Something touched his leg . . . a snag or a fish or a drowning man, he could not tell.
He needed air by then, but he was afraid. Was he past the chain yet, was he out in the bay? If he came up under a ship he would drown, and if he surfaced amidst the floating patches of wildfire his first breath would sear his lungs to ash. He twisted in the water to look up, but there was nothing to see but green darkness and then he spun too far and suddenly he could no longer tell up from down. Panic took hold of him. His hands flailed against the bottom of the river and sent up a cloud of mud that blinded him. His chest was growing tighter by the instant. He clawed at the water, kicking, pushing himself, turning, his lungs screaming for air, kicking, kicking, lost now in the river murk, kicking, kicking, kicking until he could kick no longer. When he opened his mouth to scream, the water came rushing in, tasting of salt, and Davos Seaworth knew that he was drowning.
The next he knew the sun was up, and he lay upon a stony strand beneath a spire of naked stone, with the empty bay all around and a broken mast, a burned sail, and a swollen corpse beside him. The mast, the sail, and the dead man vanished with the next high tide, leaving Davos alone on his rock amidst the spears of the merling king.
His long years as a smuggler had made the waters around King’s Landing more familiar to him than any home he’d ever had, and he knew his refuge was no more than a speck on the charts, in a place that honest sailors steered away from, not toward . . . though Davos himself had come by it once or twice in his smuggling days, the better to stay unseen. When they find me dead here, if ever they do, perhaps they will name the rock for me, he thought. Onion Rock, they’ll call it; it will be my tombstone and my legacy. He deserved no more. The Father protects his children, the septons taught, but Davos had led his boys into the fire. Dale would never give his wife the child they had prayed for, and Allard, with his girl in Oldtown and his girl in King’s Landing and his girl in Braavos, they would all be weeping soon. Matthos would never captain his own ship, as he’d dreamed. Maric would never have his knighthood.
How can I live when they are dead? So many brave knights and mighty lords have died, better men than me, and highborn. Crawl inside your cave, Davos. Crawl inside and shrink up small and the ship will go away, and no one will trouble you ever again. Sleep on your stone pillow, and let the gulls peck out your eyes while the crabs feast on your flesh. You’ve feasted on enough of them, you owe them. Hide, smuggler. Hide, and be quiet, and die.
The sail was almost on him. A few moments more, and the ship would be safely past, and he could die in peace.
His hand reached for his throat, fumbling for the small leather pouch he always wore about his neck. Inside he kept the bones of the four fingers his king had shortened for him, on the day he made Davos a knight. My luck. His shortened fingers patted at his chest, groping, finding nothing. The pouch was gone, and the fingerbones with them. Stannis could never understand why he’d kept the bones. “To remind me of my king’s justice,” he whispered through cracked lips. But now they were gone. The fire took my luck as well as my sons. In his dreams the river was still aflame and demons danced upon the waters with fiery whips in their hands, while men blackened and burned beneath the lash. “Mother, have mercy,” Davos prayed. “Save me, gentle Mother, save us all. My luck is gone, and my sons.” He was weeping freely now, salt tears streaming down his cheeks. “The fire took it all . . . the fire . . .”
Perhaps it was only wind blowing against the rock, or the sound of the sea on the shore, but for an instant Davos Seaworth heard her answer. “You called the fire,” she whispered, her voice as faint as the sound of waves in a seashell, sad and soft. “You burned us . . . burned us . . . burrrrned usssssss.”
“It was her!” Davos cried. “Mother, don’t forsake us. It was her who burned you, the red woman, Melisandre, her!” He could see her; the heart-shaped face, the red eyes, the long coppery hair, her red gowns moving like flames as she walked, a swirl of silk and satin. She had come from Asshai in the east, she had come to Dragonstone and won Selsye and her queen’s men for her alien god, and then the king, Stannis Baratheon himself. He had gone so far as to put the fiery heart on his banners, the fiery heart of R’hllor, Lord of Light and God of Flame and Shadow. At Melisandre’s urging, he had dragged the Seven from their sept at Dragonstone and burned them before the castle gates, and later he had burned the godswood at Storm’s End as well, even the heart tree, a huge white weirwood with a solemn face.
“It was her work,” Davos said again, more weakly. Her work, and yours, onion knight. You rowed her into Storm’s End in the black of night, so she might loose her shadow child. You are not guiltless, no. You rode beneath her banner and flew it from your mast. You watched the Seven burn at Dragonstone, and did nothing. She gave the Father’s justice to the fire, and the Mother’s mercy, and the wisdom of the Crone. Smith and Stranger, Maid and Warrior, she burnt them all to the glory of her cruel god, and you stood and held your tongue. Even when she killed old Maester Cressen, even then, you did nothing.
The sail was a hundred yards away and moving fast across the bay. In a few more moments it would be past him, and dwindling.
Ser Davos Seaworth began to climb his rock.
He pulled himself up with trembling hands, his head swimming with fever. Twice his maimed fingers slipped on the damp stone and he almost fell, but somehow he managed to cling to his perch. If he fell he was dead, and he had to live. For a little while more, at least. There was something he had to do.
The top of the rock was too small to stand on safely, as weak as he was, so he crouched and waved his fleshless arms. “Ship,” he screamed into the wind. “Ship, here, here!” From up here, he could see her more clearly; the lean striped hull, the bronze figurehead, the billowing sail. There was a name painted on her hull, but Davos had never learned to read. “Ship,” he called again, “help me, HELP ME!”
A crewman on her forecastle saw him and pointed. He watched as other sailors moved to the gunwale to gape at him. A short while later the galley’s sail came down, her oars slid out, and she swept around toward his refuge. She was too big to approach the rock closely, but thirty yards away she launched a small boat. Davos clung to his rock and watched it creep toward him. Four men were rowing, while a fifth sat in the prow. “You,” the fifth man called out when they were only a few feet from his island, “you up on the rock. Who are you?”
A smuggler who rose above himself, thought Davos, a fool who loved his king too much, and forgot his gods. “I . . .” His throat was parched, and he had forgotten how to talk. The words felt strange on his tongue and sounded stranger in his ears. “I was in the battle. I was . . . a captain, a . . . a knight, I was a knight.”
“Aye, ser,” the man said, “and serving which king?”
The galley might be Joffrey’s, he realized suddenly. If he spoke the wrong name now, she would abandon him to his fate. But no, her hull was striped. She was Lysene, she was Salladhor Saan’s. The Mother sent her here, the Mother in her mercy. She had a task for him. Stannis lives, he knew then. I have a king still. And sons, I have other sons, and a wife loyal and loving. How could he have forgotten? The Mother was merciful indeed.
“Stannis,” he shouted back at the Lyseni. “Gods be good, I serve King Stannis.”
“Aye,” said the man in the boat, “and so do we.”

When he came up on deck, the long point of Driftmark was dwindling behind them while Dragonstone rose from the sea ahead. A pale grey wisp of smoke blew from the top of the mountain to mark where the island lay. Dragonmont is restless this morning, Davos thought, or else Melisandre is burning someone else.
Melisandre had been much in his thoughts as Shayala’s Dance made her way across Blackwater Bay and through the Gullet, tacking against perverse contrary winds. The great fire that burned atop the Sharp Point watchtower at the end of Massey’s Hook reminded him of the ruby she wore at her throat, and when the world turned red at dawn and sunset the drifting clouds turned the same color as the silks and satins of her rustling gowns.
She would be waiting on Dragonstone as well, waiting in all her beauty and all her power, with her god and her shadows and his king. The red priestess had always seemed loyal to Stannis, until now. She has broken him, as a man breaks a horse. She would ride him to power if she could, and for that she gave my sons to the fire. I will cut the living heart from her breast and see how it burns. He touched the hilt of the fine long Lysene dirk that the captain had given him.
The captain had been very kind to him. His name was Khorane Sathmantes, a Lyseni like Salladhor Saan, whose ship this was. He had the pale blue eyes you often saw on Lys, set in a bony weatherworn face, but he had spent many years trading in the Seven Kingdoms. When he learned that the man he had plucked from the sea was the celebrated onion knight, he gave him the use of his own cabin and his own clothes, and a pair of new boots that almost fit. He insisted that Davos share his provisions as well, though that turned out badly. His stomach could not tolerate the snails and lampreys and other rich food Captain Khorane so relished, and after his first meal at the captain’s table he spent the rest of the day with one end or the other dangling over the rail.
Dragonstone loomed larger with every stroke of the oars. Davos could see the shape of the mountain now, and on its side the great black citadel with its gargoyles and dragon towers. The bronze figurehead at the bow of Shayala’s Dance sent up wings of salt spray as it cut the waves. He leaned his weight against the rail, grateful for its support. His ordeal had weakened him. If he stood too long his legs shook, and sometimes he fell prey to uncontrollable fits of coughing and brought up gobs of bloody phlegm. It is nothing, he told himself. Surely the gods did not bring me safe through fire and sea only to kill me with a flux.
As he listened to the pounding of the oarmaster’s drum, the thrum of the sail, and the rhythmic swish and creak of the oars, he thought back to his younger days, when these same sounds woke dread in his heart on many a misty morn. They heralded the approach of old Ser Tristimun’s sea watch, and the sea watch was death to smugglers when Aerys Targaryen sat the Iron Throne.
But that was another lifetime, he thought. That was before the onion ship, before Storm’s End, before Stannis shortened my fingers. That was before the war or the red comet, before I was a Seaworth or a knight. I was a different man in those days, before Lord Stannis raised me high.
Captain Khorane had told him of the end of Stannis’s hopes, on the night the river burned. The Lannisters had taken him from the flank, and his fickle bannermen had abandoned him by the hundreds in the hour of his greatest need. “King Renly’s shade was seen as well,” the captain said, “slaying right and left as he led the lion lord’s van. It’s said his green armor took a ghostly glow from the wildfire, and his antlers ran with golden flames.”
Renly’s shade. Davos wondered if his sons would return as shades as well. He had seen too many queer things on the sea to say that ghosts did not exist. “Did none keep faith?” he asked.
“Some few,” the captain said. “The queen’s kin, them in chief. We took off many who wore the fox-and-flowers, though many more were left ashore, with all manner of badges. Lord Florent is the King’s Hand on Dragonstone now.”
The mountain grew taller, crowned all in pale smoke. The sail sang, the drum beat, the oars pulled smoothly, and before very long the mouth of the harbor opened before them. So empty, Davos thought, remembering how it had been before, with the ships crowding every quay and rocking at anchor off the breakwater. He could see Salladhor Saan’s flagship Valyrian moored at the quay where Fury and her sisters had once tied up. The ships on either side of her had striped Lysene hulls as well. In vain he looked for any sign of Lady Marya or Wraith.
They pulled down the sail as they entered the harbor, to dock on oars alone. The captain came to Davos as they were tying up. “My prince will wish to see you at once.”
A fit of coughing seized Davos as he tried to answer. He clutched the rail for support and spat over the side. “The king,” he wheezed. “I must go to the king.” For where the king is, I will find Melisandre.
“No one goes to the king,” Khorane Sathmantes replied firmly. “Salladhor Saan will tell you. Him first.”
Davos was too weak to defy him. He could only nod.
Salladhor Saan was not aboard his Valyrian. They found him at another quay a quarter mile distant, down in the hold of a big-bellied Pentoshi cog named Bountiful Harvest, counting cargo with two eunuchs. One held a lantern, the other a wax tablet and stylus. “Thirty-seven, thirty-eight, thirty-nine,” the old rogue was saying when Davos and the captain came down the hatch. Today he wore a wine-colored tunic and high boots of bleached white leather inlaid with silver scrollwork. Pulling the stopper from a jar, he sniffed, sneezed, and said, “A coarse grind, and of the second quality, my nose declares. The bill of lading is saying forty-three jars. Where have the others gotten to, I am wondering? These Pentoshi, do they think I am not counting?” When he saw Davos he stopped suddenly. “Is it pepper stinging my eyes, or tears? Is this the knight of the onions who stands before me? No, how can it be, my dear friend Davos died on the burning river, all agree. Why has he come to haunt me?”
“I am no ghost, Salla.”
“What else? My onion knight was never so thin or so pale as you.” Salladhor Saan threaded his way between the jars of spice and bolts of cloth that filled the hold of the merchanter, wrapped Davos in a fierce embrace, then kissed him once on each cheek and a third time on his forehead. “You are still warm, ser, and I feel your heart thumpety-thumping. Can it be true? The sea that swallowed you has spit you up again.”
Davos was reminded of Patchface, Princess Shireen’s lackwit fool. He had gone into the sea as well, and when he came out he was mad. Am I mad as well? He coughed into a gloved hand and said, “I swam beneath the chain and washed ashore on a spear of the merling king. I would have died there, if Shayala’s Dance had not come upon me.”
Salladhor Saan threw an arm around the captain’s shoulders. “This was well done, Khorane. You will be having a fine reward, I am thinking. Meizo Mahr, be a good eunuch and take my friend Davos to the owner’s cabin. Fetch him some hot wine with cloves, I am misliking the sound of that cough. Squeeze some lime in it as well. And bring white cheese and a bowl of those cracked green olives we counted earlier! Davos, I will join you soon, once I have bespoken our good captain. You will be forgiving me, I know. Do not eat all the olives, or I must be cross with you!”
Davos let the elder of the two eunuchs escort him to a large and lavishly furnished cabin at the stern of the ship. The carpets were deep, the windows stained glass, and any of the great leather chairs would have seated three of Davos quite comfortably. The cheese and olives arrived shortly, and a cup of steaming hot red wine. He held it between his hands and sipped it gratefully. The warmth felt soothing as it spread through his chest.
Salladhor Saan appeared not long after. “You must be forgiving me for the wine, my friend. These Pentoshi would drink their own water if it were purple.”
“It will help my chest,” said Davos. “Hot wine is better than a compress, my mother used to say.”
“You shall be needing compresses as well, I am thinking. Sitting on a spear all this long time, oh my. How are you finding that excellent chair? He has fat cheeks, does he not?”
“Who?” asked Davos, between sips of hot wine.
“Illyrio Mopatis. A whale with whiskers, I am telling you truly. These chairs were built to his measure, though he is seldom bestirring himself from Pentos to sit in them. A fat man always sits comfortably, I am thinking, for he takes his pillow with him wherever he goes.”
“How is it you come by a Pentoshi ship?” asked Davos. “Have you gone pirate again, my lord?” He set his empty cup aside.
“Vile calumny. Who has suffered more from pirates than Salladhor Saan? I ask only what is due me. Much gold is owed, oh yes, but I am not without reason, so in place of coin I have taken a handsome parchment, very crisp. It bears the name and seal of Lord Alester Florent, the Hand of the King. I am made Lord of Blackwater Bay, and no vessel may be crossing my lordly waters without my lordly leave, no. And when these outlaws are trying to steal past me in the night to avoid my lawful duties and customs, why, they are no better than smugglers, so I am well within my rights to seize them.” The old pirate laughed. “I cut off no man’s fingers, though. What good are bits of fingers? The ships I am taking, the cargoes, a few ransoms, nothing unreasonable.” He gave Davos a sharp look. “You are unwell, my friend. That cough . . . and so thin, I am seeing your bones through your skin. And yet I am not seeing your little bag of fingerbones . . .”
Old habit made Davos reach for the leather pouch that was no longer there. “I lost it in the river.” My luck.
“The river was terrible,” Salladhor Saan said solemnly. “Even from the bay, I was seeing, and shuddering.”
Davos coughed, spat, and coughed again. “I saw Black Betha burning, and Fury as well,” he finally managed, hoarsely. “Did none of our ships escape the fire?” Part of him still hoped.
“Lord Steffon, Ragged Jenna, Swift Sword, Laughing Lord, and some others were upstream of the pyromancers’ pissing, yes. They did not burn, but with the chain raised, neither could they be flying. Some few were surrendering. Most rowed far up the Blackwater, away from the battling, and then were sunk by their crews so they would not be falling into Lannister hands. Ragged Jenna and Laughing Lord are still playing pirate on the river, I have heard, but who can say if it is so?”
“Lady Marya?” Davos asked. “Wraith?”
Salladhor Saan put a hand on Davos’s forearm and gave a squeeze. “No. Of them, no. I am sorry, my friend. They were good men, your Dale and Allard. But this comfort I can give you—your young Devan was among those we took off at the end. The brave boy never once left the king’s side, or so they say.”
For a moment he felt almost dizzy, his relief was so palpable. He had been afraid to ask about Devan. “The Mother is merciful. I must go to him, Salla. I must see him.”
“Yes,” said Salladhor Saan. “And you will be wanting to sail to Cape Wrath, I know, to see your wife and your two little ones. You must be having a new ship, I am thinking.”
“His Grace will give me a ship,” said Davos.
The Lyseni shook his head. “Of ships, His Grace has none, and Salladhor Saan has many. The king’s ships burned up on the river, but not mine. You shall have one, old friend. You will sail for me, yes? You will dance into Braavos and Myr and Volantis in the black of night, all unseen, and dance out again with silks and spices. We will be having fat purses, yes.”
“You are kind, Salla, but my duty’s to my king, not your purse. The war will go on. Stannis is still the rightful heir by all the laws of the Seven Kingdoms.”
“All the laws are not helping when all the ships burn up, I am thinking. And your king, well, you will be finding him changed, I am fearing. Since the battle, he sees no one, but broods in his Stone Drum. Queen Selyse keeps court for him with her uncle the Lord Alester, who is naming himself the Hand. The king’s seal she has given to this uncle, to fix to the letters he writes, even to my pretty parchment. But it is a little kingdom they are ruling, poor and rocky, yes. There is no gold, not even a little bit to pay faithful Salladhor Saan what is owed him, and only those knights that we took off at the end, and no ships but my little brave few.”
A sudden racking cough bent Davos over. Salladhor Saan moved to help him, but he waved him off, and after a moment he recovered. “No one?” he wheezed. “What do you mean, he sees no one?” His voice sounded wet and thick, even in his own ears, and for a moment the cabin swam dizzily around him.
“No one but her,” said Salladhor Saan, and Davos did not have to ask who he meant. “My friend, you tire yourself. It is a bed you are needing, not Salladhor Saan. A bed and many blankets, with a hot compress for your chest and more wine and cloves.”
Davos shook his head. “I will be fine. Tell me, Salla, I must know. No one but Melisandre?”
The Lyseni gave him a long doubtful look, and continued reluctantly. “The guards keep all others away, even his queen and his little daughter. Servants bring meals that no one eats.” He leaned forward and lowered his voice. “Queer talking I have heard, of hungry fires within the mountain, and how Stannis and the red woman go down together to watch the flames. There are shafts, they say, and secret stairs down into the mountain’s heart, into hot places where only she may walk unburned. It is enough and more to give an old man such terrors that sometimes he can scarcely find the strength to eat.”
Melisandre. Davos shivered. “The red woman did this to him,” he said. “She sent the fire to consume us, to punish Stannis for setting her aside, to teach him that he could not hope to win without her sorceries.”
The Lyseni chose a plump olive from the bowl between them. “You are not the first to be saying this, my friend. But if I am you, I am not saying it so loudly. Dragonstone crawls with these queen’s men, oh yes, and they have sharp ears and sharper knives.” He popped the olive into his mouth.
“I have a knife myself. Captain Khorane made me a gift of it.” He pulled out the dirk and laid it on the table between them. “A knife to cut out Melisandre’s heart. If she has one.”
Salladhor Saan spit out an olive pit. “Davos, good Davos, you must not be saying such things, even in jest.”
“No jest. I mean to kill her.” If she can be killed by mortal weapons. Davos was not certain that she could. He had seen old Maester Cressen slip poison into her wine, with his own eyes he had seen it, but when they both drank from the poisoned cup it was the maester who died, not the red priestess. A knife in the heart, though . . . even demons can be killed by cold iron, the singers say.
“These are dangerous talkings, my friend,” Salladhor Saan warned him. “I am thinking you are still sick from the sea. The fever has cooked your wits, yes. Best you are taking to your bed for a long resting, until you are stronger.”
Until my resolve weakens, you mean. Davos got to his feet. He did feel feverish and a little dizzy, but it did not matter. “You are a treacherous old rogue, Salladhor Saan, but a good friend all the same.”
The Lyseni stroked his pointed silver beard. “So with this great friend you will be staying, yes?”
“No, I will be going.” He coughed.
“Go? Look at you! You cough, you tremble, you are thin and weak. Where will you be going?”
“To the castle. My bed is there, and my son.”
“And the red woman,” Salladhor Saan said suspiciously. “She is in the castle also.”
“Her too.” Davos slid the dirk back into its sheath.
“You are an onion smuggler, what do you know of skulkings and stabbings? And you are ill, you cannot even hold the dirk. Do you know what will be happening to you, if you are caught? While we were burning on the river, the queen was burning traitors. Servants of the dark, she named them, poor men, and the red woman sang as the fires were lit.”
Davos was unsurprised. I knew, he thought, I knew before he told me. “She took Lord Sunglass from the dungeons,” he guessed, “and Hubard Rambton’s sons.”
“Just so, and burned them, as she will burn you. If you kill the red woman, they will burn you for revenge, and if you fail to kill her, they will burn you for the trying. She will sing and you will scream, and then you will die. And you have only just come back to life!”
“And this is why,” said Davos. “To do this thing. To make an end of Melisandre of Asshai and all her works. Why else would the sea have spit me out? You know Blackwater Bay as well as I do, Salla. No sensible captain would ever take his ship through the spears of the merling king and risk ripping out his bottom. Shayala’s Dance should never have come near me.”
“A wind,” insisted Salladhor Saan loudly, “an ill wind, is all. A wind drove her too far to the south.”
“And who sent the wind? Salla, the Mother spoke to me.”
The old Lyseni blinked at him. “Your mother is dead . . .”
“The Mother. She blessed me with seven sons, and yet I let them burn her. She spoke to me. We called the fire, she said. We called the shadows too. I rowed Melisandre into the bowels of Storm’s End and watched her birth a horror.” He saw it still in his nightmares, the gaunt black hands pushing against her thighs as it wriggled free of her swollen womb. “She killed Cressen and Lord Renly and a brave man named Cortnay Penrose, and she killed my sons as well. Now it is time someone killed her.”
“Someone,” said Salladhor Saan. “Yes, just so, someone. But not you. You are weak as a child, and no warrior. Stay, I beg you, we will talk more and you will eat, and perhaps we will sail to Braavos and hire a Faceless Man to do this thing, yes? But you, no, you must sit and eat.”
He is making this much harder, thought Davos wearily, and it was perishingly hard to begin with. “I have vengeance in my belly, Salla. It leaves no room for food. Let me go now. For our friendship, wish me luck and let me go.”
Salladhor Saan pushed himself to his feet. “You are no true friend, I am thinking. When you are dead, who will be bringing your ashes and bones back to your lady wife and telling her that she has lost a husband and four sons? Only sad old Salladhor Saan. But so be it, brave ser knight, go rushing to your grave. I will gather your bones in a sack and give them to the sons you leave behind, to wear in little bags around their necks.” He waved an angry hand, with rings on every finger. “Go, go, go, go, go.”
Davos did not want to leave like this. “Salla—”
“GO. Or stay, better, but if you are going, go.”
He went.
His walk up from the Bountiful Harvest to the gates of Dragonstone was long and lonely. The dockside streets where soldiers and sailors and smallfolk had thronged were empty and deserted. Where once he had stepped around squealing pigs and naked children, rats scurried. His legs felt like pudding beneath him, and thrice the coughing racked him so badly that he had to stop and rest. No one came to help him, nor even peered through a window to see what was the matter. The windows were shuttered, the doors barred, and more than half the houses displayed some mark of mourning. Thousands sailed up the Blackwater Rush, and hundreds came back, Davos reflected. My sons did not die alone. May the Mother have mercy on them all.
When he reached the castle gates, he found them shut as well. Davos pounded on the iron-studded wood with his fist. When there was no answer, he kicked at it, again and again. Finally a crossbowman appeared atop the barbican, peering down between two towering gargoyles. “Who goes there?”
He craned his head back and cupped his hands around his mouth. “Ser Davos Seaworth, to see His Grace.”
“Are you drunk? Go away and stop that pounding.”
Salladhor Saan had warned him. Davos tried a different tack. “Send for my son, then. Devan, the king’s squire.”
The guard frowned. “Who did you say you were?”
“Davos,” he shouted. “The onion knight.”
The head vanished, to return a moment later. “Be off with you. The onion knight died on the river. His ship burned.”
“His ship burned,” Davos agreed, “but he lived, and here he stands. Is Jate still captain of the gate?”
“Who?”
“Jate Blackberry. He knows me well enough.”
“I never heard of him. Most like he’s dead.”
“Lord Chyttering, then.”
“That one I know. He burned on the Blackwater.”
“Hookface Will? Hal the Hog?”
“Dead and dead,” the crossbowman said, but his face betrayed a sudden doubt. “You wait there.” He vanished again.
Davos waited. Gone, all gone, he thought dully, remembering how fat Hal’s white belly always showed beneath his grease-stained doublet, the long scar the fish hook had left across Will’s face, the way Jate always doffed his cap at the women, be they five or fifty, highborn or low. Drowned or burned, with my sons and a thousand others, gone to make a king in hell.
Suddenly the crossbowman was back. “Go round to the sally port and they’ll admit you.”
Davos did as he was bid. The guards who ushered him inside were strangers to him. They carried spears, and on their breasts they wore the fox-and-flowers sigil of House Florent. They escorted him not to the Stone Drum, as he’d expected, but under the arch of the Dragon’s Tail and down to Aegon’s Garden. “Wait here,” their sergeant told him.
“Does His Grace know that I’ve returned?” asked Davos.
“Bugger all if I know. Wait, I said.” The man left, taking his spearmen with him.
Aegon’s Garden had a pleasant piney smell to it, and tall dark trees rose on every side. There were wild roses as well, and towering thorny hedges, and a boggy spot where cranberries grew.
Why have they brought me here? Davos wondered.
Then he heard a faint ringing of bells, and a child’s giggle, and suddenly the fool Patchface popped from the bushes, shambling along as fast as he could go with the Princess Shireen hot on his heels. “You come back now,” she was shouting after him. “Patches, you come back.”
When the fool saw Davos, he jerked to a sudden halt, the bells on his antlered tin helmet going ting-a-ling, ting-a-ling. Hopping from one foot to the other, he sang, “Fool’s blood, king’s blood, blood on the maiden’s thigh, but chains for the guests and chains for the bridegroom, aye aye aye.” Shireen almost caught him then, but at the last instant he hopped over a patch of bracken and vanished among the trees. The princess was right behind him. The sight of them made Davos smile.
He had turned to cough into his gloved hand when another small shape crashed out of the hedge and bowled right into him, knocking him off his feet.
The boy went down as well, but he was up again almost at once. “What are you doing here?” he demanded as he brushed himself off. Jet-black hair fell to his collar, and his eyes were a startling blue. “You shouldn’t get in my way when I’m running.”
“No,” Davos agreed. “I shouldn’t.” Another fit of coughing seized him as he struggled to his knees.
“Are you unwell?” The boy took him by the arm and pulled him to his feet. “Should I summon the maester?”
Davos shook his head. “A cough. It will pass.”
The boy took him at his word. “We were playing monsters and maidens,” he explained. “I was the monster. It’s a childish game but my cousin likes it. Do you have a name?”
“Ser Davos Seaworth.”
The boy looked him up and down dubiously. “Are you certain? You don’t look very knightly.”
“I am the knight of the onions, my lord.”
The blue eyes blinked. “The one with the black ship?”
“You know that tale?”
“You brought my uncle Stannis fish to eat before I was born, when Lord Tyrell had him under siege.” The boy drew himself up tall. “I am Edric Storm,” he announced. “King Robert’s son.”
“Of course you are.” Davos had known that almost at once. The lad had the prominent ears of a Florent, but the hair, the eyes, the jaw, the cheekbones, those were all Baratheon.
“Did you know my father?” Edric Storm demanded.
“I saw him many a time while calling on your uncle at court, but we never spoke.”
“My father taught me to fight,” the boy said proudly. “He came to see me almost every year, and sometimes we trained together. On my last name day he sent me a warhammer just like his, only smaller. They made me leave it at Storm’s End, though. Is it true my uncle Stannis cut off your fingers?”
“Only the last joint. I still have fingers, only shorter.”
“Show me.”
Davos peeled his glove off. The boy studied his hand carefully. “He did not shorten your thumb?”
“No.” Davos coughed. “No, he left me that.”
“He should not have chopped any of your fingers,” the lad decided. “That was ill done.”
“I was a smuggler.”
“Yes, but you smuggled him fish and onions.”
“Lord Stannis knighted me for the onions, and took my fingers for the smuggling.” He pulled his glove back on.
“My father would not have chopped your fingers.”
“As you say, my lord.” Robert was a different man than Stannis, true enough. The boy is like him. Aye, and like Renly as well. That thought made him anxious.
The boy was about to say something more when they heard steps. Davos turned. Ser Axell Florent was coming down the garden path with a dozen guards in quilted jerkins. On their breasts they wore the fiery heart of the Lord of Light. Queen’s men, Davos thought. A cough came on him suddenly.
Ser Axell was short and muscular, with a barrel chest, thick arms, bandy legs, and hair growing from his ears. The queen’s uncle, he had served as castellan of Dragonstone for a decade, and had always treated Davos courteously, knowing he enjoyed the favor of Lord Stannis. But there was neither courtesy nor warmth in his tone as he said, “Ser Davos, and undrowned. How can that be?”
“Onions float, ser. Have you come to take me to the king?”
“I have come to take you to the dungeon.” Ser Axell waved his men forward. “Seize him, and take his dirk. He means to use it on our lady.”

The cell was warmer than any cell had a right to be.
It was dark, yes. Flickering orange light fell through the ancient iron bars from the torch in the sconce on the wall outside, but the back half of the cell remained drenched in gloom. It was dank as well, as might be expected on an isle such as Dragonstone, where the sea was never far. And there were rats, as many as any dungeon could expect to have and a few more besides.
But Davos could not complain of chill. The smooth stony passages beneath the great mass of Dragonstone were always warm, and Davos had often heard it said they grew warmer the farther down one went. He was well below the castle, he judged, and the wall of his cell often felt warm to his touch when he pressed a palm against it. Perhaps the old tales were true, and Dragonstone was built with the stones of hell.
He was sick when they first brought him here. The cough that had plagued him since the battle grew worse, and a fever took hold of him as well. His lips broke with blood blisters, and the warmth of the cell did not stop his shivering. I will not linger long, he remembered thinking. I will die soon, here in the dark.
Davos soon found that he was wrong about that, as about so much else. Dimly he remembered gentle hands and a firm voice, and young Maester Pylos looking down on him. He was given hot garlic broth to drink, and milk of the poppy to take away his aches and shivers. The poppy made him sleep and while he slept they leeched him to drain off the bad blood. Or so he surmised, by the leech marks on his arms when he woke. Before very long the coughing stopped, the blisters vanished, and his broth had chunks of whitefish in it, and carrots and onions as well. And one day he realized that he felt stronger than he had since Black Betha shattered beneath him and flung him in the river.
He had two gaolers to tend him. One was broad and squat, with thick shoulders and huge strong hands. He wore a leather brigantine dotted with iron studs, and once a day brought Davos a bowl of oaten porridge. Sometimes he sweetened it with honey or poured in a bit of milk. The other gaoler was older, stooped and sallow, with greasy unwashed hair and pebbled skin. He wore a doublet of white velvet with a ring of stars worked upon the breast in golden thread. It fit him badly, being both too short and too loose, and was soiled and torn besides. He would bring Davos plates of meat and mash, or fish stew, and once even half a lamprey pie. The lamprey was so rich he could not keep it down, but even so, it was a rare treat for a prisoner in a dungeon.
Neither sun nor moon shone in the dungeons; no windows pierced the thick stone walls. The only way to tell day from night was by his gaolers. Neither man would speak to him, though he knew they were no mutes; sometimes he heard them exchange a few brusque words as the watch was changing. They would not even tell him their names, so he gave them names of his own. The short strong one he called Porridge, the stooped sallow one Lamprey, for the pie. He marked the passage of days by the meals they brought, and by the changing of the torches in the sconce outside his cell.
A man grows lonely in the dark, and hungers for the sound of a human voice. Davos would talk to the gaolers whenever they came to his cell, whether to bring him food or change his slops pail. He knew they would be deaf to pleas for freedom or mercy; instead he asked them questions, hoping perhaps one day one might answer. “What news of the war?” he asked, and “Is the king well?” He asked after his son Devan, and the Princess Shireen, and Salladhor Saan. “What is the weather like?” he asked, and “Have the autumn storms begun yet? Do ships still sail the narrow sea?”
It made no matter what he asked; they never answered, though sometimes Porridge gave him a look, and for half a heartbeat Davos would think that he was about to speak. With Lamprey there was not even that much. I am not a man to him, Davos thought, only a stone that eats and shits and speaks. He decided after a while that he liked Porridge much the better. Porridge at least seemed to know he was alive, and there was a queer sort of kindness to the man. Davos suspected that he fed the rats; that was why there were so many. Once he thought he heard the gaoler talking to them as if they were children, but perhaps he’d only dreamed that.
They do not mean to let me die, he realized. They are keeping me alive, for some purpose of their own. He did not like to think what that might be. Lord Sunglass had been confined in the cells beneath Dragonstone for a time, as had Ser Hubard Rambton’s sons; all of them had ended on the pyre. I should have given myself to the sea, Davos thought as he sat staring at the torch beyond the bars. Or let the sail pass me by, to perish on my rock. I would sooner feed crabs than flames.
Then one night as he was finishing his supper, Davos felt a queer flush come over him. He glanced up through the bars, and there she stood in shimmering scarlet with her great ruby at her throat, her red eyes gleaming as bright as the torch that bathed her. “Melisandre,” he said, with a calm he did not feel.
“Onion Knight,” she replied, just as calmly, as if the two of them had met on a stair or in the yard, and were exchanging polite greetings. “Are you well?”
“Better than I was.”
“Do you lack for anything?”
“My king. My son. I lack for them.” He pushed the bowl aside and stood. “Have you come to burn me?”
Her strange red eyes studied him through the bars. “This is a bad place, is it not? A dark place, and foul. The good sun does not shine here, nor the bright moon.” She lifted a hand toward the torch in the wall sconce. “This is all that stands between you and the darkness, Onion Knight. This little fire, this gift of R’hllor. Shall I put it out?”
“No.” He moved toward the bars. “Please.” He did not think he could bear that, to be left alone in utter blackness with no one but the rats for company.
The red woman’s lips curved upward in a smile. “So you have come to love the fire, it would seem.”
“I need the torch.” His hands opened and closed. I will not beg her. I will not.
“I am like this torch, Ser Davos. We are both instruments of R’hllor. We were made for a single purpose—to keep the darkness at bay. Do you believe that?”
“No.” Perhaps he should have lied, and told her what she wanted to hear, but Davos was too accustomed to speaking truth. “You are the mother of darkness. I saw that under Storm’s End, when you gave birth before my eyes.”
“Is the brave Ser Onions so frightened of a passing shadow? Take heart, then. Shadows only live when given birth by light, and the king’s fires burn so low I dare not draw off any more to make another son. It might well kill him.” Melisandre moved closer. “With another man, though . . . a man whose flames still burn hot and high . . . if you truly wish to serve your king’s cause, come to my chamber one night. I could give you pleasure such as you have never known, and with your life-fire I could make . . .”
“. . . a horror.” Davos retreated from her. “I want no part of you, my lady. Or your god. May the Seven protect me.”
Melisandre sighed. “They did not protect Guncer Sunglass. He prayed thrice each day, and bore seven seven-pointed stars upon his shield, but when R’hllor reached out his hand his prayers turned to screams, and he burned. Why cling to these false gods?”
“I have worshiped them all my life.”
“All your life, Davos Seaworth? As well say it was so yesterday.” She shook her head sadly. “You have never feared to speak the truth to kings, why do you lie to yourself? Open your eyes, ser knight.”
“What is it you would have me see?”
“The way the world is made. The truth is all around you, plain to behold. The night is dark and full of terrors, the day bright and beautiful and full of hope. One is black, the other white. There is ice and there is fire. Hate and love. Bitter and sweet. Male and female. Pain and pleasure. Winter and summer. Evil and good.” She took a step toward him. “Death and life. Everywhere, opposites. Everywhere, the war.”
“The war?” asked Davos.
“The war,” she affirmed. “There are two, Onion Knight. Not seven, not one, not a hundred or a thousand. Two! Do you think I crossed half the world to put yet another vain king on yet another empty throne? The war has been waged since time began, and before it is done, all men must choose where they will stand. On one side is R’hllor, the Lord of Light, the Heart of Fire, the God of Flame and Shadow. Against him stands the Great Other whose name may not be spoken, the Lord of Darkness, the Soul of Ice, the God of Night and Terror. Ours is not a choice between Baratheon and Lannister, between Greyjoy and Stark. It is death we choose, or life. Darkness, or light.” She clasped the bars of his cell with her slender white hands. The great ruby at her throat seemed to pulse with its own radiance. “So tell me, Ser Davos Seaworth, and tell me truly—does your heart burn with the shining light of R’hllor? Or is it black and cold and full of worms?” She reached through the bars and laid three fingers upon his breast, as if to feel the truth of him through flesh and wool and leather.
“My heart,” Davos said slowly, “is full of doubts.”
Melisandre sighed. “Ahhhh, Davos. The good knight is honest to the last, even in his day of darkness. It is well you did not lie to me. I would have known. The Other’s servants oft hide black hearts in gaudy light, so R’hllor gives his priests the power to see through falsehoods.” She stepped lightly away from the cell. “Why did you mean to kill me?”
“I will tell you,” said Davos, “if you will tell me who betrayed me.” It could only have been Salladhor Saan, and yet even now he prayed it was not so.
The red woman laughed. “No one betrayed you, onion knight. I saw your purpose in my flames.”
The flames. “If you can see the future in these flames, how is it that we burned upon the Blackwater? You gave my sons to the fire . . . my sons, my ship, my men, all burning . . .”
Melisandre shook her head. “You wrong me, onion knight. Those were no fires of mine. Had I been with you, your battle would have had a different ending. But His Grace was surrounded by unbelievers, and his pride proved stronger than his faith. His punishment was grievous, but he has learned from his mistake.”
Were my sons no more than a lesson for a king, then? Davos felt his mouth tighten.
“It is night in your Seven Kingdoms now,” the red woman went on, “but soon the sun will rise again. The war continues, Davos Seaworth, and some will soon learn that even an ember in the ashes can still ignite a great blaze. The old maester looked at Stannis and saw only a man. You see a king. You are both wrong. He is the Lord’s chosen, the warrior of fire. I have seen him leading the fight against the dark, I have seen it in the flames. The flames do not lie, else you would not be here. It is written in prophecy as well. When the red star bleeds and the darkness gathers, Azor Ahai shall be born again amidst smoke and salt to wake dragons out of stone. The bleeding star has come and gone, and Dragonstone is the place of smoke and salt. Stannis Baratheon is Azor Ahai reborn!” Her red eyes blazed like twin fires, and seemed to stare deep into his soul. “You do not believe me. You doubt the truth of R’hllor even now . . . yet have served him all the same, and will serve him again. I shall leave you here to think on all that I have told you. And because R’hllor is the source of all good, I shall leave the torch as well.”
With a smile and swirl of scarlet skirts, she was gone. Only her scent lingered after. That, and the torch. Davos lowered himself to the floor of the cell and wrapped his arms about his knees. The shifting torchlight washed over him. Once Melisandre’s footsteps faded away, the only sound was the scrabbling of rats. Ice and fire, he thought. Black and white. Dark and light. Davos could not deny the power of her god. He had seen the shadow crawling from Melisandre’s womb, and the priestess knew things she had no way of knowing. She saw my purpose in her flames. It was good to learn that Salla had not sold him, but the thought of the red woman spying out his secrets with her fires disquieted him more than he could say. And what did she mean when she said that I had served her god and would serve him again? He did not like that either.
He lifted his eyes to stare up at the torch. He looked for a long time, never blinking, watching the flames shift and shimmer. He tried to see beyond them, to peer through the fiery curtain and glimpse whatever lived back there . . . but there was nothing, only fire, and after a time his eyes began to water.
God-blind and tired, Davos curled up on the straw and gave himself to sleep.
Three days later—well, Porridge had come thrice, and Lamprey twice—Davos heard voices outside his cell. He sat up at once, his back to the stone wall, listening to the sounds of struggle. This was new, a change in his unchanging world. The noise was coming from the left, where the steps led up to daylight. He could hear a man’s voice, pleading and shouting.
“. . . madness!” the man was saying as he came into view, dragged along between two guardsmen with fiery hearts on their breasts. Porridge went before them, jangling a ring of keys, and Ser Axell Florent walked behind. “Axell,” the prisoner said desperately, “for the love you bear me, unhand me! You cannot do this, I’m no traitor.” He was an older man, tall and slender, with silvery grey hair, a pointed beard, and a long elegant face twisted in fear. “Where is Selyse, where is the queen? I demand to see her. The Others take you all! Release me!”
The guards paid no mind to his outcries. “Here?” Porridge asked in front of the cell. Davos got to his feet. For an instant he considered trying to rush them when the door was opened, but that was madness. There were too many, the guards wore swords, and Porridge was strong as a bull.
Ser Axell gave the gaoler a curt nod. “Let the traitors enjoy each other’s company.”
“I am no traitor!” screeched the prisoner as Porridge was unlocking the door. Though he was plainly dressed, in grey wool doublet and black breeches, his speech marked him as highborn. His birth will not serve him here, thought Davos.
Porridge swung the bars wide, Ser Axell gave a nod, and the guards flung their charge in headlong. The man stumbled and might have fallen, but Davos caught him. At once he wrenched away and staggered back toward the door, only to have it slammed in his pale, pampered face. “No,” he shouted. “Nooooo.” All the strength suddenly left his legs, and he slid slowly to the floor, clutching at the iron bars. Ser Axell, Porridge, and the guards had already turned to leave. “You cannot do this,” the prisoner shouted at their retreating backs. “I am the King’s Hand!”
It was then that Davos knew him. “You are Alester Florent.”
The man turned his head. “Who . . . ?”
“Ser Davos Seaworth.”
Lord Alester blinked. “Seaworth . . . the onion knight. You tried to murder Melisandre.”
Davos did not deny it. “At Storm’s End you wore red-gold armor, with inlaid lapis flowers on your breastplate.” He reached down a hand to help the other man to his feet.
Lord Alester brushed the filthy straw from his clothing. “I . . . I must apologize for my appearance, ser. My chests were lost when the Lannisters overran our camp. I escaped with no more than the mail on my back and the rings on my fingers.”
He still wears those rings, noted Davos, who had lacked even all of his fingers.
“No doubt some cook’s boy or groom is prancing around King’s Landing just now in my slashed velvet doublet and jeweled cloak,” Lord Alester went on, oblivious. “But war has its horrors, as all men know. No doubt you suffered your own losses.”
“My ship,” said Davos. “All my men. Four of my sons.”
“May the . . . may the Lord of Light lead them through the darkness to a better world,” the other man said.
May the Father judge them justly, and the Mother grant them mercy, Davos thought, but he kept his prayer to himself. The Seven had no place on Dragonstone now.
“My own son is safe at Brightwater,” the lord went on, “but I lost a nephew on the Fury. Ser Imry, my brother Ryam’s son.”
It had been Ser Imry Florent who led them blindly up the Blackwater Rush with all oars pulling, paying no heed to the small stone towers at the mouth of the river. Davos was not like to forget him. “My son Maric was your nephew’s oarmaster.” He remembered his last sight of Fury, engulfed in wildfire. “Has there been any word of survivors?”
“The Fury burned and sank with all hands,” his lordship said. “Your son and my nephew were lost, with countless other good men. The war itself was lost that day, ser.”
This man is defeated. Davos remembered Melisandre’s talk of embers in the ashes igniting great blazes. Small wonder he ended here. “His Grace will never yield, my lord.”
“Folly, that’s folly.” Lord Alester sat on the floor again, as if the effort of standing for a moment had been too much for him. “Stannis Baratheon will never sit the Iron Throne. Is it treason to say the truth? A bitter truth, but no less true for that. His fleet is gone, save for the Lyseni, and Salladhor Saan will flee at the first sight of a Lannister sail. Most of the lords who supported Stannis have gone over to Joffrey or died . . .”
“Even the lords of the narrow sea? The lords sworn to Dragonstone?”
Lord Alester waved his hand feebly. “Lord Celtigar was captured and bent the knee. Monford Velaryon died with his ship, the red woman burned Sunglass, and Lord Bar Emmon is fifteen, fat, and feeble. Those are your lords of the narrow sea. Only the strength of House Florent is left to Stannis, against all the might of Highgarden, Sunspear, and Casterly Rock, and now most of the storm lords as well. The best hope that remains is to try and salvage something with a peace. That is all I meant to do. Gods be good, how can they call it treason?”
Davos stood frowning. “My lord, what did you do?”
“Not treason. Never treason. I love His Grace as much as any man. My own niece is his queen, and I remained loyal to him when wiser men fled. I am his Hand, the Hand of the King, how can I be a traitor? I only meant to save our lives, and . . . honor . . . yes.” He licked his lips. “I penned a letter. Salladhor Saan swore that he had a man who could get it to King’s Landing, to Lord Tywin. His lordship is a . . . a man of reason, and my terms . . . the terms were fair . . . more than fair.”
“What terms were these, my lord?”
“It is filthy here,” Lord Alester said suddenly. “And that odor . . . what is that odor?”
“The pail,” said Davos, gesturing. “We have no privy here. What terms?”
His lordship stared at the pail in horror. “That Lord Stannis give up his claim to the Iron Throne and retract all he said of Joffrey’s bastardy, on the condition that he be accepted back into the king’s peace and confirmed as Lord of Dragonstone and Storm’s End. I vowed to do the same, for the return of Brightwater Keep and all our lands. I thought . . . Lord Tywin would see the sense in my proposal. He still has the Starks to deal with, and the ironmen as well. I offered to seal the bargain by wedding Shireen to Joffrey’s brother Tommen.” He shook his head. “The terms . . . they are as good as we are ever like to get. Even you can see that, surely?”
“Yes,” said Davos, “even me.” Unless Stannis should father a son, such a marriage would mean that Dragonstone and Storm’s End would one day pass to Tommen, which would doubtless please Lord Tywin. Meanwhile, the Lannisters would have Shireen as hostage to make certain Stannis raised no new rebellions. “And what did His Grace say when you proposed these terms to him?”
“He is always with the red woman, and . . . he is not in his right mind, I fear. This talk of a stone dragon . . . madness, I tell you, sheer madness. Did we learn nothing from Aerion Brightfire, from the nine mages, from the alchemists? Did we learn nothing from Summerhall? No good has ever come from these dreams of dragons, I told Axell as much. My way was better. Surer. And Stannis gave me his seal, he gave me leave to rule. The Hand speaks with the king’s voice.”
“Not in this.” Davos was no courtier, and he did not even try to blunt his words. “It is not in Stannis to yield, so long as he knows his claim is just. No more than he can unsay his words against Joffrey, when he believes them true. As for the marriage, Tommen was born of the same incest as Joffrey, and His Grace would sooner see Shireen dead than wed to such.”
A vein throbbed in Florent’s forehead. “He has no choice.”
“You are wrong, my lord. He can choose to die a king.”
“And us with him? Is that what you desire, Onion Knight?”
“No. But I am the king’s man, and I will make no peace without his leave.”
Lord Alester stared at him helplessly for a long moment, and then began to weep.

Lord Alester looked up sharply. “Voices,” he said. “Do you hear, Davos? Someone is coming for us.” 
“Lamprey,” said Davos. “It’s time for our supper, or near enough.” Last night Lamprey had brought them half a beef-and-bacon pie, and a flagon of mead as well. Just the thought of it made his belly start to rumble.
“No, there’s more than one.”
He’s right. Davos heard two voices at least, and footsteps, growing louder. He got to his feet and moved to the bars.
Lord Alester brushed the straw from his clothes. “The king has sent for me. Or the queen, yes, Selyse would never let me rot here, her own blood.”
Outside the cell, Lamprey appeared with a ring of keys in hand. Ser Axell Florent and four guardsmen followed close behind him. They waited beneath the torch while Lamprey searched for the correct key.
“Axell,” Lord Alester said. “Gods be good. Is it the king who sends for me, or the queen?”
“No one has sent for you, traitor,” Ser Axell said.
Lord Alester recoiled as if he’d been slapped. “No, I swear to you, I committed no treason. Why won’t you listen? If His Grace would only let me explain—”
Lamprey thrust a great iron key into the lock, turned it, and pulled open the cell. The rusted hinges screamed in protest. “You,” he said to Davos. “Come.”
“Where?” Davos looked to Ser Axell. “Tell me true, ser, do you mean to burn me?”
“You are sent for. Can you walk?”
“I can walk.” Davos stepped from the cell. Lord Alester gave a cry of dismay as Lamprey slammed the door shut once more.
“Take the torch,” Ser Axell commanded the gaoler. “Leave the traitor to the darkness.”
“No,” his brother said. “Axell, please, don’t take the light . . . gods have mercy . . .”
“Gods? There is only R’hllor, and the Other.” Ser Axell gestured sharply, and one of his guardsmen pulled the torch from its sconce and led the way to the stair.
“Are you taking me to Melisandre?” Davos asked.
“She will be there,” Ser Axell said. “She is never far from the king. But it is His Grace himself who asked for you.”
Davos lifted his hand to his chest, where once his luck had hung in a leather bag on a thong. Gone now, he remembered, and the ends of four fingers as well. But his hands were still long enough to wrap about a woman’s throat, he thought, especially a slender throat like hers.
Up they went, climbing the turnpike stair in single file. The walls were rough dark stone, cool to the touch. The light of the torches went before them, and their shadows marched beside them on the walls. At the third turn they passed an iron gate that opened on blackness, and another at the fifth turn. Davos guessed that they were near the surface by then, perhaps even above it. The next door they came to was made of wood, but still they climbed. Now the walls were broken by arrow slits, but no shafts of sunlight pried their way through the thickness of the stone. It was night outside.
His legs were aching by the time Ser Axell thrust open a heavy door and gestured him through. Beyond, a high stone bridge arched over emptiness to the massive central tower called the Stone Drum. A sea wind blew restlessly through the arches that supported the roof, and Davos could smell the salt water as they crossed. He took a deep breath, filling his lungs with the clean cold air. Wind and water, give me strength, he prayed. A huge nightfire burned in the yard below, to keep the terrors of the dark at bay, and the queen’s men were gathered around it, singing praises to their new red god.
They were in the center of the bridge when Ser Axell stopped suddenly. He made a brusque gesture with his hand, and his men moved out of earshot. “Were it my choice, I would burn you with my brother Alester,” he told Davos. “You are both traitors.”
“Say what you will. I would never betray King Stannis.”
“You would. You will. I see it in your face. And I have seen it in the flames as well. R’hllor has blessed me with that gift. Like Lady Melisandre, he shows me the future in the fire. Stannis Baratheon will sit the Iron Throne. I have seen it. And I know what must be done. His Grace must make me his Hand, in place of my traitor brother. And you will tell him so.”
Will I? Davos said nothing.
“The queen has urged my appointment,” Ser Axell went on. “Even your old friend from Lys, the pirate Saan, he says the same. We have made a plan together, him and me. Yet His Grace does not act. The defeat gnaws inside him, a black worm in his soul. It is up to us who love him to show him what to do. If you are as devoted to his cause as you claim, smuggler, you will join your voice to ours. Tell him that I am the only Hand he needs. Tell him, and when we sail I shall see that you have a new ship.”
A ship. Davos studied the other man’s face. Ser Axell had big Florent ears, much like the queen’s. Coarse hair grew from them, as from his nostrils; more sprouted in tufts and patches beneath his double chin. His nose was broad, his brow beetled, his eyes close-set and hostile. He would sooner give me a pyre than a ship, he said as much, but if I do him this favor . . . 
“If you think to betray me,” Ser Axell said, “pray remember that I have been castellan of Dragonstone a good long time. The garrison is mine. Perhaps I cannot burn you without the king’s consent, but who is to say you might not suffer a fall.” He laid a meaty hand on the back of Davos’s neck and shoved him bodily against the waist-high side of the bridge, then shoved a little harder to force his face out over the yard. “Do you hear me?”
“I hear,” said Davos. And you dare name me traitor?
Ser Axell released him. “Good.” He smiled. “His Grace awaits. Best we do not keep him.”
At the very top of Stone Drum, within the great round room called the Chamber of the Painted Table, they found Stannis Baratheon standing behind the artifact that gave the hall its name, a massive slab of wood carved and painted in the shape of Westeros as it had been in the time of Aegon the Conqueror. An iron brazier stood beside the king, its coals glowing a ruddy orange. Four tall pointed windows looked out to north, south, east, and west. Beyond was the night and the starry sky. Davos could hear the wind moving, and fainter, the sounds of the sea.
“Your Grace,” Ser Axell said, “as it please you, I have brought the onion knight.”
“So I see.” Stannis wore a grey wool tunic, a dark red mantle, and a plain black leather belt from which his sword and dagger hung. A red-gold crown with flame-shaped points encircled his brows. The look of him was a shock. He seemed ten years older than the man that Davos had left at Storm’s End when he set sail for the Blackwater and the battle that would be their undoing. The king’s close-cropped beard was spiderwebbed with grey hairs, and he had dropped two stone or more of weight. He had never been a fleshy man, but now the bones moved beneath his skin like spears, fighting to cut free. Even his crown seemed too large for his head. His eyes were blue pits lost in deep hollows, and the shape of a skull could be seen beneath his face.
Yet when he saw Davos, a faint smile brushed his lips. “So the sea has returned me my knight of the fish and onions.”
“It did, Your Grace.” Does he know that he had me in his dungeon? Davos went to one knee.
“Rise, Ser Davos,” Stannis commanded. “I have missed you, ser. I have need of good counsel, and you never gave me less. So tell me true—what is the penalty for treason?”
The word hung in the air. A frightful word, thought Davos. Was he being asked to condemn his cellmate? Or himself, perchance? Kings know the penalty for treason better than any man. “Treason?” he finally managed, weakly.
“What else would you call it, to deny your king and seek to steal his rightful throne. I ask you again—what is the penalty for treason under the law?”
Davos had no choice but to answer. “Death,” he said. “The penalty is death, Your Grace.”
“It has always been so. I am not . . . I am not a cruel man, Ser Davos. You know me. Have known me long. This is not my decree. It has always been so, since Aegon’s day and before. Daemon Blackfyre, the brothers Toyne, the Vulture King, Grand Maester Hareth . . . traitors have always paid with their lives . . . even Rhaenyra Targaryen. She was daughter to one king and mother to two more, yet she died a traitor’s death for trying to usurp her brother’s crown. It is law. Law, Davos. Not cruelty.”
“Yes, Your Grace.” He does not speak of me. Davos felt a moment’s pity for his cellmate down in the dark. He knew he should keep silent, but he was tired and sick of heart, and he heard himself say, “Sire, Lord Florent meant no treason.”
“Do smugglers have another name for it? I made him Hand, and he would have sold my rights for a bowl of pease porridge. He would even have given them Shireen. Mine only child, he would have wed to a bastard born of incest.” The king’s voice was thick with anger. “My brother had a gift for inspiring loyalty. Even in his foes. At Summerhall he won three battles in a single day, and brought Lords Grandison and Cafferen back to Storm’s End as prisoners. He hung their banners in the hall as trophies. Cafferen’s white fawns were spotted with blood and Grandison’s sleeping lion was torn near in two. Yet they would sit beneath those banners of a night, drinking and feasting with Robert. He even took them hunting. ‘These men meant to deliver you to Aerys to be burned,’ I told him after I saw them throwing axes in the yard. ‘You should not be putting axes in their hands.’ Robert only laughed. I would have thrown Grandison and Cafferen into a dungeon, but he turned them into friends. Lord Cafferen died at Ashford Castle, cut down by Randyll Tarly whilst fighting for Robert. Lord Grandison was wounded on the Trident and died of it a year after. My brother made them love him, but it would seem that I inspire only betrayal. Even in mine own blood and kin. Brother, grandfather, cousins, good uncle . . .”
“Your Grace,” said Ser Axell, “I beg you, give me the chance to prove to you that not all Florents are so feeble.”
“Ser Axell would have me resume the war,” King Stannis told Davos. “The Lannisters think I am done and beaten, and my sworn lords have forsaken me, near every one. Even Lord Estermont, my own mother’s father, has bent his knee to Joffrey. The few loyal men who remain to me are losing heart. They waste their days drinking and gambling, and lick their wounds like beaten curs.”
“Battle will set their hearts ablaze once more, Your Grace,” Ser Axell said. “Defeat is a disease, and victory is the cure.”
“Victory.” The king’s mouth twisted. “There are victories and victories, ser. But tell your plan to Ser Davos. I would hear his views on what you propose.”
Ser Axell turned to Davos, with a look on his face much like the look that proud Lord Belgrave must have worn, the day King Baelor the Blessed had commanded him to wash the beggar’s ulcerous feet. Nonetheless, he obeyed.
The plan Ser Axell had devised with Salladhor Saan was simple. A few hours’ sail from Dragonstone lay Claw Isle, ancient sea-girt seat of House Celtigar. Lord Ardrian Celtigar had fought beneath the fiery heart on the Blackwater, but once taken, he had wasted no time in going over to Joffrey. He remained in King’s Landing even now. “Too frightened of His Grace’s wrath to come near Dragonstone, no doubt,” Ser Axell declared. “And wisely so. The man has betrayed his rightful king.”
Ser Axell proposed to use Salladhor Saan’s fleet and the men who had escaped the Blackwater—Stannis still had some fifteen hundred on Dragonstone, more than half of them Florents—to exact retribution for Lord Celtigar’s defection. Claw Isle was but lightly garrisoned, its castle reputedly stuffed with Myrish carpets, Volantene glass, gold and silver plate, jeweled cups, magnificent hawks, an axe of Valyrian steel, a horn that could summon monsters from the deep, chests of rubies, and more wines than a man could drink in a hundred years. Though Celtigar had shown the world a niggardly face, he had never stinted on his own comforts. “Put his castle to the torch and his people to the sword, I say,” Ser Axell concluded. “Leave Claw Isle a desolation of ash and bone, fit only for carrion crows, so the realm might see the fate of those who bed with Lannisters.”
Stannis listened to Ser Axell’s recitation in silence, grinding his jaw slowly from side to side. When it was done, he said, “It could be done, I believe. The risk is small. Joffrey has no strength at sea until Lord Redwyne sets sail from the Arbor. The plunder might serve to keep that Lysene pirate Salladhor Saan loyal for a time. By itself Claw Isle is worthless, but its fall would serve notice to Lord Tywin that my cause is not yet done.” The king turned back to Davos. “Speak truly, ser. What do you make of Ser Axell’s proposal?”
Speak truly, ser. Davos remembered the dark cell he had shared with Lord Alester, remembered Lamprey and Porridge. He thought of the promises that Ser Axell had made on the bridge above the yard. A ship or a shove, what shall it be? But this was Stannis asking. “Your Grace,” he said slowly, “I make it folly . . . aye, and cowardice.”
“Cowardice?” Ser Axell all but shouted. “No man calls me craven before my king!”
“Silence,” Stannis commanded. “Ser Davos, speak on, I would hear your reasons.”
Davos turned to face Ser Axell. “You say we ought show the realm we are not done. Strike a blow. Make war, aye . . . but on what enemy? You will find no Lannisters on Claw Isle.”
“We will find traitors,” said Ser Axell, “though it may be I could find some closer to home. Even in this very room.”
Davos ignored the jibe. “I don’t doubt Lord Celtigar bent the knee to the boy Joffrey. He is an old done man, who wants no more than to end his days in his castle, drinking his fine wine out of his jeweled cups.” He turned back to Stannis. “Yet he came when you called, sire. Came, with his ships and swords. He stood by you at Storm’s End when Lord Renly came down on us, and his ships sailed up the Blackwater. His men fought for you, killed for you, burned for you. Claw Isle is weakly held, yes. Held by women and children and old men. And why is that? Because their husbands and sons and fathers died on the Blackwater, that’s why. Died at their oars, or with swords in their hands, fighting beneath our banners. Yet Ser Axell proposes we swoop down on the homes they left behind, to rape their widows and put their children to the sword. These smallfolk are no traitors . . .”
“They are,” insisted Ser Axell. “Not all of Celtigar’s men were slain on the Blackwater. Hundreds were taken with their lord, and bent the knee when he did.”
“When he did,” Davos repeated. “They were his men. His sworn men. What choice were they given?”
“Every man has choices. They might have refused to kneel. Some did, and died for it. Yet they died true men, and loyal.”
“Some men are stronger than others.” It was a feeble answer, and Davos knew it. Stannis Baratheon was a man of iron will who neither understood nor forgave weakness in others. I am losing, he thought, despairing.
“It is every man’s duty to remain loyal to his rightful king, even if the lord he serves proves false,” Stannis declared in a tone that brooked no argument.
A desperate folly took hold of Davos, a recklessness akin to madness. “As you remained loyal to King Aerys when your brother raised his banners?” he blurted.
Shocked silence followed, until Ser Axell cried, “Treason!” and snatched his dagger from its sheath. “Your Grace, he speaks his infamy to your face!”
Davos could hear Stannis grinding his teeth. A vein bulged, blue and swollen, in the king’s brow. Their eyes met. “Put up your knife, Ser Axell. And leave us.”
“As it please Your Grace—”
“It would please me for you to leave,” said Stannis. “Take yourself from my presence, and send me Melisandre.”
“As you command.” Ser Axell slid the knife away, bowed, and hurried toward the door. His boots rang against the floor, angry.
“You have always presumed on my forbearance,” Stannis warned Davos when they were alone. “I can shorten your tongue as easy as I did your fingers, smuggler.”
“I am your man, Your Grace. So it is your tongue, to do with as you please.”
“It is,” he said, calmer. “And I would have it speak the truth. Though the truth is a bitter draught at times. Aerys? If you only knew . . . that was a hard choosing. My blood or my liege. My brother or my king.” He grimaced. “Have you ever seen the Iron Throne? The barbs along the back, the ribbons of twisted steel, the jagged ends of swords and knives all tangled up and melted? It is not a comfortable seat, ser. Aerys cut himself so often men took to calling him King Scab, and Maegor the Cruel was murdered in that chair. By that chair, to hear some tell it. It is not a seat where a man can rest at ease. Ofttimes I wonder why my brothers wanted it so desperately.”
“Why would you want it, then?” Davos asked him.
“It is not a question of wanting. The throne is mine, as Robert’s heir. That is law. After me, it must pass to my daughter, unless Selyse should finally give me a son.” He ran three fingers lightly down the table, over the layers of smooth hard varnish, dark with age. “I am king. Wants do not enter into it. I have a duty to my daughter. To the realm. Even to Robert. He loved me but little, I know, yet he was my brother. The Lannister woman gave him horns and made a motley fool of him. She may have murdered him as well, as she murdered Jon Arryn and Ned Stark. For such crimes there must be justice. Starting with Cersei and her abominations. But only starting. I mean to scour that court clean. As Robert should have done, after the Trident. Ser Barristan once told me that the rot in King Aerys’s reign began with Varys. The eunuch should never have been pardoned. No more than the Kingslayer. At the least, Robert should have stripped the white cloak from Jaime and sent him to the Wall, as Lord Stark urged. He listened to Jon Arryn instead. I was still at Storm’s End, under siege and unconsulted.” He turned abruptly, to give Davos a hard shrewd look. “The truth, now. Why did you wish to murder Lady Melisandre?”
So he does know. Davos could not lie to him. “Four of my sons burned on the Blackwater. She gave them to the flames.”
“You wrong her. Those fires were no work of hers. Curse the Imp, curse the pyromancers, curse that fool of Florent who sailed my fleet into the jaws of a trap. Or curse me for my stubborn pride, for sending her away when I needed her most. But not Melisandre. She remains my faithful servant.”
“Maester Cressen was your faithful servant. She slew him, as she killed Ser Cortnay Penrose and your brother Renly.”
“Now you sound a fool,” the king complained. “She saw Renly’s end in the flames, yes, but she had no more part in it than I did. The priestess was with me. Your Devan would tell you so. Ask him, if you doubt me. She would have spared Renly if she could. It was Melisandre who urged me to meet with him, and give him one last chance to amend his treason. And it was Melisandre who told me to send for you when Ser Axell wished to give you to R’hllor.” He smiled thinly. “Does that surprise you?”
“Yes. She knows I am no friend to her or her red god.”
“But you are a friend to me. She knows that as well.” He beckoned Davos closer. “The boy is sick. Maester Pylos has been leeching him.”
“The boy?” His thoughts went to his Devan, the king’s squire. “My son, sire?”
“Devan? A good boy. He has much of you in him. It is Robert’s bastard who is sick, the boy we took at Storm’s End.”
Edric Storm. “I spoke with him in Aegon’s Garden.”
“As she wished. As she saw.” Stannis sighed. “Did the boy charm you?” He has that gift. He got it from his father, with the blood. He knows he is a king’s son, but chooses to forget that he is bastard-born. And he worships Robert, as Renly did when he was young. My royal brother played the fond father on his visits to Storm’s End, and there were gifts . . . swords and ponies and fur-trimmed cloaks. The eunuch’s work, every one. The boy would write the Red Keep full of thanks, and Robert would laugh and ask Varys what he’d sent this year. Renly was no better. He left the boy’s upbringing to castellans and maesters, and every one fell victim to his charm. Penrose chose to die rather than give him up.” The king ground his teeth together. “It still angers me. How could he think I would hurt the boy? I chose Robert, did I not? When that hard day came. I chose blood over honor.”
He does not use the boy’s name. That made Davos very uneasy. “I hope young Edric will recover soon.”
Stannis waved a hand, dismissing his concern. “It is a chill, no more. He coughs, he shivers, he has a fever. Maester Pylos will soon set him right. By himself the boy is nought, you understand, but in his veins flows my brother’s blood. There is power in a king’s blood, she says.”
Davos did not have to ask who she was.
Stannis touched the Painted Table. “Look at it, onion knight. My realm, by rights. My Westeros.” He swept a hand across it. “This talk of Seven Kingdoms is a folly. Aegon saw that three hundred years ago when he stood where we are standing. They painted this table at his command. Rivers and bays they painted, hills and mountains, castles and cities and market towns, lakes and swamps and forests . . . but no borders. It is all one. One realm, for one king to rule alone.”
“One king,” agreed Davos. “One king means peace.”
“I shall bring justice to Westeros. A thing Ser Axell understands as little as he does war. Claw Isle would gain me naught . . . and it was evil, just as you said. Celtigar must pay the traitor’s price himself, in his own person. And when I come into my kingdom, he shall. Every man shall reap what he has sown, from the highest lord to the lowest gutter rat. And some will lose more than the tips off their fingers, I promise you. They have made my kingdom bleed, and I do not forget that.” King Stannis turned from the table. “On your knees, Onion Knight.”
“Your Grace?”
“For your onions and fish, I made you a knight once. For this, I am of a mind to raise you to lord.”
This? Davos was lost. “I am content to be your knight, Your Grace. I would not know how to begin being lordly.”
“Good. To be lordly is to be false. I have learned that lesson hard. Now, kneel. Your king commands.”
Davos knelt, and Stannis drew his longsword. Lightbringer, Melisandre had named it; the red sword of heroes, drawn from the fires where the seven gods were consumed. The room seemed to grow brighter as the blade slid from its scabbard. The steel had a glow to it; now orange, now yellow, now red. The air shimmered around it, and no jewel had ever sparkled so brilliantly. But when Stannis touched it to Davos’s shoulder, it felt no different than any other longsword. “Ser Davos of House Seaworth,” the king said, “are you my true and honest liege man, now and forever?”
“I am, Your Grace.”
“And do you swear to serve me loyally all your days, to give me honest counsel and swift obedience, to defend my rights and my realm against all foes in battles great and small, to protect my people and punish my enemies?”
“I do, Your Grace.”
“Then rise again, Davos Seaworth, and rise as Lord of the Rainwood, Admiral of the Narrow Sea, and Hand of the King.”
For a moment Davos was too stunned to move. I woke this morning in his dungeon. “Your Grace, you cannot . . . I am no fit man to be a King’s Hand.”
“There is no man fitter.” Stannis sheathed Lightbringer, gave Davos his hand, and pulled him to his feet.
“I am lowborn,” Davos reminded him. “An upjumped smuggler. Your lords will never obey me.”
“Then we will make new lords.”
“But . . . I cannot read . . . nor write . . .”
“Maester Pylos can read for you. As to writing, my last Hand wrote the head off his shoulders. All I ask of you are the things you’ve always given me. Honesty. Loyalty. Service.”
“Surely there is someone better . . . some great lord . . .”
Stannis snorted. “Bar Emmon, that boy? My faithless grandfather? Celtigar has abandoned me, the new Velaryon is six years old, and the new Sunglass sailed for Volantis after I burned his brother.” He made an angry gesture. “A few good men remain, it’s true. Ser Gilbert Farring holds Storm’s End for me still, with two hundred loyal men. Lord Morrigen, the Bastard of Nightsong, young Chyttering, my cousin Andrew . . . but I trust none of them as I trust you, my lord of Rainwood. You will be my Hand. It is you I want beside me for the battle.”
Another battle will be the end of all of us, thought Davos. Lord Alester saw that much true enough. “Your Grace asked for honest counsel. In honesty then . . . we lack the strength for another battle against the Lannisters.”
“It is the great battle His Grace is speaking of,” said a woman’s voice, rich with the accents of the east. Melisandre stood at the door in her red silks and shimmering satins, holding a covered silver dish in her hands. “These little wars are no more than a scuffle of children before what is to come. The one whose name may not be spoken is marshaling his power, Davos Seaworth, a power fell and evil and strong beyond measure. Soon comes the cold, and the night that never ends.” She placed the silver dish on the Painted Table. “Unless true men find the courage to fight it. Men whose hearts are fire.”
Stannis stared at the silver dish. “She has shown it to me, Lord Davos. In the flames.”
“You saw it, sire?” It was not like Stannis Baratheon to lie about such a thing.
“With mine own eyes. After the battle, when I was lost to despair, the Lady Melisandre bid me gaze into the hearthfire. The chimney was drawing strongly, and bits of ash were rising from the fire. I stared at them, feeling half a fool, but she bid me look deeper, and . . . the ashes were white, rising in the updraft, yet all at once it seemed as if they were falling. Snow, I thought. Then the sparks in the air seemed to circle, to become a ring of torches, and I was looking through the fire down on some high hill in a forest. The cinders had become men in black behind the torches, and there were shapes moving through the snow. For all the heat of the fire, I felt a cold so terrible I shivered, and when I did the sight was gone, the fire but a fire once again. But what I saw was real, I’d stake my kingdom on it.”
“And have,” said Melisandre.
The conviction in the king’s voice frightened Davos to the core. “A hill in a forest . . . shapes in the snow . . . I don’t . . .”
“It means that the battle is begun,” said Melisandre. “The sand is running through the glass more quickly now, and man’s hour on earth is almost done. We must act boldly, or all hope is lost. Westeros must unite beneath her one true king, the prince that was promised, Lord of Dragonstone and chosen of R’hllor.”
“R’hllor chooses queerly, then.” The king grimaced, as if he’d tasted something foul. “Why me, and not my brothers? Renly and his peach. In my dreams I see the juice running from his mouth, the blood from his throat. If he had done his duty by his brother, we would have smashed Lord Tywin. A victory even Robert could be proud of. Robert . . .” His teeth ground side to side. “He is in my dreams as well. Laughing. Drinking. Boasting. Those were the things he was best at. Those, and fighting. I never bested him at anything. The Lord of Light should have made Robert his champion. Why me?”
“Because you are a righteous man,” said Melisandre.
“A righteous man.” Stannis touched the covered silver platter with a finger. “With leeches.”
“Yes,” said Melisandre, “but I must tell you once more, this is not the way.”
“You swore it would work.” The king looked angry.
“It will . . . and it will not.”
“Which?”
“Both.”
“Speak sense to me, woman.”
“When the fires speak more plainly, so shall I. There is truth in the flames, but it is not always easy to see.” The great ruby at her throat drank fire from the glow of the brazier. “Give me the boy, Your Grace. It is the surer way. The better way. Give me the boy and I shall wake the stone dragon.”
“I have told you, no.”
“He is only one baseborn boy, against all the boys of Westeros, and all the girls as well. Against all the children that might ever be born, in all the kingdoms of the world.”
“The boy is innocent.”
“The boy defiled your marriage bed, else you would surely have sons of your own. He shamed you.”
“Robert did that. Not the boy. My daughter has grown fond of him. And he is mine own blood.”
“Your brother’s blood,” Melisandre said. “A king’s blood. Only a king’s blood can wake the stone dragon.”
Stannis ground his teeth. “I’ll hear no more of this. The dragons are done. The Targaryens tried to bring them back half a dozen times. And made fools of themselves, or corpses. Patchface is the only fool we need on this godsforsaken rock. You have the leeches. Do your work.”
Melisandre bowed her head stiffly, and said, “As my king commands.” Reaching up her left sleeve with her right hand, she flung a handful of powder into the brazier. The coals roared. As pale flames writhed atop them, the red woman retrieved the silver dish and brought it to the king. Davos watched her lift the lid. Beneath were three large black leeches, fat with blood.
The boy’s blood, Davos knew. A king’s blood.
Stannis stretched forth a hand, and his fingers closed around one of the leeches.
“Say the name,” Melisandre commanded.
The leech was twisting in the king’s grip, trying to attach itself to one of his fingers. “The usurper,” he said. “Joffrey Baratheon.” When he tossed the leech into the fire, it curled up like an autumn leaf amidst the coals, and burned.
Stannis grasped the second. “The usurper,” he declared, louder this time. “Balon Greyjoy.” He flipped it lightly onto the brazier, and its flesh split and cracked. The blood burst from it, hissing and smoking.
The last was in the king’s hand. This one he studied a moment as it writhed between his fingers. “The usurper,” he said at last. “Robb Stark.” And he threw it on the flames.

For a moment it seemed as though the king had not heard. Stannis showed no pleasure at the news, no anger, no disbelief, not even relief. He stared at his Painted Table with teeth clenched hard. “You are certain?” he asked.
“I am not seeing the body, no, Your Kingliness,” said Salladhor Saan. “Yet in the city, the lions prance and dance. The Red Wedding, the smallfolk are calling it. They swear Lord Frey had the boy’s head hacked off, sewed the head of his direwolf in its place, and nailed a crown about his ears. His lady mother was slain as well, and thrown naked in the river.”
At a wedding, thought Davos. As he sat at his slayer’s board, a guest beneath his roof. These Freys are cursed. He could smell the burning blood again, and hear the leech hissing and spitting on the brazier’s hot coals.
“It was the Lord’s wrath that slew him,” Ser Axell Florent declared. “It was the hand of R’hllor!”
“Praise the Lord of Light!” sang out Queen Selyse, a pinched thin hard woman with large ears and a hairy upper lip.
“Is the hand of R’hllor spotted and palsied?” asked Stannis. “This sounds more Walder Frey’s handiwork than any god’s.”
“R’hllor chooses such instruments as he requires.” The ruby at Melisandre’s throat shone redly. “His ways are mysterious, but no man may withstand his fiery will.”
“No man may withstand him!” the queen cried.
“Be quiet, woman. You are not at a nightfire now.” Stannis considered the Painted Table. “The wolf leaves no heirs, the kraken too many. The lions will devour them unless . . . Saan, I will require your fastest ships to carry envoys to the Iron Islands and White Harbor. I shall offer pardons.” The way he snapped his teeth showed how little he liked that word. “Full pardons, for all those who repent of treason and swear fealty to their rightful king. They must see . . .”
“They will not.” Melisandre’s voice was soft. “I am sorry, Your Grace. This is not an end. More false kings will soon rise to take up the crowns of those who’ve died.”
“More?” Stannis looked as though he would gladly have throttled her. “More usurpers? More traitors?”
“I have seen it in the flames.”
Queen Selyse went to the king’s side. “The Lord of Light sent Melisandre to guide you to your glory. Heed her, I beg you. R’hllor’s holy flames do not lie.”
“There are lies and lies, woman. Even when these flames speak truly, they are full of tricks, it seems to me.”
“An ant who hears the words of a king may not comprehend what he is saying,” Melisandre said, “and all men are ants before the fiery face of god. If sometimes I have mistaken a warning for a prophecy or a prophecy for a warning, the fault lies in the reader, not the book. But this I know for a certainty—envoys and pardons will not serve you now, no more than leeches. You must show the realm a sign. A sign that proves your power!”
“Power?” The king snorted. “I have thirteen hundred men on Dragonstone, another three hundred at Storm’s End.” His hand swept over the Painted Table. “The rest of Westeros is in the hands of my foes. I have no fleet but Salladhor Saan’s. No coin to hire sellswords. No prospect of plunder or glory to lure freeriders to my cause.”
“Lord husband,” said Queen Selyse, “you have more men than Aegon did three hundred years ago. All you lack are dragons.”
The look Stannis gave her was dark. “Nine mages crossed the sea to hatch Aegon the Third’s cache of eggs. Baelor the Blessed prayed over his for half a year. Aegon the Fourth built dragons of wood and iron. Aerion Brightflame drank wildfire to transform himself. The mages failed, King Baelor’s prayers went unanswered, the wooden dragons burned, and Prince Aerion died screaming.”
Queen Selyse was adamant. “None of these was the chosen of R’hllor. No red comet blazed across the heavens to herald their coming. None wielded Lightbringer, the red sword of heroes. And none of them paid the price. Lady Melisandre will tell you, my lord. Only death can pay for life.”
“The boy?” The king almost spat the words.
“The boy,” agreed the queen.
“The boy,” Ser Axell echoed.
“I was sick unto death of this wretched boy before he was even born,” the king complained. “His very name is a roaring in my ears and a dark cloud upon my soul.”
“Give the boy to me and you need never hear his name spoken again,” Melisandre promised.
No, but you’ll hear him screaming when she burns him. Davos held his tongue. It was wiser not to speak until the king commanded it.
“Give me the boy for R’hllor,” the red woman said, “and the ancient prophecy shall be fulfilled. Your dragon shall awaken and spread his stony wings. The kingdom shall be yours.”
Ser Axell went to one knee. “On bended knee I beg you, sire. Wake the stone dragon and let the traitors tremble. Like Aegon you begin as Lord of Dragonstone. Like Aegon you shall conquer. Let the false and the fickle feel your flames.”
“Your own wife begs as well, lord husband.” Queen Selyse went down on both knees before the king, hands clasped as if in prayer. “Robert and Delena defiled our bed and laid a curse upon our union. This boy is the foul fruit of their fornications. Lift his shadow from my womb and I will bear you many trueborn sons, I know it.” She threw her arms around his legs. “He is only one boy, born of your brother’s lust and my cousin’s shame.”
“He is mine own blood. Stop clutching me, woman.” King Stannis put a hand on her shoulder, awkwardly untangling himself from her grasp. “Perhaps Robert did curse our marriage bed. He swore to me that he never meant to shame me, that he was drunk and never knew which bedchamber he entered that night. But does it matter? The boy was not at fault, whatever the truth.”
Melisandre put her hand on the king’s arm. “The Lord of Light cherishes the innocent. There is no sacrifice more precious. From his king’s blood and his untainted fire, a dragon shall be born.”
Stannis did not pull away from Melisandre’s touch as he had from his queen’s. The red woman was all Selyse was not; young, full-bodied, and strangely beautiful, with her heart-shaped face, coppery hair, and unearthly red eyes. “It would be a wondrous thing to see stone come to life,” he admitted, grudging. “And to mount a dragon . . . I remember the first time my father took me to court, Robert had to hold my hand. I could not have been older than four, which would have made him five or six. We agreed afterward that the king had been as noble as the dragons were fearsome.” Stannis snorted. “Years later, our father told us that Aerys had cut himself on the throne that morning, so his Hand had taken his place. It was Tywin Lannister who’d so impressed us.” His fingers touched the surface of the table, tracing a path lightly across the varnished hills. “Robert took the skulls down when he donned the crown, but he could not bear to have them destroyed. Dragon wings over Westeros . . . there would be such a . . .”
“Your Grace!” Davos edged forward. “Might I speak?”
Stannis closed his mouth so hard his teeth snapped. “My lord of the Rainwood. Why do you think I made you Hand, if not to speak?” The king waved a hand. “Say what you will.”
Warrior, make me brave. “I know little of dragons and less of gods . . . but the queen spoke of curses. No man is as cursed as the kinslayer, in the eyes of gods and men.”
“There are no gods save R’hllor and the Other, whose name must not be spoken.” Melisandre’s mouth made a hard red line. “And small men curse what they cannot understand.”
“I am a small man,” Davos admitted, “so tell me why you need this boy Edric Storm to wake your great stone dragon, my lady.” He was determined to say the boy’s name as often as he could.
“Only death can pay for life, my lord. A great gift requires a great sacrifice.”
“Where is the greatness in a baseborn child?”
“He has kings’ blood in his veins. You have seen what even a little of that blood could do—”
“I saw you burn some leeches.”
“And two false kings are dead.”
“Robb Stark was murdered by Lord Walder of the Crossing, and we have heard that Balon Greyjoy fell from a bridge. Who did your leeches kill?”
“Do you doubt the power of R’hllor?”
No. Davos remembered too well the living shadow that had squirmed from out her womb that night beneath Storm’s End, its black hands pressing at her thighs. I must go carefully here, or some shadow may come seeking me as well. “Even an onion smuggler knows two onions from three. You are short a king, my lady.”
Stannis gave a snort of laughter. “He has you there, my lady. Two is not three.”
“To be sure, Your Grace. One king might die by chance, even two . . . but three? If Joffrey should die in the midst of all his power, surrounded by his armies and his Kingsguard, would not that show the power of the Lord at work?”
“It might.” The king spoke as if he grudged each word.
“Or not.” Davos did his best to hide his fear.
“Joffrey shall die,” Queen Selyse declared, serene in her confidence.
“It may be that he is dead already,” Ser Axell added.
Stannis looked at them with annoyance. “Are you trained crows, to croak at me in turns? Enough.”
“Husband, hear me—” the queen entreated.
“Why? Two is not three. Kings can count as well as smugglers. You may go.” Stannis turned his back on them.
Melisandre helped the queen to her feet. Selyse swept stiffly from the chamber, the red woman trailing behind. Ser Axell lingered long enough to give Davos one last look. An ugly look on an ugly face, he thought as he met the stare.
After the others had gone, Davos cleared his throat. The king looked up. “Why are you still here?”
“Sire, about Edric Storm . . .”
Stannis made a sharp gesture. “Spare me.”
Davos persisted. “Your daughter takes her lessons with him, and plays with him every day in Aegon’s Garden.”
“I know that.”
“Her heart would break if anything ill should—”
“I know that as well.”
“If you would only see him—”
“I have seen him. He looks like Robert. Aye, and worships him. Shall I tell him how often his beloved father ever gave him a thought? My brother liked the making of children well enough, but after birth they were a bother.”
“He asks after you every day, he—”
“You are making me angry, Davos. I will hear no more of this bastard boy.”
“His name is Edric Storm, sire.”
“I know his name. Was there ever a name so apt? It proclaims his bastardy, his high birth, and the turmoil he brings with him. Edric Storm. There, I have said it. Are you satisfied, my lord Hand?”
“Edric—” he started.
“—is one boy! He may be the best boy who ever drew breath and it would not matter. My duty is to the realm.” His hand swept across the Painted Table. “How many boys dwell in Westeros? How many girls? How many men, how many women? The darkness will devour them all, she says. The night that never ends. She talks of prophecies . . . a hero reborn in the sea, living dragons hatched from dead stone . . . she speaks of signs and swears they point to me. I never asked for this, no more than I asked to be king. Yet dare I disregard her?” He ground his teeth. “We do not choose our destinies. Yet we must . . . we must do our duty, no? Great or small, we must do our duty. Melisandre swears that she has seen me in her flames, facing the dark with Lightbringer raised on high. Lightbringer!” Stannis gave a derisive snort. “It glimmers prettily, I’ll grant you, but on the Blackwater this magic sword served me no better than any common steel. A dragon would have turned that battle. Aegon once stood here as I do, looking down on this table. Do you think we would name him Aegon the Conqueror today if he had not had dragons?”
“Your Grace,” said Davos, “the cost . . .”
“I know the cost! Last night, gazing into that hearth, I saw things in the flames as well. I saw a king, a crown of fire on his brows, burning . . . burning, Davos. His own crown consumed his flesh and turned him into ash. Do you think I need Melisandre to tell me what that means? Or you?” The king moved, so his shadow fell upon King’s Landing. “If Joffrey should die . . . what is the life of one bastard boy against a kingdom?”
“Everything,” said Davos, softly.
Stannis looked at him, jaw clenched. “Go,” the king said at last, “before you talk yourself back into the dungeon.”
Sometimes the storm winds blow so strong a man has no choice but to furl his sails. “Aye, Your Grace.” Davos bowed, but Stannis had seemingly forgotten him already.
It was chilly in the yard when he left the Stone Drum. A wind blew briskly from the east, making the banners snap and flap noisily along the walls. Davos could smell salt in the air. The sea. He loved that smell. It made him want to walk a deck again, to raise his canvas and sail off south to Marya and his two small ones. He thought of them most every day now, and even more at night. Part of him wanted nothing so much as to take Devan and go home. I cannot. Not yet. I am a lord now, and the King’s Hand, I must not fail him.
He raised his eyes to gaze up at the walls. In place of merlons, a thousand grotesques and gargoyles looked down on him, each different from all the others; wyverns, griffins, demons, manticores, minotaurs, basilisks, hellhounds, cockatrices, and a thousand queerer creatures sprouted from the castle’s battlements as if they’d grown there. And the dragons were everywhere. The Great Hall was a dragon lying on its belly. Men entered through its open mouth. The kitchens were a dragon curled up in a ball, with the smoke and steam of the ovens vented through its nostrils. The towers were dragons hunched above the walls or poised for flight; the Windwyrm seemed to scream defiance, while Sea Dragon Tower gazed serenely out across the waves. Smaller dragons framed the gates. Dragon claws emerged from walls to grasp at torches, great stone wings enfolded the smith and armory, and tails formed arches, bridges, and exterior stairs.
Davos had often heard it said that the wizards of Valyria did not cut and chisel as common masons did, but worked stone with fire and magic as a potter might work clay. But now he wondered. What if they were real dragons, somehow turned to stone?
“If the red woman brings them to life, the castle will come crashing down, I am thinking. What kind of dragons are full of rooms and stairs and furniture? And windows. And chimneys. And privy shafts.”
Davos turned to find Salladhor Saan beside him. “Does this mean you have forgiven my treachery, Salla?”
The old pirate wagged a finger at him. “Forgiving, yes. Forgetting, no. All that good gold on Claw Isle that might have been mine, it makes me old and tired to think of it. When I die impoverished, my wives and concubines will curse you, Onion Lord. Lord Celtigar had many fine wines that now I am not tasting, a sea eagle he had trained to fly from the wrist, and a magic horn to summon krakens from the deep. Very useful such a horn would be, to pull down Tyroshi and other vexing creatures. But do I have this horn to blow? No, because the king made my old friend his Hand.” He slipped his arm through Davos’s and said, “The queen’s men love you not, old friend. I am hearing that a certain Hand has been making friends of his own. This is true, yes?”
You hear too much, you old pirate. A smuggler had best know men as well as tides, or he would not live to smuggle long. The queen’s men might remain fervent followers of the Lord of Light, but the lesser folk of Dragonstone were drifting back to the gods they’d known all their lives. They said Stannis was ensorceled, that Melisandre had turned him away from the Seven to bow before some demon out of shadow, and . . . worst sin of all . . . that she and her god had failed him. And there were knights and lordlings who felt the same. Davos had sought them out, choosing them with the same care with which he’d once picked his crews. Ser Gerald Gower fought stoutly on the Blackwater, but afterward had been heard to say that R’hllor must be a feeble god to let his followers be chased off by a dwarf and a dead man. Ser Andrew Estermont was the king’s cousin, and had served as his squire years ago. The Bastard of Nightsong had commanded the rearguard that allowed Stannis to reach the safety of Salladhor Saan’s galleys, but he worshiped the Warrior with a faith as fierce as he was. King’s men, not queen’s men. But it would not do to boast of them.
“A certain Lysene pirate once told me that a good smuggler stays out of sight,” Davos replied carefully. “Black sails, muffled oars, and a crew that knows how to hold their tongues.”
The Lyseni laughed. “A crew with no tongues is even better. Big strong mutes who cannot read or write.” But then he grew more somber. “But I am glad to know that someone watches your back, old friend. Will the king give the boy to the red priestess, do you think? One little dragon could end this great big war.”
Old habit made him reach for his luck, but his fingerbones no longer hung about his neck, and he found nothing. “He will not do it,” said Davos. “He could not harm his own blood.”
“Lord Renly will be glad to hear this.”
“Renly was a traitor in arms. Edric Storm is innocent of any crime. His Grace is a just man.”
Salla shrugged. “We shall be seeing. Or you shall. For myself, I am returning to sea. Even now, rascally smugglers may be sailing across the Blackwater Bay, hoping to avoid paying their lord’s lawful duties.” He slapped Davos on the back. “Take care. You with your mute friends. You are grown so very great now, yet the higher a man climbs the farther he has to fall.”
Davos reflected on those words as he climbed the steps of Sea Dragon Tower to the maester’s chambers below the rookery. He did not need Salla to tell him that he had risen too high. I cannot read, I cannot write, the lords despise me, I know nothing of ruling, how can I be the King’s Hand? I belong on the deck of a ship, not in a castle tower.
He had said as much to Maester Pylos. “You are a notable captain,” the maester replied. “A captain rules his ship, does he not? He must navigate treacherous waters, set his sails to catch the rising wind, know when a storm is coming and how best to weather it. This is much the same.”
Pylos meant it kindly, but his assurances rang hollow. “It is not at all the same!” Davos had protested. “A kingdom’s not a ship . . . and a good thing, or this kingdom would be sinking. I know wood and rope and water, yes, but how will that serve me now? Where do I find the wind to blow King Stannis to his throne?”
The maester laughed at that. “And there you have it, my lord. Words are wind, you know, and you’ve blown mine away with your good sense. His Grace knows what he has in you, I think.”
“Onions,” said Davos glumly. “That is what he has in me. The King’s Hand should be a highborn lord, someone wise and learned, a battle commander or a great knight . . .”
“Ser Ryam Redwyne was the greatest knight of his day, and one of the worst Hands ever to serve a king. Septon Murmison’s prayers worked miracles, but as Hand he soon had the whole realm praying for his death. Lord Butterwell was renowned for wit, Myles Smallwood for courage, Ser Otto Hightower for learning, yet they failed as Hands, every one. As for birth, the dragonkings oft chose Hands from amongst their own blood, with results as various as Baelor Breakspear and Maegor the Cruel. Against this, you have Septon Barth, the blacksmith’s son the Old King plucked from the Red Keep’s library, who gave the realm forty years of peace and plenty.” Pylos smiled. “Read your history, Lord Davos, and you will see that your doubts are groundless.”
“How can I read history, when I cannot read?”
“Any man can read, my lord,” said Maester Pylos. “There is no magic needed, nor high birth. I am teaching the art to your son, at the king’s command. Let me teach you as well.”
It was a kindly offer, and not one that Davos could refuse. And so every day he repaired to the maester’s chambers high atop Sea Dragon Tower, to frown over scrolls and parchments and great leather tomes and try to puzzle out a few more words. His efforts often gave him headaches, and made him feel as big a fool as Patchface besides. His son Devan was not yet twelve, yet he was well ahead of his father, and for Princess Shireen and Edric Storm reading seemed as natural as breathing. When it came to books, Davos was more a child than any of them. Yet he persisted. He was the King’s Hand now, and a King’s Hand should read.
The narrow twisting steps of Sea Dragon Tower had been a sore trial to Maester Cressen after he broke his hip. Davos still found himself missing the old man. He thought Stannis must as well. Pylos seemed clever and diligent and well-meaning, but he was so young, and the king did not confide in him as he had in Cressen. The old man had been with Stannis so long . . . Until he ran afoul of Melisandre, and died for it.
At the top of the steps Davos heard a soft jingle of bells that could only herald Patchface. The princess’s fool was waiting outside the maester’s door for her like a faithful hound. Dough-soft and slump-shouldered, his broad face tattooed in a motley pattern of red and green squares, Patchface wore a helm made of a rack of deer antlers strapped to a tin bucket. A dozen bells hung from the tines and rang when he moved . . . which meant constantly, since the fool seldom stood still. He jingled and jangled his way everywhere he went; small wonder that Pylos had exiled him from Shireen’s lessons. “Under the sea the old fish eat the young fish,” the fool muttered at Davos. He bobbed his head, and his bells clanged and chimed and sang. “I know, I know, oh oh oh.”
“Up here the young fish teach the old fish,” said Davos, who never felt so ancient as when he sat down to try and read. It might have been different if aged Maester Cressen had been the one teaching him, but Pylos was young enough to be his son.
He found the maester seated at his long wooden table covered with books and scrolls, across from the three children. Princess Shireen sat between the two boys. Even now Davos could take great pleasure in the sight of his own blood keeping company with a princess and a king’s bastard. Devan will be a lord now, not merely a knight. The Lord of the Rainwood. Davos took more pride in that than in wearing the title himself. He reads too. He reads and he writes, as if he had been born to it. Pylos had naught but praise for his diligence, and the master-at-arms said Devan was showing promise with sword and lance as well. And he is a godly lad, too. “My brothers have ascended to the Hall of Light, to sit beside the Lord,” Devan had said when his father told him how his four elder brothers had died. “I will pray for them at the nightfires, and for you as well, Father, so you might walk in the Light of the Lord till the end of your days.”
“Good morrow to you, Father,” the boy greeted him. He looks so much like Dale did at his age, Davos thought. His eldest had never dressed so fine as Devan in his squire’s raiment, to be sure, but they shared the same square plain face, the same forthright brown eyes, the same thin brown flyaway hair. Devan’s cheeks and chin were dusted with blond hair, a fuzz that would have shamed a proper peach, though the boy was fiercely proud of his “beard.” Just as Dale was proud of his, once. Devan was the oldest of the three children at the table.
Yet Edric Storm was three inches taller and broader in the chest and shoulders. He was his father’s son in that; nor did he ever miss a morning’s work with sword and shield. Those old enough to have known Robert and Renly as children said that the bastard boy had more of their look than Stannis had ever shared; the coal-black hair, the deep blue eyes, the mouth, the jaw, the cheekbones. Only his ears reminded you that his mother had been a Florent.
“Yes, good morrow, my lord,” Edric echoed. The boy could be fierce and proud, but the maesters and castellans and masters-at-arms who’d raised him had schooled him well in courtesy. “Do you come from my uncle? How fares His Grace?”
“Well,” Davos lied. If truth be told, the king had a haggard, haunted look about him, but he saw no need to burden the boy with his fears. “I hope I have not disturbed your lesson.”
“We had just finished, my lord,” Maester Pylos said.
“We were reading about King Daeron the First.” Princess Shireen was a sad, sweet, gentle child, far from pretty. Stannis had given her his square jaw and Selyse her Florent ears, and the gods in their cruel wisdom had seen fit to compound her homeliness by afflicting her with greyscale in the cradle. The disease had left one cheek and half her neck grey and cracked and hard, though it had spared both her life and her sight. “He went to war and conquered Dorne. The Young Dragon, they called him.”
“He worshiped false gods,” said Devan, “but he was a great king otherwise, and very brave in battle.”
“He was,” agreed Edric Storm, “but my father was braver. The Young Dragon never won three battles in a day.”
The princess looked at him wide-eyed. “Did Uncle Robert win three battles in a day?”
The bastard nodded. “It was when he’d first come home to call his banners. Lords Grandison, Cafferen, and Fell planned to join their strength at Summerhall and march on Storm’s End, but he learned their plans from an informer and rode at once with all his knights and squires. As the plotters came up on Summerhall one by one, he defeated each of them in turn before they could join up with the others. He slew Lord Fell in single combat and captured his son Silveraxe.”
Devan looked to Pylos. “Is that how it happened?”
“I said so, didn’t I?” Edric Storm said before the maester could reply. “He smashed all three of them, and fought so bravely that Lord Grandison and Lord Cafferen became his men afterward, and Silveraxe too. No one ever beat my father.”
“Edric, you ought not boast,” Maester Pylos said. “King Robert suffered defeats like any other man. Lord Tyrell bested him at Ashford, and he lost many a tourney tilt as well.”
“He won more than he lost, though. And he killed Prince Rhaegar on the Trident.”
“That he did,” the maester agreed. “But now I must give my attention to Lord Davos, who has waited so patiently. We will read more of King Daeron’s Conquest of Dorne on the morrow.”
Princess Shireen and the boys said their farewells courteously. When they had taken their leaves, Maester Pylos moved closer to Davos. “My lord, perhaps you would like to try a bit of Conquest of Dorne as well?” He slid the slender leather-bound book across the table. “King Daeron wrote with an elegant simplicity, and his history is rich with blood, battle, and bravery. Your son is quite engrossed.”
“My son is not quite twelve. I am the King’s Hand. Give me another letter, if you would.”
“As you wish, my lord.” Maester Pylos rummaged about his table, unrolling and then discarding various scraps of parchment. “There are no new letters. Perhaps an old one . . .”
Davos enjoyed a good story as well as any man, but Stannis had not named him Hand for his enjoyment, he felt. His first duty was to help his king rule, and for that he must needs understand the words the ravens brought. The best way to learn a thing was to do it, he had found; sails or scrolls, it made no matter.
“This might serve our purpose.” Pylos passed him a letter.
Davos flattened down the little square of crinkled parchment and squinted at the tiny crabbed letters. Reading was hard on the eyes, that much he had learned early. Sometimes he wondered if the Citadel offered a champion’s purse to the maester who wrote the smallest hand. Pylos had laughed at the notion, but . . . 
“To the . . . five kings,” read Davos, hesitating briefly over five, which he did not often see written out. “The king . . . be . . . the king . . . beware?”
“Beyond,” the maester corrected.
Davos grimaced. “The King beyond the Wall comes . . . comes south. He leads a . . . a . . . fast . . .”
“Vast.”
“. . . a vast host of wil . . . wild . . . wildlings. Lord M . . . Mmmor . . . Mormont sent a . . . raven from the . . . ha . . . ha . . .”
“Haunted. The haunted forest.” Pylos underlined the words with the point of his finger.
“. . . the haunted forest. He is . . . under a . . . attack?”
“Yes.”
Pleased, he plowed onward. “Oth . . . other birds have come since, with no words. We . . . fear . . . Mormont slain with all . . . with all his . . . stench . . . no, strength. We fear Mormont slain with all his strength . . .” Davos suddenly realized just what he was reading. He turned the letter over, and saw that the wax that had sealed it had been black. “This is from the Night’s Watch. Maester, has King Stannis seen this letter?”
“I brought it to Lord Alester when it first arrived. He was the Hand then. I believed he discussed it with the queen. When I asked him if he wished to send a reply, he told me not to be a fool. ‘His Grace lacks the men to fight his own battles, he has none to waste on wildlings,’ he said to me.”
That was true enough. And this talk of five kings would certainly have angered Stannis. “Only a starving man begs bread from a beggar,” he muttered.
“Pardon, my lord?”
“Something my wife said once.” Davos drummed his shortened fingers against the tabletop. The first time he had seen the Wall he had been younger than Devan, serving aboard the Cobblecat under Roro Uhoris, a Tyroshi known up and down the narrow sea as the Blind Bastard, though he was neither blind nor baseborn. Roro had sailed past Skagos into the Shivering Sea, visiting a hundred little coves that had never seen a trading ship before. He brought steel; swords, axes, helms, good chainmail hauberks, to trade for furs, ivory, amber, and obsidian. When the Cobblecat turned back south her holds were stuffed, but in the Bay of Seals three black galleys came out to herd her into Eastwatch. They lost their cargo and the Bastard lost his head, for the crime of trading weapons to the wildlings.
Davos had traded at Eastwatch in his smuggling days. The black brothers made hard enemies but good customers, for a ship with the right cargo. But while he might have taken their coin, he had never forgotten how the Blind Bastard’s head had rolled across the Cobblecat’s deck. “I met some wildlings when I was a boy,” he told Maester Pylos. “They were fair thieves but bad hagglers. One made off with our cabin girl. All in all, they seemed men like any other men, some fair, some foul.”
“Men are men,” Maester Pylos agreed. “Shall we return to our reading, my lord Hand?”
I am the Hand of the King, yes. Stannis might be the King of Westeros in name, but in truth he was the King of the Painted Table. He held Dragonstone and Storm’s End, and had an ever-more-uneasy alliance with Salladhor Saan, but that was all. How could the Watch have looked to him for help? They may not know how weak he is, how lost his cause. “King Stannis never saw this letter, you are quite certain? Nor Melisandre?”
“No. Should I bring it to them? Even now?”
“No,” Davos said at once. “You did your duty when you brought it to Lord Alester.” If Melisandre knew of this letter . . . What was it she had said? One whose name may not be spoken is marshaling his power, Davos Seaworth. Soon comes the cold, and the night that never ends . . . And Stannis had seen a vision in the flames, a ring of torches in the snow with terror all around.
“My lord, are you unwell?” asked Pylos.
I am frightened, Maester, he might have said. Davos was remembering a tale Salladhor Saan had told him, of how Azor Ahai tempered Lightbringer by thrusting it through the heart of the wife he loved. He slew his wife to fight the dark. If Stannis is Azor Ahai come again, does that mean Edric Storm must play the part of Nissa Nissa? “I was thinking, Maester. My pardons.” What harm if some wildling king conquers the north? It was not as though Stannis held the north. His Grace could scarcely be expected to defend people who refused to acknowledge him as king. “Give me another letter,” he said abruptly. “This one is too . . .”
“. . . difficult?” suggested Pylos.
Soon comes the cold, whispered Melisandre, and the night that never ends. “Troubling,” said Davos. “Too . . . troubling. A different letter, please.”

Their voices rose like cinders, swirling up into purple evening sky. “Lead us from the darkness, O my Lord. Fill our hearts with fire, so we may walk your shining path.”
The nightfire burned against the gathering dark, a great bright beast whose shifting orange light threw shadows twenty feet tall across the yard. All along the walls of Dragonstone the army of gargoyles and grotesques seemed to stir and shift.
Davos looked down from an arched window in the gallery above. He watched Melisandre lift her arms, as if to embrace the shivering flames. “R’hllor,” she sang in a voice loud and clear, “you are the light in our eyes, the fire in our hearts, the heat in our loins. Yours is the sun that warms our days, yours the stars that guard us in the dark of night.”
“Lord of Light, defend us. The night is dark and full of terrors.” Queen Selyse led the responses, her pinched face full of fervor. King Stannis stood beside her, jaw clenched hard, the points of his red-gold crown shimmering whenever he moved his head. He is with them, but not of them, Davos thought. Princess Shireen was between them, the mottled grey patches on her face and neck almost black in the firelight.
“Lord of Light, protect us,” the queen sang. The king did not respond with the others. He was staring into the flames. Davos wondered what he saw there. Another vision of the war to come? Or something closer to home?
“R’hllor who gave us breath, we thank you,” sang Melisandre. “R’hllor who gave us day, we thank you.”
“We thank you for the sun that warms us,” Queen Selyse and the other worshipers replied. “We thank you for the stars that watch us. We thank you for our hearths and for our torches, that keep the savage dark at bay.” There were fewer voices saying the responses than there had been the night before, it seemed to Davos; fewer faces flushed with orange light about the fire. But would there be fewer still on the morrow . . . or more?
The voice of Ser Axell Florent rang loud as a trumpet. He stood barrel-chested and bandy-legged, the firelight washing his face like a monstrous orange tongue. Davos wondered if Ser Axell would thank him, after. The work they did tonight might well make him the King’s Hand, as he dreamed.
Melisandre cried, “We thank you for Stannis, by your grace our king. We thank you for the pure white fire of his goodness, for the red sword of justice in his hand, for the love he bears his leal people. Guide him and defend him, R’hllor, and grant him strength to smite his foes.”
“Grant him strength,” answered Queen Selyse, Ser Axell, Devan, and the rest. “Grant him courage. Grant him wisdom.”
When he was a boy, the septons had taught Davos to pray to the Crone for wisdom, to the Warrior for courage, to the Smith for strength. But it was the Mother he prayed to now, to keep his sweet son Devan safe from the red woman’s demon god.
“Lord Davos? We’d best be about it.” Ser Andrew touched his elbow gently. “My lord?”
The title still rang queer in his ears, yet Davos turned away from the window. “Aye. It’s time.” Stannis, Melisandre, and the queen’s men would be at their prayers an hour or more. The red priests lit their fires every day at sunset, to thank R’hllor for the day just ending, and beg him to send his sun back on the morrow to banish the gathering darkness. A smuggler must know the tides and when to seize them. That was all he was at the end of the day; Davos the smuggler. His maimed hand rose to his throat for his luck, and found nothing. He snatched it down and walked a bit more quickly.
His companions kept pace, matching their strides to his own. The Bastard of Nightsong had a pox-ravaged face and an air of tattered chivalry; Ser Gerald Gower was broad, bluff, and blond; Ser Andrew Estermont stood a head taller, with a spade-shaped beard and shaggy brown eye-brows. They were all good men in their own ways, Davos thought. And they will all be dead men soon, if this night’s work goes badly.
“Fire is a living thing,” the red woman told him, when he asked her to teach him how to see the future in the flames. “It is always moving, always changing . . . like a book whose letters dance and shift even as you try to read them. It takes years of training to see the shapes beyond the flames, and more years still to learn to tell the shapes of what will be from what may be or what was. Even then it comes hard, hard. You do not understand that, you men of the sunset lands.” Davos asked her then how it was that Ser Axell had learned the trick of it so quickly, but to that she only smiled enigmatically and said, “Any cat may stare into a fire and see red mice at play.”
He had not lied to his king’s men, about that or any of it. “The red woman may see what we intend,” he warned them.
“We should start by killing her, then,” urged Lewys the Fishwife. “I know a place where we could waylay her, four of us with sharp swords . . .”
“You’d doom us all,” said Davos. “Maester Cressen tried to kill her, and she knew at once. From her flames, I’d guess. It seems to me that she is very quick to sense any threat to her own person, but surely she cannot see everything. If we ignore her, perhaps we might escape her notice.”
“There is no honor in hiding and sneaking,” objected Ser Triston of Tally Hill, who had been a Sunglass man before Lord Guncer went to Melisandre’s fires.
“Is it so honorable to burn?” Davos asked him. “You saw Lord Sunglass die. Is that what you want? I don’t need men of honor now. I need smugglers. Are you with me, or no?”
They were. Gods be good, they were.
Maester Pylos was leading Edric Storm through his sums when Davos pushed open the door. Ser Andrew was close behind him; the others had been left to guard the steps and cellar door. The maester broke off. “That will be enough for now, Edric.”
The boy was puzzled by the intrusion. “Lord Davos, Ser Andrew. We were doing sums.”
Ser Andrew smiled. “I hated sums when I was your age, coz.”
“I don’t mind them so much. I like history best, though. It’s full of tales.”
“Edric,” said Maester Pylos, “run and get your cloak now. You’re to go with Lord Davos.”
“I am?” Edric got to his feet. “Where are we going?” His mouth set stubbornly. “I won’t go pray to the Lord of Light. I am a Warrior’s man, like my father.”
“We know,” Davos said. “Come, lad, we must not dawdle.”
Edric donned a thick hooded cloak of undyed wool. Maester Pylos helped him fasten it, and pulled the hood up to shadow his face. “Are you coming with us, Maester?” the boy asked.
“No.” Pylos touched the chain of many metals he wore about his neck. “My place is here on Dragonstone. Go with Lord Davos now, and do as he says. He is the King’s Hand, remember. What did I tell you about the King’s Hand?”
“The Hand speaks with the king’s voice.”
The young maester smiled. “That’s so. Go now.”
Davos had been uncertain of Pylos. Perhaps he resented him for taking old Cressen’s place. But now he could only admire the man’s courage. This could mean his life as well.
Outside the maester’s chambers, Ser Gerald Gower waited by the steps. Edric Storm looked at him curiously. As they made their descent he asked, “Where are we going, Lord Davos?”
“To the water. A ship awaits you.”
The boy stopped suddenly. “A ship?”
“One of Salladhor Saan’s. Salla is a good friend of mine.”
“I shall go with you, Cousin,” Ser Andrew assured him. “There’s nothing to be frightened of.”
“I am not frightened,” Edric said indignantly. “Only . . . is Shireen coming too?”
“No,” said Davos. “The princess must remain here with her father and mother.”
“I have to see her then,” Edric explained. “To say my farewells. Otherwise she’ll be sad.”
Not so sad as if she sees you burn. “There is no time,” Davos said. “I will tell the princess that you were thinking of her. And you can write her, when you get to where you’re going.”
The boy frowned. “Are you sure I must go? Why would my uncle send me from Dragonstone? Did I displease him? I never meant to.” He got that stubborn look again. “I want to see my uncle. I want to see King Stannis.”
Ser Andrew and Ser Gerald exchanged a look. “There’s no time for that, Cousin,” Ser Andrew said.
“I want to see him!” Edric insisted, louder.
“He does not want to see you.” Davos had to say something, to get the boy moving. “I am his Hand, I speak with his voice. Must I go to the king and tell him that you would not do as you were told? Do you know how angry that will make him? Have you ever seen your uncle angry?” He pulled off his glove and showed the boy the four fingers that Stannis had shortened. “I have.”
It was all lies; there had been no anger in Stannis Baratheon when he cut the ends off his onion knight’s fingers, only an iron sense of justice. But Edric Storm had not been born then, and could not know that. And the threat had the desired effect. “He should not have done that,” the boy said, but he let Davos take him by the hand and draw him down the steps.
The Bastard of Nightsong joined them at the cellar door. They walked quickly, across a shadowed yard and down some steps, under the stone tail of a frozen dragon. Lewys the Fishwife and Omer Blackberry waited at the postern gate, two guards bound and trussed at their feet. “The boat?” Davos asked them.
“It’s there,” Lewys said. “Four oarsmen. The galley is anchored just past the point. Mad Prendos.”
Davos chuckled. A ship named after a madman. Yes, that’s fitting. Salla had a streak of the pirate’s black humor.
He went to one knee before Edric Storm. “I must leave you now,” he said. “There’s a boat waiting, to row you out to a galley. Then it’s off across the sea. You are Robert’s son so I know you will be brave, no matter what happens.”
“I will. Only . . .” The boy hesitated.
“Think of this as an adventure, my lord.” Davos tried to sound hale and cheerful. “It’s the start of your life’s great adventure. May the Warrior defend you.”
“And may the Father judge you justly, Lord Davos.” The boy went with his cousin Ser Andrew out the postern gate. The others followed, all but the Bastard of Nightsong. May the Father judge me justly, Davos thought ruefully. But it was the king’s judgment that concerned him now.
“These two?” asked Ser Rolland of the guards, when he had closed and barred the gate.
“Drag them into a cellar,” said Davos. “You can cut them free when Edric’s safely under way.”
The Bastard gave a curt nod. There were no more words to say; the easy part was done. Davos pulled his glove on, wishing he had not lost his luck. He had been a better man and a braver one with that bag of bones around his neck. He ran his shortened fingers through thinning brown hair, and wondered if it needed to be cut. He must look presentable when he stood before the king.
Dragonstone had never seemed so dark and fearsome. He walked slowly, his footsteps echoing off black walls and dragons. Stone dragons who will never wake, I pray. The Stone Drum loomed huge ahead of him. The guards at the door uncrossed their spears as he approached. Not for the onion knight, but for the King’s Hand. Davos was the Hand going in, at least. He wondered what he would be coming out. If I ever do . . . 
The steps seemed longer and steeper than before, or perhaps it was just that he was tired. The Mother never made me for tasks like this. He had risen too high and too fast, and up here on the mountain the air was too thin for him to breathe. As a boy he’d dreamed of riches, but that was long ago. Later, grown, all he had wanted was a few acres of good land, a hall to grow old in, a better life for his sons. The Blind Bastard used to tell him that a clever smuggler did not overreach, nor draw too much attention to himself. A few acres, a timbered roof, a “ser” before my name, I should have been content. If he survived this night, he would take Devan and sail home to Cape Wrath and his gentle Marya. We will grieve together for our dead sons, raise the living ones to be good men, and speak no more of kings.
The Chamber of the Painted Table was dark and empty when Davos entered; the king would still be at the nightfire, with Melisandre and the queen’s men. He knelt and made a fire in the hearth, to drive the chill from the round chamber and chase the shadows back into their corners. Then he went around the room to each window in turn, opening the heavy velvet curtains and unlatching the wooden shutters. The wind came in, strong with the smell of salt and sea, and pulled at his plain brown cloak.
At the north window, he leaned against the sill for a breath of the cold night air, hoping to catch a glimpse of Mad Prendos raising sail, but the sea seemed black and empty as far as the eye could see. Is she gone already? He could only pray that she was, and the boy with her. A half moon was sliding in and out amongst thin high clouds, and Davos could see familiar stars. There was the Galley, sailing west; there the Crone’s Lantern, four bright stars that enclosed a golden haze. The clouds hid most of the Ice Dragon, all but the bright blue eye that marked due north. The sky is full of smugglers’ stars. They were old friends, those stars; Davos hoped that meant good luck.
But when he lowered his gaze from the sky to the castle ramparts, he was not so certain. The wings of the stone dragons cast great black shadows in the light from the nightfire. He tried to tell himself that they were no more than carvings, cold and lifeless. This was their place, once. A place of dragons and dragonlords, the seat of House Targaryen. The Targaryens were the blood of old Valyria . . . 
The wind sighed through the chamber, and in the hearth the flames gusted and swirled. He listened to the logs crackle and spit. When Davos left the window his shadow went before him, tall and thin, and fell across the Painted Table like a sword. And there he stood for a long time, waiting. He heard their boots on the stone steps as they ascended. The king’s voice went before him. “. . . is not three,” he was saying.
“Three is three,” came Melisandre’s answer. “I swear to you, Your Grace, I saw him die and heard his mother’s wail.”
“In the nightfire.” Stannis and Melisandre came through the door together. “The flames are full of tricks. What is, what will be, what may be. You cannot tell me for a certainty . . .”
“Your Grace.” Davos stepped forward. “Lady Melisandre saw it true. Your nephew Joffrey is dead.”
If the king was surprised to find him at the Painted Table, he gave no sign. “Lord Davos,” he said. “He was not my nephew. Though for years I believed he was.”
“He choked on a morsel of food at his wedding feast,” Davos said. “It may be that he was poisoned.”
“He is the third,” said Melisandre.
“I can count, woman.” Stannis walked along the table, past Oldtown and the Arbor, up toward the Shield Islands and the mouth of the Mander. “Weddings have become more perilous than battles, it would seem. Who was the poisoner? Is it known?”
“His uncle, it’s said. The Imp.”
Stannis ground his teeth. “A dangerous man. I learned that on the Blackwater. How do you come by this report?”
“The Lyseni still trade at King’s Landing. Salladhor Saan has no reason to lie to me.”
“I suppose not.” The king ran his fingers across the table. “Joffrey . . . I remember once, this kitchen cat . . . the cooks were wont to feed her scraps and fish heads. One told the boy that she had kittens in her belly, thinking he might want one. Joffrey opened up the poor thing with a dagger to see if it were true. When he found the kittens, he brought them to show to his father. Robert hit the boy so hard I thought he’d killed him.” The king took off his crown and placed it on the table. “Dwarf or leech, this killer served the kingdom well. They must send for me now.”
“They will not,” said Melisandre. “Joffrey has a brother.”
“Tommen.” The king said the name grudgingly.
“They will crown Tommen, and rule in his name.”
Stannis made a fist. “Tommen is gentler than Joffrey, but born of the same incest. Another monster in the making. Another leech upon the land. Westeros needs a man’s hand, not a child’s.”
Melisandre moved closer. “Save them, sire. Let me wake the stone dragons. Three is three. Give me the boy.”
“Edric Storm,” Davos said.
Stannis rounded on him in a cold fury. “I know his name. Spare me your reproaches. I like this no more than you do, but my duty is to the realm. My duty . . .” He turned back to Melisandre. “You swear there is no other way? Swear it on your life, for I promise, you shall die by inches if you lie.”
“You are he who must stand against the Other. The one whose coming was prophesied five thousand years ago. The red comet was your herald. You are the prince that was promised, and if you fail the world fails with you.” Melisandre went to him, her red lips parted, her ruby throbbing. “Give me this boy,” she whispered, “and I will give you your kingdom.”
“He can’t,” said Davos. “Edric Storm is gone.”
“Gone?” Stannis turned. “What do you mean, gone?”
“He is aboard a Lyseni galley, safely out to sea.” Davos watched Melisandre’s pale, heart-shaped face. He saw the flicker of dismay there, the sudden uncertainty. She did not see it!
The king’s eyes were dark blue bruises in the hollows of his face. “The bastard was taken from Dragonstone without my leave? A galley, you say? If that Lysene pirate thinks to use the boy to squeeze gold from me—”
“This is your Hand’s work, sire.” Melisandre gave Davos a knowing look. “You will bring him back, my lord. You will.”
“The boy is out of my reach,” said Davos. “And out of your reach as well, my lady.”
Her red eyes made him squirm. “I should have left you to the dark, ser. Do you know what you have done?”
“My duty.”
“Some might call it treason.” Stannis went to the window to stare out into the night. Is he looking for the ship? “I raised you up from dirt, Davos.” He sounded more tired than angry. “Was loyalty too much to hope for?”
“Four of my sons died for you on the Blackwater. I might have died myself. You have my loyalty, always.” Davos Seaworth had thought long and hard about the words he said next; he knew his life depended on them. “Your Grace, you made me swear to give you honest counsel and swift obedience, to defend your realm against your foes, to protect your people. Is not Edric Storm one of your people? One of those I swore to protect? I kept my oath. How could that be treason?”
Stannis ground his teeth again. “I never asked for this crown. Gold is cold and heavy on the head, but so long as I am the king, I have a duty . . . If I must sacrifice one child to the flames to save a million from the dark . . . Sacrifice . . . is never easy, Davos. Or it is no true sacrifice. Tell him, my lady.”
Melisandre said, “Azor Ahai tempered Lightbringer with the heart’s blood of his own beloved wife. If a man with a thousand cows gives one to god, that is nothing. But a man who offers the only cow he owns . . .”
“She talks of cows,” Davos told the king. “I am speaking of a boy, your daughter’s friend, your brother’s son.”
“A king’s son, with the power of kingsblood in his veins.” Melisandre’s ruby glowed like a red star at her throat. “Do you think you’ve saved this boy, Onion Knight? When the long night falls, Edric Storm shall die with the rest, wherever he is hidden. Your own sons as well. Darkness and cold will cover the earth. You meddle in matters you do not understand.”
“There’s much I don’t understand,” Davos admitted. “I have never pretended elsewise. I know the seas and rivers, the shapes of the coasts, where the rocks and shoals lie. I know hidden coves where a boat can land unseen. And I know that a king protects his people, or he is no king at all.”
Stannis’s face darkened. “Do you mock me to my face? Must I learn a king’s duty from an onion smuggler?”
Davos knelt. “If I have offended, take my head. I’ll die as I lived, your loyal man. But hear me first. Hear me for the sake of the onions I brought you, and the fingers you took.”
Stannis slid Lightbringer from its scabbard. Its glow filled the chamber. “Say what you will, but say it quickly.” The muscles in the king’s neck stood out like cords.
Davos fumbled inside his cloak and drew out the crinkled sheet of parchment. It seemed a thin and flimsy thing, yet it was all the shield he had. “A King’s Hand should be able to read and write. Maester Pylos has been teaching me.” He smoothed the letter flat upon his knee and began to read by the light of the magic sword.

Lightning split the northern sky, etching the black tower of the Night Lamp against the blue-white sky. Six heartbeats later came the thunder, like a distant drum.
The guards marched Davos Seaworth across a bridge of black basalt and under an iron portcullis showing signs of rust. Beyond lay a deep salt moat and a drawbridge supported by a pair of massive chains. Green waters surged below, sending up plumes of spray to smash against the foundations of the castle. Then came a second gatehouse, larger than the first, its stones bearded with green algae. Davos stumbled across a muddy yard with his hands bound at the wrists. A cold rain stung his eyes. The guards prodded him up the steps, into Breakwater’s cavernous stone keep.
Once inside, the captain removed his cloak and hung it from a peg, so as not to leave puddles on the threadbare Myrish carpet. Davos did the same, fumbling at the clasp with his bound hands. He had not forgotten the courtesies he had learned on Dragonstone during his years of service.
They found the lord alone in the gloom of his hall, making a supper of beer and bread and sister’s stew. Twenty iron sconces were mounted along his thick stone walls, but only four held torches, and none of them was lit. Two fat tallow candles gave a meagre, flickering light. Davos could hear the rain lashing at the walls, and a steady dripping where the roof had sprung a leak.
“M’lord,” said the captain, “we found this man in the Belly o’ the Whale, trying to buy his way off island. He had twelve dragons on him, and this thing too.” The captain put it on the table by the lord: a wide ribbon of black velvet trimmed with cloth-of-gold, and bearing three seals; a crowned stag stamped in golden beeswax, a flaming heart in red, a hand in white.
Davos waited wet and dripping, his wrists chafing where the wet rope dug into his skin. One word from this lord and he would soon be hanging from the Gallows Gate of Sisterton, but at least he was out of the rain, with solid stone beneath his feet in place of a heaving deck. He was soaked and sore and haggard, worn thin by grief and betrayal, and sick to death of storms.
The lord wiped his mouth with the back of his hand and picked up the ribbon for a closer squint. Lightning flashed outside, making the arrow loops blaze blue and white for half a heartbeat. One, two, three, four, Davos counted, before the thunder came. When it quieted, he listened to the dripping, and the duller roar beneath his feet, where the waves were smashing against Breakwater’s huge stone arches and swirling through its dungeons. He might well end up down there, fettered to a wet stone floor and left to drown when the tide came rushing in. No, he tried to tell himself, a smuggler might die that way, but not a King’s Hand. I’m worth more if he sells me to his queen.
The lord fingered the ribbon, frowning at the seals. He was an ugly man, big and fleshy, with an oarsman’s thick shoulders and no neck. Coarse grey stubble, going white in patches, covered his cheeks and chin. Above a massive shelf of brow he was bald. His nose was lumpy and red with broken veins, his lips thick, and he had a sort of webbing between the three middle fingers of his right hand. Davos had heard that some of the lords of the Three Sisters had webbed hands and feet, but he had always put that down as just another sailor’s story.
The lord leaned back. “Cut him free,” he said, “and peel those gloves off him. I want to see his hands.”
The captain did as he was told. As he jerked up his captive’s maimed left hand the lightning flashed again, throwing the shadow of Davos Seaworth’s shortened fingers across the blunt and brutal face of Godric Borrell, Lord of Sweetsister. “Any man can steal a ribbon,” the lord said, “but those fingers do not lie. You are the onion knight.”
“I have been called that, my lord.” Davos was a lord himself, and had been a knight for long years now, but deep down he was still what he had always been, a smuggler of common birth who had bought his knighthood with a hold of onions and salt fish. “I have been called worse things too.”
“Aye. Traitor. Rebel. Turncloak.”
He bristled at the last. “I have never turned my cloak, my lord. I am a king’s man.”
“Only if Stannis is a king.” The lord weighed him with hard black eyes. “Most knights who land upon my shores seek me in my hall, not in the Belly of the Whale. A vile smuggler’s den, that place. Are you returning to your old trade, onion knight?”
“No, my lord. I was looking for passage to White Harbor. The king sent me, with a message for its lord.”
“Then you are in the wrong place, with the wrong lord.” Lord Godric seemed amused. “This is Sisterton, on Sweetsister.”
“I know it is.” There was nothing sweet about Sisterton, though. It was a vile town, a sty, small and mean and rank with the odors of pig shit and rotting fish. Davos remembered it well from his smuggling days. The Three Sisters had been a favorite haunt of smugglers for hundreds of years, and a pirate’s nest before that. Sisterton’s streets were mud and planks, its houses daub-and-wattle hovels roofed with straw, and by the Gallows Gate there were always hanged men with their entrails dangling out.
“You have friends here, I do not doubt,” said the lord. “Every smuggler has friends on the Sisters. Some of them are my friends as well. The ones who aren’t, them I hang. I let them strangle slowly, with their guts slapping up against their knees.” The hall grew bright again, as lightning lit the windows. Two heartbeats later came the thunder. “If it is White Harbor that you want, why are you in Sisterton? What brought you here?”
A king’s command and a friend’s betrayal, Davos might have said. Instead he answered, “Storms.”
Nine-and-twenty ships had set sail from the Wall. If half of them were still afloat, Davos would be shocked. Black skies, bitter winds, and lashing rains had hounded them all the way down the coast. The galleys Oledo and Old Mother’s Son had been driven onto the rocks of Skagos, the isle of unicorns and cannibals where even the Blind Bastard had feared to land; the great cog Saathos Saan had foundered off the Grey Cliffs. “Stannis will be paying for them,” Salladhor Saan had fumed. “He will be paying for them with good gold, every one.” It was as if some angry god was exacting payment for their easy voyage north, when they had ridden a steady southerly from Dragonstone to the Wall. Another gale had ripped away the rigging of the Bountiful Harvest, forcing Salla to have her taken under tow. Ten leagues north of Widow’s Watch the seas rose again, slamming the Harvest into one of the galleys towing her and sinking both. The rest of the Lysene fleet had been scattered across the narrow sea. Some would straggle into one port or another. Others would never be seen again.
“Salladhor the Beggar, that’s what your king has made me,” Salladhor Saan complained to Davos, as the remnants of his fleet limped across the Bite. “Salladhor the Smashed. Where are my ships? And my gold, where is all the gold that I was promised?” When Davos had tried to assure him that he would have his payment, Salla had erupted. “When, when? On the morrow, on the new moon, when the red comet comes again? He is promising me gold and gems, always promising, but this gold I have not seen. I have his word, he is saying, oh yes, his royal word, he writes it down. Can Salladhor Saan eat the king’s word? Can he quench his thirst with parchments and waxy seals? Can he tumble promises into a feather bed and fuck them till they squeal?”
Davos had tried to persuade him to stay true. If Salla abandoned Stannis and his cause, he pointed out, he abandoned all hope of collecting the gold that was due him. A victorious King Tommen was not like to pay his defeated uncle’s debts, after all. Salla’s only hope was to remain loyal to Stannis Baratheon until he won the Iron Throne. Elsewise he would never see a groat of his money. He had to be patient.
Perhaps some lord with honey on his tongue might have swayed the Lysene pirate prince, but Davos was an onion knight, and his words had only provoked Salla to fresh outrage. “On Dragonstone I was patient,” he said, “when the red woman burned wooden gods and screaming men. All the long way to the Wall I was patient. At Eastwatch I was patient … and cold, so very cold. Bah, I say. Bah to your patience, and bah to your king. My men are hungry. They are wishing to fuck their wives again, to count their sons, to see the Stepstones and the pleasure gardens of Lys. Ice and storms and empty promises, these they are not wanting. This north is much too cold, and getting colder.”
I knew the day would come, Davos told himself. I was fond of the old rogue, but never so great a fool as to trust him.
“Storms.” Lord Godric said the word as fondly as another man might say his lover’s name. “Storms were sacred on the Sisters before the Andals came. Our gods of old were the Lady of the Waves and the Lord of the Skies. They made storms every time they mated.” He leaned forward. “These kings never bother with the Sisters. Why should they? We are small and poor. And yet you’re here. Delivered to me by the storms.”
Delivered to you by a friend, Davos thought.
Lord Godric turned to his captain. “Leave this man with me. He was never here.”
“No, m’lord. Never.” The captain took his leave, his wet boots leaving damp footprints across the carpet. Beneath the floor the sea was rumbling and restless, pounding at the castle’s feet. The outer door closed with a sound like distant thunder, and again the lightning came, as if in answer.
“My lord,” said Davos, “if you would send me on to White Harbor, His Grace would count it as an act of friendship.”
“I could send you to White Harbor,” the lord allowed. “Or I could send you to some cold wet hell.”
Sisterton is hell enough. Davos feared the worst. The Three Sisters were fickle bitches, loyal only to themselves. Supposedly they were sworn to the Arryns of the Vale, but the Eyrie’s grasp upon the islands was tenuous at best.
“Sunderland would require me to hand you over if he knew of you.” Borrell did fealty for Sweetsister, as Longthorpe did for Longsister and Torrent for Littlesister; all were sworn to Triston Sunderland, the Lord of the Three Sisters. “He’d sell you to the queen for a pot of that Lannister gold. Poor man needs every dragon, with seven sons all determined to be knights.” The lord picked up a wooden spoon and attacked his stew again. “I used to curse the gods who gave me only daughters until I heard Triston bemoaning the cost of destriers. You would be surprised to know how many fish it takes to buy a decent suit of plate and mail.”
I had seven sons as well, but four are burned and dead. “Lord Sunderland is sworn to the Eyrie,” Davos said. “By rights he should deliver me to Lady Arryn.” He would stand a better chance with her than with the Lannisters, he judged. Though she had taken no part in the War of the Five Kings, Lysa Arryn was a daughter of Riverrun, and aunt to the Young Wolf.
“Lysa Arryn’s dead,” Lord Godric said, “murdered by some singer. Lord Littlefinger rules the Vale now. Where are the pirates?” When Davos did not answer, he rapped his spoon against the table. “The Lyseni. Torrent spied their sails from Littlesister, and before him the Flints from Widow’s Watch. Orange sails, and green, and pink. Salladhor Saan. Where is he?”
“At sea.” Salla would be sailing around the Fingers and down the narrow sea. He was returning to the Stepstones with what few ships remained him. Perhaps he would acquire a few more along the way, if he came upon some likely merchantmen. A little piracy to help the leagues go by. “His Grace has sent him south, to trouble the Lannisters and their friends.” The lie was one he had rehearsed as he rowed toward Sisterton through the rain. Soon or late the world would learn that Salladhor Saan had abandoned Stannis Baratheon, leaving him without a fleet, but they would not hear it from the lips of Davos Seaworth.
Lord Godric stirred his stew. “Did that old pirate Saan make you swim to shore?”
“I came ashore in an open boat, my lord.” Salla had waited until the beacon of the Night Lamp shone off the Valyrian’s port bow before he put him off. Their friendship had been worth that much, at least. The Lyseni would gladly have taken him south with him, he avowed, but Davos had refused. Stannis needed Wyman Manderly, and had trusted Davos to win him. He would not betray that trust, he told Salla. “Bah,” the pirate prince replied, “he will kill you with these honors, old friend. He will kill you.”
“I have never had a King’s Hand beneath my roof before,” Lord Godric said. “Would Stannis ransom you, I wonder?”
Would he? Stannis had given Davos lands and titles and offices, but would he pay good gold to buy back his life? He has no gold. Else he’d still have Salla. “You will find His Grace at Castle Black if my lord would like to ask that of him.”
Borrell grunted. “Is the Imp at Castle Black as well?”
“The Imp?” Davos did not understand the question. “He is at King’s Landing, condemned to die for the murder of his nephew.”
“The Wall is the last to learn, my father used to say. The dwarf’s escaped. He twisted through the bars of his cell and tore his own father apart with his bare hands. A guardsman saw him flee, red from head to heel, as if he’d bathed in blood. The queen will make a lord of any man who kills him.”
Davos struggled to believe what he was hearing. “You are telling me that Tywin Lannister is dead?”
“At his son’s hand, aye.” The lord took a drink of beer. “When there were kings on the Sisters, we did not suffer dwarfs to live. We cast them all into the sea, as an offering to the gods. The septons made us stop that. A pack of pious fools. Why would the gods give a man such a shape but to mark him as a monster?”
Lord Tywin dead. This changes all. “My lord, will you grant me leave to send a raven to the Wall? His Grace will want to know of Lord Tywin’s death.”
“He’ll know. But not from me. Nor you, so long as you are here beneath my leaky roof. I’ll not have it said that I gave Stannis aid and counsel. The Sunderlands dragged the Sisters into two of the Blackfyre Rebellions, and we all suffered grievously for that.” Lord Godric waved his spoon toward a chair. “Sit. Before you fall, ser. My hall is cold and damp and dark, but not without some courtesy. We’ll find dry clothes for you, but first you’ll eat.” He shouted, and a woman entered the hall. “We have a guest to feed. Bring beer and bread and sister’s stew.”
The beer was brown, the bread black, the stew a creamy white. She served it in a trencher hollowed out of a stale loaf. It was thick with leeks, carrots, barley, and turnips white and yellow, along with clams and chunks of cod and crabmeat, swimming in a stock of heavy cream and butter. It was the sort of stew that warmed a man right down to his bones, just the thing for a wet, cold night. Davos spooned it up gratefully.
“You have tasted sister’s stew before?”
“I have, my lord.” The same stew was served all over the Three Sisters, in every inn and tavern.
“This is better than what you’ve had before. Gella makes it. My daughter’s daughter. Are you married, onion knight?”
“I am, my lord.”
“A pity. Gella’s not. Homely women make the best wives. There’s three kinds of crabs in there. Red crabs and spider crabs and conquerors. I won’t eat spider crab, except in sister’s stew. Makes me feel half a cannibal.” His lordship gestured at the banner hanging above the cold black hearth. A spider crab was embroidered there, white on a grey-green field. “We heard tales that Stannis burned his Hand.”
The Hand who went before me. Melisandre had given Alester Florent to her god on Dragonstone, to conjure up the wind that bore them north. Lord Florent had been strong and silent as the queen’s men bound him to the post, as dignified as any half-naked man could hope to be, but as the flames licked up his legs he had begun to scream, and his screams had blown them all the way to Eastwatch-by-the-Sea, if the red woman could be believed. Davos had misliked that wind. It had seemed to him to smell of burning flesh, and the sound of it was anguished as it played amongst the lines. It could as easily have been me. “I did not burn,” he assured Lord Godric, “though Eastwatch almost froze me.”
“The Wall will do that.” The woman brought them a fresh loaf of bread, still hot from the oven. When Davos saw her hand, he stared. Lord Godric did not fail to make note of it. “Aye, she has the mark. Like all Borrells, for five thousand years. My daughter’s daughter. Not the one who makes the stew.” He tore the bread apart and offered half to Davos. “Eat. It’s good.”
It was, though any stale crust would have tasted just as fine to Davos; it meant he was a guest here, for this one night at least. The lords of the Three Sisters had a black repute, and none more so than Godric Borrell, Lord of Sweetsister, Shield of Sisterton, Master of Breakwater Castle, and Keeper of the Night Lamp … but even robber lords and wreckers were bound by the ancient laws of hospitality. I will see the dawn, at least, Davos told himself. I have eaten of his bread and salt.
Though there were stranger spices than salt in this sister’s stew. “Is it saffron that I’m tasting?” Saffron was worth more than gold. Davos had only tasted it once before, when King Robert had sent a half a fish to him at a feast on Dragonstone.
“Aye. From Qarth. There’s pepper too.” Lord Godric took a pinch between his thumb and forefinger and sprinkled his own trencher. “Cracked black pepper from Volantis, nothing finer. Take as much as you require if you’re feeling peppery. I’ve got forty chests of it. Not to mention cloves and nutmeg, and a pound of saffron. Took it off a sloe-eyed maid.” He laughed. He still had all his teeth, Davos saw, though most of them were yellow and one on the top was black and dead. “She was making for Braavos, but a gale swept her into the Bite and she smashed up against some of my rocks. So you see, you are not the only gift the storms have brought me. The sea’s a treacherous cruel thing.”
Not as treacherous as men, thought Davos. Lord Godric’s forebears had been pirate kings until the Starks came down on them with fire and sword. These days the Sistermen left open piracy to Salladhor Saan and his ilk and confined themselves to wrecking. The beacons that burned along the shores of the Three Sisters were supposed to warn of shoals and reefs and rocks and lead the way to safety, but on stormy nights and foggy ones, some Sistermen would use false lights to draw unwary captains to their doom.
“The storms did you a kindness, blowing you to my door,” Lord Godric said. “You’d have found a cold welcome in White Harbor. You come too late, ser. Lord Wyman means to bend his knee, and not to Stannis.” He took a swallow of his beer. “The Manderlys are no northmen, not down deep. ’Twas no more than nine hundred years ago when they came north, laden down with all their gold and gods. They’d been great lords on the Mander until they overreached themselves and the green hands slapped them down. The wolf king took their gold, but he gave them land and let them keep their gods.” He mopped at his stew with a chunk of bread. “If Stannis thinks the fat man will ride the stag, he’s wrong. The Lionstar put in at Sisterton twelve days ago to fill her water casks. Do you know her? Crimson sails and a gold lion on her prow. And full of Freys, making for White Harbor.”
“Freys?” That was the last thing that Davos would have expected. “The Freys killed Lord Wyman’s son, we heard.”
“Aye,” Lord Godric said, “and the fat man was so wroth that he took a vow to live on bread and wine till he had his vengeance. But before the day was out, he was stuffing clams and cakes into his mouth again. There’s ships that go between the Sisters and White Harbor all the time. We sell them crabs and fish and goat cheese, they sell us wood and wool and hides. From all I hear, his lordship’s fatter than ever. So much for vows. Words are wind, and the wind from Manderly’s mouth means no more than the wind escaping out his bottom.” The lord tore off another chunk of bread to swipe out his trencher. “The Freys were bringing the fat fool a bag of bones. Some call that courtesy, to bring a man his dead son’s bones. Had it been my son, I would have returned the courtesy and thanked the Freys before I hanged them, but the fat man’s too noble for that.” He stuffed the bread into his mouth, chewed, swallowed. “I had the Freys to supper. One sat just where you’re sitting now. Rhaegar, he named himself. I almost laughed right in his face. He’d lost his wife, he said, but he meant to get himself a new one in White Harbor. Ravens have been flying back and forth. Lord Wyman and Lord Walder have made a pact, and mean to seal it with a marriage.”
Davos felt as though the lord had punched him in the belly. If he tells it true, my king is lost. Stannis Baratheon had desperate need of White Harbor. If Winterfell was the heart of the north, White Harbor was its mouth. Its firth had remained free of ice even in the depths of winter for centuries. With winter coming on, that could mean much and more. So could the city’s silver. The Lannisters had all the gold of Casterly Rock, and had wed the wealth of Highgarden. King Stannis’s coffers were exhausted. I must try, at least. There may be some way that I can stop this marriage. “I have to reach White Harbor,” he said. “Your lordship, I beg you, help me.”
Lord Godric began to eat his trencher, tearing it apart in his big hands. The stew had softened the stale bread. “I have no love for northmen,” he announced. “The maesters say the Rape of the Three Sisters was two thousand years ago, but Sisterton has not forgotten. We were a free people before that, with our kings ruling over us. Afterward, we had to bend our knees to the Eyrie to get the northmen out. The wolf and the falcon fought over us for a thousand years, till between the two of them they had gnawed all the fat and flesh off the bones of these poor islands. As for your King Stannis, when he was Robert’s master of ships he sent a fleet into my port without my leave and made me hang a dozen fine friends. Men like you. He went so far as to threaten to hang me if it should happen that some ship went aground because the Night Lamp had gone black. I had to eat his arrogance.” He ate some of the trencher. “Now he comes north humbled, with his tail between his legs. Why should I give him any aid? Answer me that.”
Because he is your rightful king, Davos thought. Because he is a strong man and a just one, the only man who can restore the realm and defend it against the peril that gathers in the north. Because he has a magic sword that glows with the light of the sun. The words caught in his throat. None of them would sway the Lord of Sweetsister. None of them would get him a foot closer to White Harbor. What answer does he want? Must I promise him gold we do not have? A highborn husband for his daughter’s daughter? Lands, honors, titles? Lord Alester Florent had tried to play that game, and the king had burned him for it.
“The Hand has lost his tongue, it seems. He has no taste for sister’s stew, or truth.” Lord Godric wiped his mouth.
“The lion is dead,” said Davos, slowly. “There’s your truth, my lord. Tywin Lannister is dead.”
“What if he is?”
“Who rules now in King’s Landing? Not Tommen, he is just a child. Is it Ser Kevan?”
Candlelight gleamed in Lord Godric’s black eyes. “If it were, you’d be in chains. It’s the queen who rules.”
Davos understood. He nurses doubts. He does not want to find himself upon the losing side. “Stannis held Storm’s End against the Tyrells and the Redwynes. He took Dragonstone from the last Targaryens. He smashed the Iron Fleet off Fair Isle. This child king will not prevail against him.”
“This child king commands the wealth of Casterly Rock and the power of Highgarden. He has the Boltons and the Freys.” Lord Godric rubbed his chin. “Still … in this world only winter is certain. Ned Stark told my father that, here in this very hall.”
“Ned Stark was here?”
“At the dawn of Robert’s Rebellion. The Mad King had sent to the Eyrie for Stark’s head, but Jon Arryn sent him back defiance. Gulltown stayed loyal to the throne, though. To get home and call his banners, Stark had to cross the mountains to the Fingers and find a fisherman to carry him across the Bite. A storm caught them on the way. The fisherman drowned, but his daughter got Stark to the Sisters before the boat went down. They say he left her with a bag of silver and a bastard in her belly. Jon Snow, she named him, after Arryn.
“Be that as it may. My father sat where I sit now when Lord Eddard came to Sisterton. Our maester urged us to send Stark’s head to Aerys, to prove our loyalty. It would have meant a rich reward. The Mad King was open-handed with them as pleased him. By then we knew that Jon Arryn had taken Gulltown, though. Robert was the first man to gain the wall, and slew Marq Grafton with his own hand. ‘This Baratheon is fearless,’ I said. ‘He fights the way a king should fight.’ Our maester chuckled at me and told us that Prince Rhaegar was certain to defeat this rebel. That was when Stark said, ‘In this world only winter is certain. We may lose our heads, it’s true … but what if we prevail?’ My father sent him on his way with his head still on his shoulders. ‘If you lose,’ he told Lord Eddard, ‘you were never here.’ ”
“No more than I was,” said Davos Seaworth.

The Merry Midwife stole into White Harbor on the evening tide, her patched sail rippling with every gust of wind.
She was an old cog, and even in her youth no one had ever called her pretty. Her figurehead showed a laughing woman holding an infant by one foot, but the woman’s cheeks and the babe’s bottom were both pocked by wormholes. Uncounted layers of drab brown paint covered her hull; her sails were grey and tattered. She was not a ship to draw a second glance, unless it was to wonder how she stayed afloat. The Merry Midwife was known in White Harbor too. For years she had plied a humble trade between there and Sisterton.
It was not the sort of arrival that Davos Seaworth had anticipated when he’d set sail with Salla and his fleet. All this had seemed simpler then. The ravens had not brought King Stannis the allegiance of White Harbor, so His Grace would send an envoy to treat with Lord Manderly in person. As a show of strength, Davos would arrive aboard Salla’s galleas Valyrian, with the rest of the Lysene fleet behind her. Every hull was striped: black and yellow, pink and blue, green and white, purple and gold. The Lyseni loved bright hues, and Salladhor Saan was the most colorful of all. Salladhor the Splendid, Davos thought, but the storms wrote an end to all of that.
Instead he would smuggle himself into the city, as he might have done twenty years before. Until he knew how matters stood here, it was more prudent to play the common sailor, not the lord.
White Harbor’s walls of whitewashed stone rose before them, on the eastern shore where the White Knife plunged into the firth. Some of the city’s defenses had been strengthened since the last time Davos had been here, half a dozen years before. The jetty that divided the inner and outer harbors had been fortified with a long stone wall, thirty feet tall and almost a mile long, with towers every hundred yards. There was smoke rising from Seal Rock as well, where once there had been only ruins. That could be good or bad, depending on what side Lord Wyman chooses.
Davos had always been fond of this city, since first he’d come here as a cabin boy on Cobblecat. Though small compared to Oldtown and King’s Landing, it was clean and well-ordered, with wide straight cobbled streets that made it easy for a man to find his way. The houses were built of whitewashed stone, with steeply pitched roofs of dark grey slate. Roro Uhoris, the Cobblecat’s cranky old master, used to claim that he could tell one port from another just by the way they smelled. Cities were like women, he insisted; each one had its own unique scent. Oldtown was as flowery as a perfumed dowager. Lannisport was a milkmaid, fresh and earthy, with woodsmoke in her hair. King’s Landing reeked like some unwashed whore. But White Harbor’s scent was sharp and salty, and a little fishy too. “She smells the way a mermaid ought to smell,” Roro said. “She smells of the sea.”
She still does, thought Davos, but he could smell the peat smoke drifting off Seal Rock too. The sea stone dominated the approaches to the outer harbor, a massive grey-green upthrust looming fifty feet above the waters. Its top was crowned with a circle of weathered stones, a ringfort of the First Men that had stood desolate and abandoned for hundreds of years. It was not abandoned now. Davos could see scorpions and spitfires behind the standing stones, and crossbowmen peering between them. It must be cold up there, and wet. On all his previous visits, seals could be seen basking on the broken rocks below. The Blind Bastard always made him count them whenever the Cobblecat set sail from White Harbor; the more seals there were, Roro said, the more luck they would have on their voyage. There were no seals now. The smoke and the soldiers had frightened them away. A wiser man would see a caution in that. If I had a thimble full of sense, I would have gone with Salla. He could have made his way back south, to Marya and their sons. I have lost four sons in the king’s service, and my fifth serves as his squire. I should have the right to cherish the two boys who still remain. It has been too long since I saw them.
At Eastwatch, the black brothers told him there was no love between the Manderlys of White Harbor and the Boltons of the Dreadfort. The Iron Throne had raised Roose Bolton up to Warden of the North, so it stood to reason that Wyman Manderly should declare for Stannis. White Harbor cannot stand alone. The city needs an ally, a protector. Lord Wyman needs King Stannis as much as Stannis needs him. Or so it seemed at Eastwatch.
Sisterton had undermined those hopes. If Lord Borrell told it true, if the Manderlys meant to join their strength to the Boltons and the Freys … no, he would not dwell on that. He would know the truth soon enough. He prayed he had not come too late.
That jetty wall conceals the inner harbor, he realized, as the Merry Midwife was pulling down her sail. The outer harbor was larger, but the inner harbor offered better anchorage, sheltered by the city wall on one side and the looming mass of the Wolf’s Den on another, and now by the jetty wall as well. At Eastwatch-by-the-Sea, Cotter Pyke told Davos that Lord Wyman was building war galleys. There could have been a score of ships concealed behind those walls, waiting only a command to put to sea.
Behind the city’s thick white walls, the New Castle rose proud and pale upon its hill. Davos could see the domed roof of the Sept of the Snows as well, surmounted by tall statues of the Seven. The Manderlys had brought the Faith north with them when they were driven from the Reach. White Harbor had its godswood too, a brooding tangle of root and branch and stone locked away behind the crumbling black walls of the Wolf’s Den, an ancient fortress that served only as a prison now. But for the most part the septons ruled here.
The merman of House Manderly was everywhere in evidence, flying from the towers of the New Castle, above the Seal Gate, and along the city walls. At Eastwatch, the northmen insisted that White Harbor would never abandon its allegiance to Winterfell, but Davos saw no sign of the direwolf of Stark. There are no lions either. Lord Wyman cannot have declared for Tommen yet, or he would have raised his standard.
The dockside wharves were swarming. A clutter of small boats were tied up along the fish market, off-loading their catches. He saw three river runners too, long lean boats built tough to brave the swift currents and rocky shoots of the White Knife. It was the seagoing vessels that interested him most, however; a pair of carracks as drab and tattered as the Merry Midwife, the trading galley Storm Dancer, the cogs Brave Magister and Horn of Plenty, a galleas from Braavos marked by her purple hull and sails …
 … and there beyond, the warship.
The sight of her sent a knife through his hopes. Her hull was black and gold, her figurehead a lion with an upraised paw. Lionstar, read the letters on her stern, beneath a fluttering banner that bore the arms of the boy king on the Iron Throne. A year ago, he would not have been able to read them, but Maester Pylos had taught him some of the letters back on Dragonstone. For once, the reading gave him little pleasure. Davos had been praying that the galley had been lost in the same storms that had ravaged Salla’s fleet, but the gods had not been so kind. The Freys were here, and he would need to face them.
The Merry Midwife tied up to the end of a weathered wooden pier in the outer harbor, well away from Lionstar. As her crew made her fast to the pilings and lowered a gangplank, her captain sauntered up to Davos. Casso Mogat was a mongrel of the narrow sea, fathered on a Sisterton whore by an Ibbenese whaler. Only five feet tall and very hirsute, he dyed his hair and whiskers a mossy green. It made him look like a tree stump in yellow boots. Despite his appearance, he seemed a good sailor, though a hard master to his crew. “How long will you be gone?”
“A day at least. It may be longer.” Davos had found that lords liked to keep you waiting. They did it to make you anxious, he suspected, and to demonstrate their power.
“The Midwife will linger here three days. No longer. They will look for me back in Sisterton.”
“If things go well, I could be back by the morrow.”
“And if these things go badly?”
I may not be back at all. “You need not wait for me.”
A pair of customs men were clambering aboard as he went down the gangplank, but neither gave him so much as a glance. They were there to see the captain and inspect the hold; common seamen did not concern them, and few men looked as common as Davos. He was of middling height, his shrewd peasant’s face weathered by wind and sun, his grizzled beard and brown hair well salted with grey. His garb was plain as well: old boots, brown breeches and blue tunic, a woolen mantle of undyed wool, fastened with a wooden clasp. He wore a pair of salt-stained leather gloves to hide the stubby fingers of the hand that Stannis had shortened, so many years ago. Davos hardly looked a lord, much less a King’s Hand. That was all to the good until he knew how matters stood here.
He made his way along the wharf and through the fish market. The Brave Magister was taking on some mead. The casks stood four high along the pier. Behind one stack he glimpsed three sailors throwing dice. Farther on the fishwives were crying the day’s catch, and a boy was beating time on a drum as a shabby old bear danced in a circle for a ring of river runners. Two spearmen had been posted at the Seal Gate, with the badge of House Manderly upon their breasts, but they were too intent on flirting with a dockside whore to pay Davos any mind. The gate was open, the portcullis raised. He joined the traffic passing through.
Inside was a cobbled square with a fountain at its center. A stone merman rose from its waters, twenty feet tall from tail to crown. His curly beard was green and white with lichen, and one of the prongs of his trident had broken off before Davos had been born, yet somehow he still managed to impress. Old Fishfoot was what the locals called him. The square was named for some dead lord, but no one ever called it anything but Fishfoot Yard.
The Yard was teeming this afternoon. A woman was washing her smallclothes in Fishfoot’s fountain and hanging them off his trident to dry. Beneath the arches of the peddler’s colonnade the scribes and money changers had set up for business, along with a hedge wizard, an herb woman, and a very bad juggler. A man was selling apples from a barrow, and a woman was offering herring with chopped onions. Chickens and children were everywhere underfoot. The huge oak-and-iron doors of the Old Mint had always been closed when Davos had been in Fishfoot Yard before, but today they stood open. Inside he glimpsed hundreds of women, children, and old men, huddled on the floor on piles of furs. Some had little cookfires going.
Davos stopped beneath the colonnade and traded a halfpenny for an apple. “Are people living in the Old Mint?” he asked the apple seller.
“Them as have no other place to live. Smallfolk from up the White Knife, most o’ them. Hornwood’s people too. With that Bastard o’ Bolton running loose, they all want to be inside the walls. I don’t know what his lordship means to do with all o’ them. Most turned up with no more’n the rags on their backs.”
Davos felt a pang of guilt. They came here for refuge, to a city untouched by the fighting, and here I turn up to drag them back into the war. He took a bite of the apple and felt guilty about that as well. “How do they eat?”
The apple seller shrugged. “Some beg. Some steal. Lots o’ young girls taking up the trade, the way girls always do when it’s all they got to sell. Any boy stands five feet tall can find a place in his lordship’s barracks, long as he can hold a spear.”
He’s raising men, then. That might be good … or bad, depending. The apple was dry and mealy, but Davos made himself take another bite. “Does Lord Wyman mean to join the Bastard?”
“Well,” said the apple seller, “the next time his lordship comes down here hunkering for an apple, I’ll be sure and ask him.”
“I heard his daughter was to wed some Frey.”
“His granddaughter. I heard that too, but his lordship forgot t’ invite me to the wedding. Here, you going to finish that? I’ll take the rest back. Them seeds is good.”
Davos tossed him back the core. A bad apple, but it was worth half a penny to learn that Manderly is raising men. He made his way around Old Fishfoot, past where a young girl was selling cups of fresh milk from her nanny goat. He was remembering more of the city now that he was here. Down past where Old Fishfoot’s trident pointed was an alley where they sold fried cod, crisp and golden brown outside and flaky white within. Over there was a brothel, cleaner than most, where a sailor could enjoy a woman without fear of being robbed or killed. Off the other way, in one of those houses that clung to the walls of the Wolf’s Den like barnacles to an old hull, there used to be a brewhouse where they made a black beer so thick and tasty that a cask of it could fetch as much as Arbor gold in Braavos and the Port of Ibben, provided the locals left the brewer any to sell.
It was wine he wanted, though—sour, dark, and dismal. He strolled across the yard and down a flight of steps, to a winesink called the Lazy Eel, underneath a warehouse full of sheepskins. Back in his smuggling days, the Eel had been renowned for offering the oldest whores and vilest wine in White Harbor, along with meat pies full of lard and gristle that were inedible on their best days and poisonous on their worst. With fare like that, most locals shunned the place, leaving it for sailors who did not know any better. You never saw a city guardsman down in the Lazy Eel, or a customs officer.
Some things never change. Inside the Eel, time stood still. The barrel-vaulted ceiling was stained black with soot, the floor was hard-packed earth, the air smelled of smoke and spoiled meat and stale vomit. The fat tallow candles on the tables gave off more smoke than light, and the wine that Davos ordered looked more brown than red in the gloom. Four whores were seated near the door, drinking. One gave him a hopeful smile as he entered. When Davos shook his head, the woman said something that made her companions laugh. After that none of them paid him any mind.
Aside from the whores and the proprietor, Davos had the Eel to himself. The cellar was large, full of nooks and shadowed alcoves where a man could be alone. He took his wine to one of them and sat with his back to a wall to wait.
Before long, he found himself staring at the hearth. The red woman could see the future in the fire, but all that Davos Seaworth ever saw were the shadows of the past: the burning ships, the fiery chain, the green shadows flashing across the belly of the clouds, the Red Keep brooding over all. Davos was a simple man, raised up by chance and war and Stannis. He did not understand why the gods would take four lads as young and strong as his sons, yet spare their weary father. Some nights he thought he had been left to rescue Edric Storm … but by now King Robert’s bastard boy was safe in the Stepstones, yet Davos still remained. Do the gods have some other task for me? he wondered. If so, White Harbor may be some part of it. He tried the wine, then poured half his cup onto the floor beside his foot.
As dusk fell outside, the benches at the Eel began to fill with sailors. Davos called to the proprietor for another cup. When he brought it, he brought him a candle too. “You want food?” the man asked. “We got meat pies.”
“What kind of meat is in them?”
“The usual kind. It’s good.”
The whores laughed. “It’s grey, he means,” one said.
“Shut your bloody yap. You eat them.”
“I eat all kinds o’ shit. Don’t mean I like it.”
Davos blew the candle out as soon as the proprietor moved off, and sat back in the shadows. Seamen were the worst gossips in the world when the wine was flowing, even wine as cheap as this. All he need do was listen.
Most of what he heard he’d learned in Sisterton, from Lord Godric or the denizens of the Belly of the Whale. Tywin Lannister was dead, butchered by his dwarf son; his corpse had stunk so badly that no one had been able to enter the Great Sept of Baelor for days afterward; the Lady of the Eyrie had been murdered by a singer; Littlefinger ruled the Vale now, but Bronze Yohn Royce had sworn to bring him down; Balon Greyjoy had died as well, and his brothers were fighting for the Seastone Chair; Sandor Clegane had turned outlaw and was plundering and killing in the lands along the Trident; Myr and Lys and Tyrosh were embroiled in another war; a slave revolt was raging in the east.
Other tidings were of greater interest. Robett Glover was in the city and had been trying to raise men, with little success. Lord Manderly had turned a deaf ear to his pleas. White Harbor was weary of war, he was reported to have said. That was bad. The Ryswells and the Dustins had surprised the ironmen on the Fever River and put their longships to the torch. That was worse. And now the Bastard of Bolton was riding south with Hother Umber to join them for an attack on Moat Cailin. “The Whoresbane his own self,” claimed a riverman who’d just brought a load of hides and timber down the White Knife, “with three hundred spearmen and a hundred archers. Some Hornwood men have joined them, and Cerwyns too.” That was worst of all.
“Lord Wyman best send some men to fight if he knows what’s good for him,” said the old fellow at the end of the table. “Lord Roose, he’s the Warden now. White Harbor’s honor bound to answer his summons.”
“What did any Bolton ever know o’ honor?” said the Eel’s proprietor as he filled their cups with more brown wine.
“Lord Wyman won’t go no place. He’s too bloody fat.”
“I heard how he was ailing. All he does is sleep and weep, they say. He’s too sick to get out o’ his bed most days.”
“Too fat, you mean.”
“Fat or thin’s got naught to do with it,” said the Eel’s proprietor. “The lions got his son.”
No one spoke of King Stannis. No one even seemed to know that His Grace had come north to help defend the Wall. Wildlings and wights and giants had been all the talk at Eastwatch, but here no one seemed to be giving them so much as a thought.
Davos leaned into the firelight. “I thought the Freys killed his son. That’s what we heard in Sisterton.”
“They killed Ser Wendel,” said the proprietor. “His bones are resting in the Snowy Sept with candles all around them, if you want to have a look. Ser Wylis, though, he’s still a captive.”
Worse and worse. He had known that Lord Wyman had two sons, but he’d thought that both of them were dead. If the Iron Throne has a hostage … Davos had fathered seven sons himself, and lost four on the Blackwater. He knew he would do whatever gods or men required of him to protect the other three. Steffon and Stannis were thousands of leagues from the fighting and safe from harm, but Devan was at Castle Black, a squire to the king. The king whose cause may rise or fall with White Harbor.
His fellow drinkers were talking about dragons now. “You’re bloody mad,” said an oarsman off Storm Dancer. “The Beggar King’s been dead for years. Some Dothraki horselord cut his head off.”
“So they tell us,” said the old fellow. “Might be they’re lying, though. He died half a world away, if he died at all. Who’s to say? If a king wanted me dead, might be I’d oblige him and pretend to be a corpse. None of us has ever seen his body.”
“I never saw Joffrey’s corpse, nor Robert’s,” growled the Eel’s proprietor. “Maybe they’re all alive as well. Maybe Baelor the Blessed’s just been having him a little nap all these years.”
The old fellow made a face. “Prince Viserys weren’t the only dragon, were he? Are we sure they killed Prince Rhaegar’s son? A babe, he was.”
“Wasn’t there some princess too?” asked a whore. She was the same one who’d said the meat was grey.
“Two,” said the old fellow. “One was Rhaegar’s daughter, t’other was his sister.”
“Daena,” said the riverman. “That was the sister. Daena of Dragonstone. Or was it Daera?”
“Daena was old King Baelor’s wife,” said the oarsman. “I rowed on a ship named for her once. The Princess Daena.”
“If she was a king’s wife, she’d be a queen.”
“Baelor never had a queen. He was holy.”
“Don’t mean he never wed his sister,” said the whore. “He just never bedded her, is all. When they made him king, he locked her up in a tower. His other sisters too. There was three.”
“Daenela,” the proprietor said loudly. “That was her name. The Mad King’s daughter, I mean, not Baelor’s bloody wife.”
“Daenerys,” Davos said. “She was named for the Daenerys who wed the Prince of Dorne during the reign of Daeron the Second. I don’t know what became of her.”
“I do,” said the man who’d started all the talk of dragons, a Braavosi oarsman in a somber woolen jack. “When we were down to Pentos we moored beside a trader called the Sloe-Eyed Maid, and I got to drinking with her captain’s steward. He told me a pretty tale about some slip of a girl who come aboard in Qarth, to try and book passage back to Westeros for her and three dragons. Silver hair she had, and purple eyes. ‘I took her to the captain my own self,’ this steward swore to me, ‘but he wasn’t having none of that. There’s more profit in cloves and saffron, he tells me, and spices won’t set fire to your sails.’ ”
Laughter swept the cellar. Davos did not join in. He knew what had befallen the Sloe-Eyed Maid. The gods were cruel to let a man sail across half the world, then send him chasing a false light when he was almost home. That captain was a bolder man than me, he thought, as he made his way to the door. One voyage to the east, and a man could live as rich as a lord until the end of his days. When he’d been younger, Davos had dreamed of making such voyages himself, but the years went dancing by like moths around a flame, and somehow the time had never been quite right. One day, he told himself. One day when the war is done and King Stannis sits the Iron Throne and has no more need of onion knights. I’ll take Devan with me. Steff and Stanny too if they’re old enough. We’ll see these dragons and all the wonders of the world.
Outside the wind was gusting, making the flames shiver in the oil lamps that lit the yard. It had grown colder since the sun went down, but Davos remembered Eastwatch, and how the wind would come screaming off the Wall at night, knifing through even the warmest cloak to freeze a man’s blood right in his veins. White Harbor was a warm bath by comparison.
There were other places he might get his ears filled: an inn famous for its lamprey pies, the alehouse where the wool factors and the customs men did their drinking, a mummer’s hall where bawdy entertainments could be had for a few pennies. But Davos felt that he had heard enough. I’ve come too late. Old instinct made him reach for his chest, where once he’d kept his fingerbones in a little sack on a leather thong. There was nothing there. He had lost his luck in the fires of the Blackwater, when he’d lost his ship and sons.
What must I do now? He pulled his mantle tighter. Do I climb the hill and present myself at the gates of the New Castle, to make a futile plea? Return to Sisterton? Make my way back to Marya and my boys? Buy a horse and ride the kingsroad, to tell Stannis that he has no friends in White Harbor, and no hope?
Queen Selyse had feasted Salla and his captains, the night before the fleet had set sail. Cotter Pyke had joined them, and four other high officers of the Night’s Watch. Princess Shireen had been allowed to attend as well. As the salmon was being served, Ser Axell Florent had entertained the table with the tale of a Targaryen princeling who kept an ape as a pet. This prince liked to dress the creature in his dead son’s clothes and pretend he was a child, Ser Axell claimed, and from time to time he would propose marriages for him. The lords so honored always declined politely, but of course they did decline. “Even dressed in silk and velvet, an ape remains an ape,” Ser Axell said. “A wiser prince would have known that you cannot send an ape to do a man’s work.” The queen’s men laughed, and several grinned at Davos. I am no ape, he’d thought. I am as much a lord as you, and a better man. But the memory still stung.
The Seal Gate had been closed for the night. Davos would not be able to return to the Merry Midwife till dawn. He was here for the night. He gazed up at Old Fishfoot with his broken trident. I have come through rain and wrack and storm. I will not go back without doing what I came for, no matter how hopeless it may seem. He might have lost his fingers and his luck, but he was no ape in velvet. He was a King’s Hand.
Castle Stair was a street with steps, a broad white stone way that led up from the Wolf’s Den by the water to the New Castle on its hill. Marble mermaids lit the way as Davos climbed, bowls of burning whale oil cradled in their arms. When he reached the top, he turned to look behind him. From here he could see down into the harbors. Both of them. Behind the jetty wall, the inner harbor was crowded with war galleys. Davos counted twenty-three. Lord Wyman was a fat man, but not an idle one, it seemed.
The gates of the New Castle had been closed, but a postern opened when he shouted, and a guard emerged to ask his business. Davos showed him the black and gold ribbon that bore the royal seals. “I need to see Lord Manderly at once,” he said. “My business is with him, and him alone.”

His lordship will hear you now, smuggler.”
The knight wore silver armor, his greaves and gauntlet inlaid with niello to suggest flowing fronds of seaweed. The helm beneath his arm was the head of the merling king, with a crown of mother-of-pearl and a jutting beard of jet and jade. His own beard was as grey as the winter sea.
Davos rose. “May I know your name, ser?”
“Ser Marlon Manderly.” He was a head taller than Davos and three stones heavier, with slate-grey eyes and a haughty way of speaking. “I have the honor to be Lord Wyman’s cousin and commander of his garrison. Follow me.”
Davos had come to White Harbor as an envoy, but they had made him a captive. His chambers were large, airy, and handsomely furnished, but there were guards outside his doors. From his window he could see the streets of White Harbor beyond the castle walls, but he was not allowed to walk them. He could see the harbor too, and had watched Merry Midwife make her way down the firth. Casso Mogat had waited four days instead of three before departing. Another fortnight had passed since then.
Lord Manderly’s household guard wore cloaks of blue-green wool and carried silver tridents in place of common spears. One went before him, one behind, and one to either side. They walked past the faded banners, broken shields, and rusted swords of a hundred ancient victories, and a score of wooden figures, cracked and worm-riddled, that could only have adorned the prows of ships.
Two marble mermen flanked his lordship’s court, Fishfoot’s smaller cousins. As the guards threw open the doors, a herald slammed the butt of his staff against an old plank floor. “Ser Davos of House Seaworth,” he called in a ringing voice.
As many times as he had visited White Harbor, Davos had never set foot inside the New Castle, much less the Merman’s Court. Its walls and floor and ceiling were made of wooden planks notched cunningly together and decorated with all the creatures of the sea. As they approached the dais, Davos trod on painted crabs and clams and starfish, half-hidden amongst twisting black fronds of seaweed and the bones of drowned sailors. On the walls to either side, pale sharks prowled painted blue-green depths, whilst eels and octopods slithered amongst rocks and sunken ships. Shoals of herring and great codfish swam between the tall arched windows. Higher up, near where the old fishing nets drooped down from the rafters, the surface of the sea had been depicted. To his right a war galley stroked serene against the rising sun; to his left, a battered old cog raced before a storm, her sails in rags. Behind the dais a kraken and grey leviathan were locked in battle beneath the painted waves.
Davos had hoped to speak with Wyman Manderly alone, but he found a crowded court. Along the walls, the women outnumbered the men by five to one; what few males he did see had long grey beards or looked too young to shave. There were septons as well, and holy sisters in white robes and grey. Near the top of the hall stood a dozen men in the blue and silver-grey of House Frey. Their faces had a likeness a blind man could have seen; several wore the badge of the Twins, two towers connected by a bridge.
Davos had learned to read men’s faces long before Maester Pylos had taught him to read words on paper. These Freys would gladly see me dead, he realized at a glance.
Nor did he find any welcome in the pale blue eyes of Wyman Manderly. His lordship’s cushioned throne was wide enough to accommodate three men of common girth, yet Manderly threatened to overflow it. His lordship sagged into his seat, his shoulders slumped, his legs splayed, his hands resting on the arms of his throne as if the weight of them were too much to bear. Gods be good, thought Davos, when he saw Lord Wyman’s face, this man looks half a corpse. His skin was pallid, with an undertone of grey.
Kings and corpses always draw attendants, the old saying went. So it was with Manderly. Left of the high seat stood a maester nigh as fat as the lord he served, a rosy-cheeked man with thick lips and a head of golden curls. Ser Marlon claimed the place of honor at his lordship’s right hand. On a cushioned stool at his feet perched a plump pink lady. Behind Lord Wyman stood two younger women, sisters by the look of them. The elder wore her brown hair bound in a long braid. The younger, no more than fifteen, had an even longer braid, dyed a garish green.
None chose to honor Davos with a name. The maester was the first to speak. “You stand before Wyman Manderly, Lord of White Harbor and Warden of the White Knife, Shield of the Faith, Defender of the Dispossessed, Lord Marshal of the Mander, a Knight of the Order of the Green Hand,” he said. “In the Merman’s Court, it is customary for vassals and petitioners to kneel.”
The onion knight would have bent his knee, but a King’s Hand could not; to do so would suggest that the king he served was less than this fat lord. “I have not come as a petitioner,” Davos replied. “I have a string of titles too. Lord of the Rainwood, Admiral of the Narrow Sea, Hand of the King.”
The plump woman on the stool rolled her eyes. “An admiral without ships, a hand without fingers, in service to a king without a throne. Is this a knight who comes before us, or the answer to a child’s riddle?”
“He is a messenger, good-daughter,” Lord Wyman said, “an onion of ill omen. Stannis did not like the answer his ravens brought him, so he has sent this … this smuggler.” He squinted at Davos through eyes half-buried in rolls of fat. “You have visited our city before, I think, taking coin from our pockets and food off our table. How much did you steal from me, I wonder?”
Not enough that you ever missed a meal. “I paid for my smuggling at Storm’s End, my lord.” Davos pulled off his glove and held up his left hand, with its four shortened fingers.
“Four fingertips, for a lifetime’s worth of theft?” said the woman on the stool. Her hair was yellow, her face round and pink and fleshy. “You got off cheaply, Onion Knight.”
Davos did not deny it. “If it please my lord, I would request a privy audience.”
It did not please the lord. “I keep no secrets from my kin, nor from my leal lords and knights, good friends all.”
“My lord,” said Davos, “I would not want my words to be heard by His Grace’s enemies … or by your lordship’s.”
“Stannis may have enemies in this hall. I do not.”
“Not even the men who slew your son?” Davos pointed. “These Freys were amongst his hosts at the Red Wedding.”
One of the Freys stepped forward, a knight long and lean of limb, clean-shaved but for a grey mustache as thin as a Myrish stiletto. “The Red Wedding was the Young Wolf’s work. He changed into a beast before our eyes and tore out the throat of my cousin Jinglebell, a harmless simpleton. He would have slain my lord father too, if Ser Wendel had not put himself in the way.”
Lord Wyman blinked back tears. “Wendel was always a brave boy. I was not surprised to learn he died a hero.”
The enormity of the lie made Davos gasp. “Is it your claim that Robb Stark killed Wendel Manderly?” he asked the Frey.
“And many more. Mine own son Tytos was amongst them, and my daughter’s husband. When Stark changed into a wolf, his northmen did the same. The mark of the beast was on them all. Wargs birth other wargs with a bite, it is well-known. It was all my brothers and I could do to put them down before they slew us all.”
The man was smirking as he told the tale. Davos wanted to peel his lips off with a knife. “Ser, may I have your name?”
“Ser Jared, of House Frey.”
“Jared of House Frey, I name you liar.”
Ser Jared seemed amused. “Some men cry when slicing onions, but I have never had that weakness.” Steel whispered against leather as he drew his sword. “If you are indeed a knight, ser, defend that slander with your body.”
Lord Wyman’s eyes fluttered open. “I’ll have no bloodshed in the Merman’s Court. Put up your steel, Ser Jared, else I must ask you to leave my presence.”
Ser Jared sheathed his sword. “Beneath your lordship’s roof, your lordship’s word is law … but I shall want a reckoning with this onion lord before he leaves this city.”
“Blood!” howled the woman on the stool. “That’s what this ill onion wants of us, my lord. See how he stirs up trouble? Send him away, I beg you. He wants the blood of your people, the blood of your brave sons. Send him away. Should the queen hear that you gave audience to this traitor, she may question our own loyalty. She might … she could … she …”
“It will not come to that, good-daughter,” Lord Wyman said. “The Iron Throne shall have no cause to doubt us.”
Davos misliked the sound of that, but he had not come all this way to hold his tongue. “The boy on the Iron Throne is a usurper,” he said, “and I am no traitor, but the Hand of Stannis Baratheon, the First of His Name, the trueborn King of Westeros.”
The fat maester cleared his throat. “Stannis Baratheon was brother to our late King Robert, may the Father judge him justly. Tommen is the issue of Robert’s body. The laws of succession are clear in such a case. A son must come before a brother.”
“Maester Theomore speaks truly,” said Lord Wyman. “He is wise in all such matters, and has always given me good counsel.”
“A trueborn son comes before a brother,” Davos agreed, “but Tommen-called-Baratheon is bastard-born, as his brother Joffrey was before him. They were sired by the Kingslayer, in defiance of all the laws of gods and men.”
Another of the Freys spoke up. “He speaks treason with his own lips, my lord. Stannis took his thieving fingers. You should take his lying tongue.”
“Take his head, rather,” suggested Ser Jared. “Or let him meet me on the field of honor.”
“What would a Frey know of honor?” Davos threw back.
Four of the Freys started forward until Lord Wyman halted them with an upraised hand. “Step back, my friends. I will hear him out before I … before I deal with him.”
“Can you offer any proof of this incest, ser?” Maester Theomore asked, folding his soft hands atop his belly.
Edric Storm, thought Davos, but I sent him far away across the narrow sea, to keep him safe from Melisandre’s fires. “You have the word of Stannis Baratheon that all I’ve said is true.”
“Words are wind,” said the young woman behind Lord Wyman’s high seat, the handsome one with the long brown braid. “And men will lie to get their way, as any maid could tell you.”
“Proof requires more than some lord’s unsupported word,” declared Maester Theomore. “Stannis Baratheon would not be the first man who ever lied to win a throne.”
The pink woman pointed a plump finger down at Davos. “We want no part of any treason, you. We are good people in White Harbor, lawful, loyal people. Pour no more poison in our ears, or my good-father will send you to the Wolf’s Den.”
How have I offended this one? “Might I have the honor of my lady’s name?”
The pink woman gave an angry sniff and let the maester answer. “The Lady Leona is wife to Lord Wyman’s son Ser Wylis, presently a captive of the Lannisters.”
She speaks from fear. If White Harbor should declare for Stannis, her husband would answer with his life. How can I ask Lord Wyman to condemn his son to death? What would I do in his place if Devan were a hostage? “My lord,” said Davos, “I pray no harm will come to your son, or to any man of White Harbor.”
“Another lie,” said Lady Leona from her stool.
Davos thought it best to ignore her. “When Robb Stark took up arms against the bastard Joffrey-called-Baratheon, White Harbor marched with him. Lord Stark has fallen, but his war goes on.”
“Robb Stark was my liege lord,” said Lord Wyman. “Who is this man Stannis? Why does he trouble us? He never felt the need to journey north before, as best I can recall. Yet he turns up now, a beaten cur with his helm in his hand, begging for alms.”
“He came to save the realm, my lord,” Davos insisted. “To defend your lands against the ironborn and the wildlings.”
Next to the high seat, Ser Marlon Manderly gave a snort of disdain. “It has been centuries since White Harbor has seen any wildlings, and the ironmen have never troubled this coast. Does Lord Stannis propose to defend us from snarks and dragons too?”
Laughter swept the Merman’s Court, but at Lord Wyman’s feet, Lady Leona began to sob. “Ironmen from the isles, wildlings from beyond the Wall … and now this traitor lord with his outlaws, rebels, and sorcerers.” She pointed a finger at Davos. “We have heard of your red witch, oh yes. She would turn us against the Seven to bow before a fire demon!”
Davos had no love for the red priestess, but he dare not let Lady Leona go unanswered. “Lady Melisandre is a priestess of the red god. Queen Selyse has adopted her faith, along with many others, but more of His Grace’s followers still worship the Seven. Myself among them.” He prayed no one would ask him to explain about the sept at Dragonstone or the godswood at Storm’s End. If they ask, I must needs tell them. Stannis would not have me lie.
“The Seven defend White Harbor,” Lady Leona declared. “We do not fear your red queen or her god. Let her send what spells she will. The prayers of godly men will shield us against evil.”
“Indeed.” Lord Wyman gave Lady Leona a pat on the shoulder. “Lord Davos, if you are a lord, I know what your so-called king would have of me. Steel and silver and a bended knee.” He shifted his weight to lean upon an elbow. “Before he was slain, Lord Tywin offered White Harbor full pardon for our support of the Young Wolf. He promised that my son would be returned to me once I paid a ransom of three thousand dragons and proved my loyalty beyond a doubt. Roose Bolton, who is named our Warden of the North, requires that I give up my claim to Lord Hornwood’s lands and castles but swears my other holdings shall remain untouched. Walder Frey, his good-father, offers one of his daughters to be my wife, and husbands for my son’s daughters here behind me. These terms seem generous to me, a good basis for a fair and lasting peace. You would have me spurn them. So I ask you, Onion Knight—what does Lord Stannis offer me in return for my allegiance?”
War and woe and the screams of burning men, Davos might have said. “The chance to do your duty,” he replied instead. That was the answer Stannis would have given Wyman Manderly. The Hand should speak with the king’s voice.
Lord Wyman sagged back in his chair. “Duty. I see.”
“White Harbor is not strong enough to stand alone. You need His Grace as much as he needs you. Together you can defeat your common enemies.”
“My lord,” said Ser Marlon, in his ornate silver armor, “will you permit me to ask a few questions of Lord Davos?”
“As you wish, cousin.” Lord Wyman closed his eyes.
Ser Marlon turned to Davos. “How many northern lords have declared for Stannis? Tell us that.”
“Arnolf Karstark has vowed to join His Grace.”
“Arnolf is no true lord, only a castellan. What castles does Lord Stannis hold at present, pray?”
“His Grace has taken the Nightfort for his seat. In the south, he holds Storm’s End and Dragonstone.”
Maester Theomore cleared his throat. “Only for the nonce. Storm’s End and Dragonstone are lightly held and must soon fall. And the Nightfort is a haunted ruin, a drear and dreadful place.”
Ser Marlon went on. “How many men can Stannis put into the field, can you tell us that? How many knights ride with him? How many bowmen, how many freeriders, how many men-at-arms?”
Too few, Davos knew. Stannis had come north with no more than fifteen hundred men … but if he told them that, his mission here was doomed. He fumbled for words and found none.
“Your silence is all the answer I require, ser. Your king brings us only enemies.” Ser Marlon turned to his lord cousin. “Your lordship asked the onion knight what Stannis offers us. Let me answer. He offers us defeat and death. He would have you mount a horse of air and give battle with a sword of wind.”
The fat lord opened his eyes slowly, as if the effort were almost too much for him. “My cousin cuts to the bone, as ever. Do you have any more to say to me, Onion Knight, or can we put an end to this mummer’s farce? I grow weary of your face.”
Davos felt a stab of despair. His Grace should have sent another man, a lord or knight or maester, someone who could speak for him without tripping on his own tongue. “Death,” he heard himself say, “there will be death, aye. Your lordship lost a son at the Red Wedding. I lost four upon the Blackwater. And why? Because the Lannisters stole the throne. Go to King’s Landing and look on Tommen with your own eyes, if you doubt me. A blind man could see it. What does Stannis offer you? Vengeance. Vengeance for my sons and yours, for your husbands and your fathers and your brothers. Vengeance for your murdered lord, your murdered king, your butchered princes. Vengeance!”
“Yes,” piped a girl’s voice, thin and high.
It belonged to the half-grown child with the blond eyebrows and the long green braid. “They killed Lord Eddard and Lady Catelyn and King Robb,” she said. “He was our king! He was brave and good, and the Freys murdered him. If Lord Stannis will avenge him, we should join Lord Stannis.”
Manderly pulled her close. “Wylla, every time you open your mouth you make me want to send you to the silent sisters.”
“I only said—”
“We heard what you said,” said the older girl, her sister. “A child’s foolishness. Speak no ill of our friends of Frey. One of them will be your lord and husband soon.”
“No,” the girl declared, shaking her head. “I won’t. I won’t ever. They killed the king.”
Lord Wyman flushed. “You will. When the appointed day arrives, you will speak your wedding vows, else you will join the silent sisters and never speak again.”
The poor girl looked stricken. “Grandfather, please …”
“Hush, child,” said Lady Leona. “You heard your lord grandfather. Hush! You know nothing.”
“I know about the promise,” insisted the girl. “Maester Theomore, tell them! A thousand years before the Conquest, a promise was made, and oaths were sworn in the Wolf’s Den before the old gods and the new. When we were sore beset and friendless, hounded from our homes and in peril of our lives, the wolves took us in and nourished us and protected us against our enemies. The city is built upon the land they gave us. In return we swore that we should always be their men. Stark men!”
The maester fingered the chain about his neck. “Solemn oaths were sworn to the Starks of Winterfell, aye. But Winterfell has fallen and House Stark has been extinguished.”
“That’s because they killed them all!”
Another Frey spoke up. “Lord Wyman, if I may?”
Wyman Manderly gave him a nod. “Rhaegar. We are always pleased to hear your noble counsel.”
Rhaegar Frey acknowledged the compliment with a bow. He was thirty, or nigh unto, round-shouldered and kettle-bellied, but richly dressed in a doublet of soft grey lambswool trimmed in cloth-of-silver. His cloak was cloth-of-silver too, lined with vair and clasped at the collar with a brooch in the shape of the twin towers. “Lady Wylla,” he said to the girl with the green braid, “loyalty is a virtue. I hope you will be as loyal to Little Walder when you are joined in wedlock. As to the Starks, that House is extinguished only in the male line. Lord Eddard’s sons are dead, but his daughters live, and the younger girl is coming north to wed brave Ramsay Bolton.”
“Ramsay Snow,” Wylla Manderly threw back.
“Have it as you will. By any name, he shall soon be wed to Arya Stark. If you would keep faith with your promise, give him your allegiance, for he shall be your Lord of Winterfell.”
“He won’t ever be my lord! He made Lady Hornwood marry him, then shut her in a dungeon and made her eat her fingers.”
A murmur of assent swept the Merman’s Court. “The maid tells it true,” declared a stocky man in white and purple, whose cloak was fastened with a pair of crossed bronze keys. “Roose Bolton’s cold and cunning, aye, but a man can deal with Roose. We’ve all known worse. But this bastard son of his … they say he’s mad and cruel, a monster.”
“They say?” Rhaegar Frey sported a silky beard and a sardonic smile. “His enemies say, aye … but it was the Young Wolf who was the monster. More beast than boy, that one, puffed up with pride and bloodlust. And he was faithless, as my lord grandfather learned to his sorrow.” He spread his hands. “I do not fault White Harbor for supporting him. My grandsire made the same grievous mistake. In all the Young Wolf’s battles, White Harbor and the Twins fought side by side beneath his banners. Robb Stark betrayed us all. He abandoned the north to the cruel mercies of the ironmen to carve out a fairer kingdom for himself along the Trident. Then he abandoned the riverlords who had risked much and more for him, breaking his marriage pact with my grandfather to wed the first western wench who caught his eye. The Young Wolf? He was a vile dog and died like one.”
The Merman’s Court had grown still. Davos could feel the chill in the air. Lord Wyman was looking down at Rhaegar as if he were a roach in need of a hard heel … yet then, abruptly, he gave a ponderous nod that set his chins to wobbling. “A dog, aye. He brought us only grief and death. A vile dog indeed. Say on.”
Rhaegar Frey went on. “Grief and death, aye … and this onion lord will bring you more with his talk of vengeance. Open your eyes, as my lord grandsire did. The War of the Five Kings is all but done. Tommen is our king, our only king. We must help him bind up the wounds of this sad war. As Robert’s trueborn son, the heir of stag and lion, the Iron Throne is his by rights.”
“Wise words, and true,” said Lord Wyman Manderly.
“They weren’t.” Wylla Manderly stamped her foot.
“Be quiet, wretched child,” scolded Lady Leona. “Young girls should be an ornament to the eye, not an ache in the ear.” She seized the girl by her braid and pulled her squealing from the hall. There went my only friend in this hall, thought Davos.
“Wylla has always been a willful child,” her sister said, by way of apology. “I fear that she will make a willful wife.”
Rhaegar shrugged. “Marriage will soften her, I have no doubt. A firm hand and a quiet word.”
“If not, there are the silent sisters.” Lord Wyman shifted in his seat. “As for you, Onion Knight, I have heard sufficient treason for one day. You would have me risk my city for a false king and a false god. You would have me sacrifice my only living son so Stannis Baratheon can plant his puckered arse upon a throne to which he has no right. I will not do it. Not for you. Not for your lord. Not for any man.” The Lord of White Harbor pushed himself to his feet. The effort brought a red flush to his neck. “You are still a smuggler, ser, come to steal my gold and blood. You would take my son’s head. I think I shall take yours instead. Guards! Seize this man!”
Before Davos could even think to move, he was surrounded by silver tridents. “My lord,” he said, “I am an envoy.”
“Are you? You came sneaking into my city like a smuggler. I say you are no lord, no knight, no envoy, only a thief and a spy, a peddler of lies and treasons. I should tear your tongue out with hot pincers and deliver you to the Dreadfort to be flayed. But the Mother is merciful, and so am I.” He beckoned to Ser Marlon. “Cousin, take this creature to the Wolf’s Den and cut off his head and hands. I want them brought to me before I sup. I shall not be able to eat a bite until I see this smuggler’s head upon a spike, with an onion shoved between his lying teeth.”

Even in the gloom of the Wolf’s Den, Davos Seaworth could sense that something was awry this morning.
He woke to the sound of voices and crept to the door of his cell, but the wood was too thick and he could not make out the words. Dawn had come, but not the porridge Garth brought him every morn to break his fast. That made him anxious. All the days were much the same inside the Wolf’s Den, and any change was usually for the worse. This may be the day I die. Garth may be sitting with a whetstone even now, to put an edge on Lady Lu.
The onion knight had not forgotten Wyman Manderly’s last words to him. Take this creature to the Wolf’s Den and cut off head and hands, the fat lord had commanded. I shall not be able to eat a bite until I see this smuggler’s head upon a spike, with an onion shoved between his lying teeth. Every night Davos went to sleep with those words in his head, and every morn he woke to them. And should he forget, Garth was always pleased to remind him. Dead man was his name for Davos. When he came by in the morning, it was always, “Here, porridge for the dead man.” At night it was, “Blow out the candle, dead man.”
Once Garth brought his ladies by to introduce them to the dead man. “The Whore don’t look like much,” he said, fondling a rod of cold black iron, “but when I heat her up red-hot and let her touch your cock, you’ll cry for mother. And this here’s my Lady Lu. It’s her who’ll take your head and hands, when Lord Wyman sends down word.” Davos had never seen a bigger axe than Lady Lu, nor one with a sharper edge. Garth spent his days honing her, the other keepers said. I will not plead for mercy, Davos resolved. He would go to his death a knight, asking only that they take his head before his hands. Even Garth would not be so cruel as to deny him that, he hoped.
The sounds coming through the door were faint and muffled. Davos rose and paced his cell. As cells went, it was large and queerly comfortable. He suspected it might once have been some lordling’s bedchamber. It was thrice the size of his captain’s cabin on Black Bessa, and even larger than the cabin Salladhor Saan enjoyed on his Valyrian. Though its only window had been bricked in years before, one wall still boasted a hearth big enough to hold a kettle, and there was an actual privy built into a corner nook. The floor was made of warped planks full of splinters, and his sleeping pallet smelled of mildew, but those discomforts were mild compared to what Davos had expected.
The food had come as a surprise as well. In place of gruel and stale bread and rotten meat, the usual dungeon fare, his keepers brought him fresh-caught fish, bread still warm from the oven, spiced mutton, turnips, carrots, even crabs. Garth was none too pleased by that. “The dead should not eat better than the living,” he complained, more than once. Davos had furs to keep him warm by night, wood to feed his fire, clean clothing, a greasy tallow candle. When he asked for paper, quill, and ink, Therry brought them the next day. When he asked for a book, so he might keep at his reading, Therry turned up with The Seven-Pointed Star.
For all its comforts, though, his cell remained a cell. Its walls were solid stone, so thick that he could hear nothing of the outside world. The door was oak and iron, and his keepers kept it barred. Four sets of heavy iron fetters dangled from the ceiling, waiting for the day Lord Manderly decided to chain him up and give him over to the Whore. Today may be that day. The next time Garth opens my door, it may not be to bring me porridge.
His belly was rumbling, a sure sign that the morning was creeping past, and still no sign of food. The worst part is not the dying, it’s not knowing when or how. He had seen the inside of a few gaols and dungeons in his smuggling days, but those he’d shared with other prisoners, so there was always someone to talk with, to share your fears and hopes. Not here. Aside from his keepers, Davos Seaworth had the Wolf’s Den to himself.
He knew there were true dungeons down in the castle cellars—oubliettes and torture chambers and dank pits where huge black rats scrabbled in the darkness. His gaolers claimed all of them were unoccupied at present. “Only us here, Onion,” Ser Bartimus had told him. He was the chief gaoler, a cadaverous one-legged knight, with a scarred face and a blind eye. When Ser Bartimus was in his cups (and Ser Bartimus was in his cups most every day), he liked to boast of how he had saved Lord Wyman’s life at the Battle of the Trident. The Wolf’s Den was his reward.
The rest of “us” consisted of a cook Davos never saw, six guardsmen in the ground-floor barracks, a pair of washerwomen, and the two turnkeys who looked after the prisoner. Therry was the young one, the son of one of the washerwomen, a boy of ten-and-four. The old one was Garth, huge and bald and taciturn, who wore the same greasy leather jerkin every day and always seemed to have a glower on his face.
His years as a smuggler had given Davos Seaworth a sense of when a man was wrong, and Garth was wrong. The onion knight took care to hold his tongue in Garth’s presence. With Therry and Ser Bartimus he was less reticent. He thanked them for his food, encouraged them to talk about their hopes and histories, answered their questions politely, and never pressed too hard with queries of his own. When he made requests, they were small ones: a basin of water and a bit of soap, a book to read, more candles. Most such favors were granted, and Davos was duly grateful.
Neither man would speak about Lord Manderly or King Stannis or the Freys, but they would talk of other things. Therry wanted to go off to war when he was old enough, to fight in battles and become a knight. He liked to complain about his mother too. She was bedding two of the guardsmen, he confided. The men were on different watches and neither knew about the other, but one day one man or t’other would puzzle it out, and then there would be blood. Some nights the boy would even bring a skin of wine to the cell and ask Davos about the smuggler’s life as they drank.
Ser Bartimus had no interest in the world outside, or indeed anything that had happened since he lost his leg to a riderless horse and a maester’s saw. He had come to love the Wolf’s Den, however, and liked nothing more than to talk about its long and bloody history. The Den was much older than White Harbor, the knight told Davos. It had been raised by King Jon Stark to defend the mouth of the White Knife against raiders from the sea. Many a younger son of the King in the North had made his seat there, many a brother, many an uncle, many a cousin. Some passed the castle to their own sons and grandsons, and offshoot branches of House Stark had arisen; the Greystarks had lasted the longest, holding the Wolf’s Den for five centuries, until they presumed to join the Dreadfort in rebellion against the Starks of Winterfell.
After their fall, the castle had passed through many other hands. House Flint held it for a century, House Locke for almost two. Slates, Longs, Holts, and Ashwoods had held sway here, charged by Winterfell to keep the river safe. Reavers from the Three Sisters took the castle once, making it their toehold in the north. During the wars between Winterfell and the Vale, it was besieged by Osgood Arryn, the Old Falcon, and burned by his son, the one remembered as the Talon. When old King Edrick Stark had grown too feeble to defend his realm, the Wolf’s Den was captured by slavers from the Stepstones. They would brand their captives with hot irons and break them to the whip before shipping them off across the sea, and these same black stone walls bore witness.
“Then a long cruel winter fell,” said Ser Bartimus. “The White Knife froze hard, and even the firth was icing up. The winds came howling from the north and drove them slavers inside to huddle round their fires, and whilst they warmed themselves the new king come down on them. Brandon Stark this was, Edrick Snowbeard’s great-grandson, him that men called Ice Eyes. He took the Wolf’s Den back, stripped the slavers naked, and gave them to the slaves he’d found chained up in the dungeons. It’s said they hung their entrails in the branches of the heart tree, as an offering to the gods. The old gods, not these new ones from the south. Your Seven don’t know winter, and winter don’t know them.”
Davos could not argue with the truth of that. From what he had seen at Eastwatch-by-the-Sea, he did not care to know winter either. “What gods do you keep?” he asked the one-legged knight.
“The old ones.” When Ser Bartimus grinned, he looked just like a skull. “Me and mine were here before the Manderlys. Like as not, my own forebears strung those entrails through the tree.”
“I never knew that northmen made blood sacrifice to their heart trees.”
“There’s much and more you southrons do not know about the north,” Ser Bartimus replied.
He was not wrong. Davos sat beside his candle and looked at the letters he had scratched out word by word during the days of his confinement. I was a better smuggler than a knight, he had written to his wife, a better knight than a King’s Hand, a better King’s Hand than a husband. I am so sorry. Marya, I have loved you. Please forgive the wrongs I did you. Should Stannis lose his war, our lands will be lost as well. Take the boys across the narrow sea to Braavos and teach them to think kindly of me, if you would. Should Stannis gain the Iron Throne, House Seaworth will survive and Devan will remain at court. He will help you place the other boys with noble lords, where they can serve as pages and squires and win their knighthoods. It was the best counsel he had for her, though he wished it sounded wiser.
He had written to each of his three surviving sons as well, to help them remember the father who had bought them names with his fingertips. His notes to Steffon and young Stannis were short and stiff and awkward; if truth be told, he did not know them half as well as he had his older boys, the ones who’d burned or drowned upon the Blackwater. To Devan he wrote more, telling him how proud he was to see his own son as a king’s squire and reminding him that as the eldest it was his duty to protect his lady mother and his younger brothers. Tell His Grace I did my best, he ended. I am sorry that I failed him. I lost my luck when I lost my fingerbones, the day the river burned below King’s Landing.
Davos shuffled through the letters slowly, reading each one over several times, wondering whether he should change a word here or add one there. A man should have more to say when staring at the end of his life, he thought, but the words came hard. I did not do so ill, he tried to tell himself. I rose up from Flea Bottom to be a King’s Hand, and I learned to read and write.
He was still hunched over the letters when he heard the sound of iron keys rattling on a ring. Half a heartbeat later, the door to his cell came swinging open.
The man who stepped through the door was not one of his gaolers. He was tall and haggard, with a deeply lined face and a shock of grey-brown hair. A longsword hung from his hip, and his deep-dyed scarlet cloak was fastened at the shoulder with a heavy silver brooch in the shape of a mailed fist. “Lord Seaworth,” he said, “we do not have much time. Please, come with me.”
Davos eyed the stranger warily. The “please” confused him. Men about to lose their heads and hands were not oft accorded such courtesies. “Who are you?”
“Robett Glover, if it please, my lord.”
“Glover. Your seat was Deepwood Motte.”
“My brother Galbart’s seat. It was and is, thanks to your King Stannis. He has taken Deepwood back from the iron bitch who stole it and offers to restore it to its rightful owners. Much and more has happened whilst you have been confined within these walls, Lord Davos. Moat Cailin has fallen, and Roose Bolton has returned to the north with Ned Stark’s younger daughter. A host of Freys came with him. Bolton has sent forth ravens, summoning all the lords of the north to Barrowton. He demands homage and hostages … and witnesses to the wedding of Arya Stark and his bastard Ramsay Snow, by which match the Boltons mean to lay claim to Winterfell. Now, will you come with me, or no?”
“What choice do I have, my lord? Come with you, or remain with Garth and Lady Lu?”
“Who is Lady Lu? One of the washerwomen?” Glover was growing impatient. “All will be explained if you will come.”
Davos rose to his feet. “If I should die, I beseech my lord to see that my letters are delivered.”
“You have my word on that … though if you die, it will not be at Glover’s hands, nor Lord Wyman’s. Quickly now, with me.”
Glover led him along a darkened hall and down a flight of worn steps. They crossed the castle’s godswood, where the heart tree had grown so huge and tangled that it had choked out all the oaks and elms and birch and sent its thick, pale limbs crashing through the walls and windows that looked down on it. Its roots were as thick around as a man’s waist, its trunk so wide that the face carved into it looked fat and angry. Beyond the weirwood, Glover opened a rusted iron gate and paused to light a torch. When it was blazing red and hot, he took Davos down more steps into a barrel-vaulted cellar where the weeping walls were crusted white with salt, and seawater sloshed beneath their feet with every step. They passed through several cellars, and rows of small, damp, foul-smelling cells very different from the room where Davos had been confined. Then there was a blank stone wall that turned when Glover pushed on it. Beyond was a long narrow tunnel and still more steps. These led up.
“Where are we?” asked Davos as they climbed. His words echoed faintly though the darkness.
“The steps beneath the steps. The passage runs beneath the Castle Stair up to the New Castle. A secret way. It would not do for you to be seen, my lord. You are supposed to be dead.”
Porridge for the dead man. Davos climbed.
They emerged through another wall, but this one was lath and plaster on the far side. The room beyond was snug and warm and comfortably furnished, with a Myrish carpet on the floor and beeswax candles burning on a table. Davos could hear pipes and fiddles playing, not far away. On the wall hung a sheepskin with a map of the north painted across it in faded colors. Beneath the map sat Wyman Manderly, the colossal Lord of White Harbor.
“Please sit.” Lord Manderly was richly garbed. His velvet doublet was a soft blue-green, embroidered with golden thread at hem and sleeves and collar. His mantle was ermine, pinned at the shoulder with a golden trident. “Are you hungry?”
“No, my lord. Your gaolers have fed me well.”
“There is wine, if you have a thirst.”
“I will treat with you, my lord. My king commanded that of me. I do not have to drink with you.”
Lord Wyman sighed. “I have treated you most shamefully, I know. I had my reasons, but … please, sit and drink, I beg you. Drink to my boy’s safe return. Wylis, my eldest son and heir. He is home. That is the welcoming feast you hear. In the Merman’s Court they are eating lamprey pie and venison with roasted chestnuts. Wynafryd is dancing with the Frey she is to marry. The other Freys are raising cups of wine to toast our friendship.”
Beneath the music, Davos could hear the murmur of many voices, the clatter of cups and platters. He said nothing.
“I have just come from the high table,” Lord Wyman went on. “I have eaten too much, as ever, and all White Harbor knows my bowels are bad. My friends of Frey will not question a lengthy visit to the privy, we hope.” He turned his cup over. “There. You will drink and I will not. Sit. Time is short, and there is much we need to say. Robett, wine for the Hand, if you will be so good. Lord Davos, you will not know, but you are dead.”
Robett Glover filled a wine cup and offered it to Davos. He took it, sniffed it, drank. “How did I die, if I may ask?”
“By the axe. Your head and hands were mounted above the Seal Gate, with your face turned so your eyes looked out across the harbor. By now you are well rotted, though we dipped your head in tar before we set it upon the spike. Carrion crows and seabirds squabbled over your eyes, they say.”
Davos shifted uncomfortably. It was a queer feeling, being dead. “If it please my lord, who died in my place?”
“Does it matter? You have a common face, Lord Davos. I hope my saying so does not offend you. The man had your coloring, a nose of the same shape, two ears that were not dissimilar, a long beard that could be trimmed and shaped like yours. You can be sure we tarred him well, and the onion shoved between his teeth served to twist the features. Ser Bartimus saw that the fingers of his left hand were shortened, the same as yours. The man was a criminal, if that gives you any solace. His dying may accomplish more good than anything he ever did whilst living. My lord, I bear you no ill will. The rancor I showed you in the Merman’s Court was a mummer’s farce put on to please our friends of Frey.”
“My lord should take up a life of mummery,” said Davos. “You and yours were most convincing. Your good-daughter seemed to want me dead most earnestly, and the little girl …”
“Wylla.” Lord Wyman smiled. “Did you see how brave she was? Even when I threatened to have her tongue out, she reminded me of the debt White Harbor owes to the Starks of Winterfell, a debt that can never be repaid. Wylla spoke from the heart, as did Lady Leona. Forgive her if you can, my lord. She is a foolish, frightened woman, and Wylis is her life. Not every man has it in him to be Prince Aemon the Dragonknight or Symeon Star-Eyes, and not every woman can be as brave as my Wylla and her sister Wynafryd … who did know, yet played her own part fearlessly.
“When treating with liars, even an honest man must lie. I did not dare defy King’s Landing so long as my last living son remained a captive. Lord Tywin Lannister wrote me himself to say that he had Wylis. If I would have him freed unharmed, he told me, I must repent my treason, yield my city, declare my loyalty to the boy king on the Iron Throne … and bend my knee to Roose Bolton, his Warden of the North. Should I refuse, Wylis would die a traitor’s death, White Harbor would be stormed and sacked, and my people would suffer the same fate as the Reynes of Castamere.
“I am fat, and many think that makes me weak and foolish. Mayhaps Tywin Lannister was one such. I sent him back a raven to say that I would bend my knee and open my gates after my son was returned, but not before. There the matter stood when Tywin died. Afterward the Freys turned up with Wendel’s bones … to make a peace and seal it with a marriage pact, they claimed, but I was not about to give them what they wanted until I had Wylis, safe and whole, and they were not about to give me Wylis until I proved my loyalty. Your arrival gave me the means to do that. That was the reason for the discourtesy I showed you in the Merman’s Court, and for the head and hands rotting above the Seal Gate.”
“You took a great risk, my lord,” Davos said. “If the Freys had seen through your deception …”
“I took no risk at all. If any of the Freys had taken it upon themselves to climb my gate for a close look at the man with the onion in his mouth, I would have blamed my gaolers for the error and produced you to appease them.”
Davos felt a shiver up his spine. “I see.”
“I hope so. You have sons of your own, you said.”
Three, thought Davos, though I fathered seven.
“Soon I must return to the feast to toast my friends of Frey,” Manderly continued. “They watch me, ser. Day and night their eyes are on me, noses sniffing for some whiff of treachery. You saw them, the arrogant Ser Jared and his nephew Rhaegar, that smirking worm who wears a dragon’s name. Behind them both stands Symond, clinking coins. That one has bought and paid for several of my servants and two of my knights. One of his wife’s handmaids has found her way into the bed of my own fool. If Stannis wonders that my letters say so little, it is because I dare not even trust my maester. Theomore is all head and no heart. You heard him in my hall. Maesters are supposed to put aside old loyalties when they don their chains, but I cannot forget that Theomore was born a Lannister of Lannisport and claims some distant kinship to the Lannisters of Casterly Rock. Foes and false friends are all around me, Lord Davos. They infest my city like roaches, and at night I feel them crawling over me.” The fat man’s fingers coiled into a fist, and all his chins trembled. “My son Wendel came to the Twins a guest. He ate Lord Walder’s bread and salt, and hung his sword upon the wall to feast with friends. And they murdered him. Murdered, I say, and may the Freys choke upon their fables. I drink with Jared, jape with Symond, promise Rhaegar the hand of my own beloved granddaughter … but never think that means I have forgotten. The north remembers, Lord Davos. The north remembers, and the mummer’s farce is almost done. My son is home.”
Something about the way Lord Wyman said that chilled Davos to the bone. “If it is justice that you want, my lord, look to King Stannis. No man is more just.”
Robett Glover broke in to add, “Your loyalty does you honor, my lord, but Stannis Baratheon remains your king, not our own.”
“Your own king is dead,” Davos reminded them, “murdered at the Red Wedding beside Lord Wyman’s son.”
“The Young Wolf is dead,” Manderly allowed, “but that brave boy was not Lord Eddard’s only son. Robett, bring the lad.”
“At once, my lord.” Glover slipped out the door.
The lad? Was it possible that one of Robb Stark’s brothers had survived the ruin of Winterfell? Did Manderly have a Stark heir hidden away in his castle? A found boy or a feigned boy? The north would rise for either, he suspected … but Stannis Baratheon would never make common cause with an imposter.
The lad who followed Robett Glover through the door was not a Stark, nor could he ever hope to pass for one. He was older than the Young Wolf’s murdered brothers, fourteen or fifteen by the look of him, and his eyes were older still. Beneath a tangle of dark brown hair his face was almost feral, with a wide mouth, sharp nose, and pointed chin. “Who are you?” Davos asked.
The boy looked to Robett Glover.
“He is a mute, but we have been teaching him his letters. He learns quickly.” Glover drew a dagger from his belt and gave it to the boy. “Write your name for Lord Seaworth.”
There was no parchment in the chamber. The boy carved the letters into a wooden beam in the wall. W … E … X. He leaned hard into the X. When he was done he flipped the dagger in the air, caught it, and stood admiring his handiwork.
“Wex is ironborn. He was Theon Greyjoy’s squire. Wex was at Winterfell.” Glover sat. “How much does Lord Stannis know of what transpired at Winterfell?”
Davos thought back on the tales they’d heard. “Winterfell was captured by Theon Greyjoy, who had once been Lord Stark’s ward. He had Stark’s two young sons put to death and mounted their heads above the castle walls. When the northmen came to oust him, he put the entire castle to sword, down to the last child, before he himself was slain by Lord Bolton’s bastard.”
“Not slain,” said Glover. “Captured, and carried back to the Dreadfort. The Bastard has been flaying him.”
Lord Wyman nodded. “The tale you tell is one we all have heard, as full of lies as a pudding’s full of raisins. It was the Bastard of Bolton who put Winterfell to the sword … Ramsay Snow, he was called then, before the boy king made him a Bolton. Snow did not kill them all. He spared the women, roped them together, and marched them to the Dreadfort for his sport.”
“His sport?”
“He is a great hunter,” said Wyman Manderly, “and women are his favorite prey. He strips them naked and sets them loose in the woods. They have a half day’s start before he sets out after them with hounds and horns. From time to time some wench escapes and lives to tell the tale. Most are less fortunate. When Ramsay catches them he rapes them, flays them, feeds their corpses to his dogs, and brings their skins back to the Dreadfort as trophies. If they have given him good sport, he slits their throats before he skins them. Elsewise, t’other way around.”
Davos paled. “Gods be good. How could any man—”
“The evil is in his blood,” said Robett Glover. “He is a bastard born of rape. A Snow, no matter what the boy king says.”
“Was ever snow so black?” asked Lord Wyman. “Ramsay took Lord Hornwood’s lands by forcibly wedding his widow, then locked her in a tower and forgot her. It is said she ate her own fingers in her extremity … and the Lannister notion of king’s justice is to reward her killer with Ned Stark’s little girl.”
“The Boltons have always been as cruel as they were cunning, but this one seems a beast in human skin,” said Glover.
The Lord of White Harbor leaned forward. “The Freys are no better. They speak of wargs and skinchangers and assert that it was Robb Stark who slew my Wendel. The arrogance of it! They do not expect the north to believe their lies, not truly, but they think we must pretend to believe or die. Roose Bolton lies about his part in the Red Wedding, and his bastard lies about the fall of Winterfell. And yet so long as they held Wylis I had no choice but to eat all this excrement and praise the taste.”
“And now, my lord?” asked Davos.
He had hoped to hear Lord Wyman say, And now I shall declare for King Stannis, but instead the fat man smiled an odd, twinkling smile and said, “And now I have a wedding to attend. I am too fat to sit a horse, as any man with eyes can plainly see. As a boy I loved to ride, and as a young man I handled a mount well enough to win some small acclaim in the lists, but those days are done. My body has become a prison more dire than the Wolf’s Den. Even so, I must go to Winterfell. Roose Bolton wants me on my knees, and beneath the velvet courtesy he shows the iron mail. I shall go by barge and litter, attended by a hundred knights and my good friends from the Twins. The Freys came here by sea. They have no horses with them, so I shall present each of them with a palfrey as a guest gift. Do hosts still give guest gifts in the south?”
“Some do, my lord. On the day their guest departs.”
“Perhaps you understand, then.” Wyman Manderly lurched ponderously to his feet. “I have been building warships for more than a year. Some you saw, but there are as many more hidden up the White Knife. Even with the losses I have suffered, I still command more heavy horse than any other lord north of the Neck. My walls are strong, and my vaults are full of silver. Oldcastle and Widow’s Watch will take their lead from me. My bannermen include a dozen petty lords and a hundred landed knights. I can deliver King Stannis the allegiance of all the lands east of the White Knife, from Widow’s Watch and Ramsgate to the Sheepshead Hills and the headwaters of the Broken Branch. All this I pledge to do if you will meet my price.”
“I can bring your terms to the king, but—”
Lord Wyman cut him off. “If you will meet my price, I said. Not Stannis. It’s not a king I need but a smuggler.”
Robett Glover took up the tale. “We may never know all that happened at Winterfell, when Ser Rodrik Cassel tried to take the castle back from Theon Greyjoy’s ironmen. The Bastard of Bolton claims that Greyjoy murdered Ser Rodrik during a parley. Wex says no. Until he learns more letters we will never know half the truth … but he came to us knowing yes and no, and those can go a long way once you find the right questions.”
“It was the Bastard who murdered Ser Rodrik and the men of Winterfell,” said Lord Wyman. “He slew Greyjoy’s ironmen as well. Wex saw men cut down trying to yield. When we asked how he escaped, he took a chunk of chalk and drew a tree with a face.”
Davos thought about that. “The old gods saved him?”
“After a fashion. He climbed the heart tree and hid himself amongst the leaves. Bolton’s men searched the godswood twice and killed the men they found there, but none thought to clamber up into the trees. Is that how it happened, Wex?”
The boy flipped up Glover’s dagger, caught it, nodded.
Glover said, “He stayed up in the tree a long time. He slept amongst the branches, not daring to descend. Finally he heard voices down beneath him.”
“The voices of the dead,” said Wyman Manderly.
Wex held up five fingers, tapped each one with the dagger, then folded four away and tapped the last again.
“Six of them,” asked Davos. “There were six.”
“Two of them Ned Stark’s murdered sons.”
“How could a mute tell you that?”
“With chalk. He drew two boys … and two wolves.”
“The lad is ironborn, so he thought it best not to show himself,” said Glover. “He listened. The six did not linger long amongst the ruins of Winterfell. Four went one way, two another. Wex stole after the two, a woman and a boy. He must have stayed downwind, so the wolf would not catch his scent.”
“He knows where they went,” Lord Wyman said.
Davos understood. “You want the boy.”
“Roose Bolton has Lord Eddard’s daughter. To thwart him White Harbor must have Ned’s son … and the direwolf. The wolf will prove the boy is who we say he is, should the Dreadfort attempt to deny him. That is my price, Lord Davos. Smuggle me back my liege lord, and I will take Stannis Baratheon as my king.”
Old instinct made Davos Seaworth reach for his throat. His fingerbones had been his luck, and somehow he felt he would have need of luck to do what Wyman Manderly was asking of him. The bones were gone, though, so he said, “You have better men than me in your service. Knights and lords and maesters. Why would you need a smuggler? You have ships.”
“Ships,” Lord Wyman agreed, “but my crews are rivermen, or fisherfolk who have never sailed beyond the Bite. For this I must have a man who’s sailed in darker waters and knows how to slip past dangers, unseen and unmolested.”
“Where is the boy?” Somehow Davos knew he would not like the answer. “Where is it you want me to go, my lord?”
Robett Glover said, “Wex. Show him.”
The mute flipped the dagger, caught it, then flung it end over end at the sheepskin map that adorned Lord Wyman’s wall. It struck quivering. Then he grinned.
For half a heartbeat Davos considered asking Wyman Manderly to send him back to the Wolf’s Den, to Ser Bartimus with his tales and Garth with his lethal ladies. In the Den even prisoners ate porridge in the morning. But there were other places in this world where men were known to break their fast on human flesh.

